I never saw him till now.
I never saw the woman before to my knowledge.
I was very much in liquor. I went in and called for a pint of purl; I could make no body hear; I laid me down and was almost asleep. I never stole a halfpenny worth of any thing in my life.
He brought those two men along with him.
I know nothing at all about the money; I left two girls in the room with him; I heard them talking of the money after I came down stairs; I have two witnesses to prove it.
I never saw the money; I never knew my master had the money in my life.
I have no questions to ask him, he is very well convinced I never was near him.
I met with the prosecutor promiscuously in Holborn; he came up to me and asked me to go and drink a glass of wine at this man's house. I went in with him; he asked what I chose to drink; I said a glass of red port mulled; he sat down on one side of the table and I on the other; he pulled out half a crown and asked me if I would lie with him for that; I said I never accepted of any thing so mean as half a crown; he said it was immaterial, if I would not do it for that; he had been with two other girls that evening. He said perhaps if I took him home he might make me a present of something more. I said I could not take him home for any such money. He asked me where he could find me again; I said in Holborn; he said he would go up the horse-ride, and I went up Holborn. The prosecutor passed me afterwards in Holborn; he was very much in liquor; he said nothing to me nor I to him. I was afterwards informed that Mr. Parry charged me with taking a bank note from the prosecutor; I went to Mr. Parry's, and gave him a direction where I lived, and asked him where the prosecutor was; he said he was gone into the country, but would come to town that afternoon; I said very well, there I lodge, if he has any such thing to charge me with, he may do it any time. I was at Mr. Parry's house almost every night after the warrant was out against me. He said nothing to me. I asked him before the constable if he did not know where I lodged; he said he did; I asked him why he did not call upon me at my lodging; he said the prosecutor had been several times in town, and never came near him; that he should never have come after me if he had not met with me.
The prosecutrix attacked me; she said she had lost her money, and charged me with it; I know nothing of it.
I know nothing of it.
Whether there was not another woman in the house besides me?
I have no witnesses; I know no more of the gentleman's money than the child unborn.
A person gave me the sleeves and stocks to wash for her. I went to Mr. Clark's to pawn a gown and picked up a handkerchief at the door as I went. I have large family in great distress.
I bought the tea-pot stand of her along with the half guinea's worth of china.
I am very innocent of the charge.
Mr. Ball promised to forgive me if I would tell where the things were; and he had his shoes again.
I confessed more out of fear before the alderman than the truth.
I would have called my master I lived with last, but I thought it would be to my prejudice, to see me in this situation. I should be glad to get a good place again.
Whether she did not offer me these things in lieu of money? I was hired a servant to her. She had four girls that saw company. The woman kept the house. She wanted me to go into company. I would not. She sent a gentleman down stairs after me; I would not comply with him; he went out in a passion; she came down stairs and abused me, and said I hindered her of a guinea to her house; after that, she sent me up to the bed room, a gentleman came up, and she locked me in; she kept me there all night, the gentleman was to give me five guineas; he said he left it in her hands. She said she was distressed, and was going to live in a house at Brompton. She kept a very disorderly house in King's-Place.
The things she accuses me of stealing from her, with a bed-gown she gave me to do my work in of a morning, I left it dirty in the pail. I gave her warning several times, and she would not pay me what she owed me. I went away between ten and eleven o'clock in the morning. She gave me a shift and other things; she claimed a right to every thing she gave me, which was a bed-gown and shift and other things, which I gave up to her.
She has drawn many a girl in the cord and debauched them.
Please to ask the constables; they know she keeps a bad house; there are people come every night and break her windows, and her house is tore to pieces.
My mistress sent me to pawn those things; she would not have duplicates in her pocket for fear she should pull them out of her pocket. She pawned those things to pay her landlady.
Have not you got a husband living?
She had a husband, and I have often heard her say that he was gone down to Portsmouth?
The feather-bed is an old bed which I laid upon in the kitchen.
She used all the girls of the town so ill, that they left her. How I came to know she was a married woman was, when she wanted me to go into company; I said I was a married woman, she said so was she a married woman, but for all that she would go with a gentleman sooner than want money.
The person who was present at the time she gave me these things is absent.
My master promised to pardon me if I restored the things, upon my word, and not to prosecute me.
When I went out in the morning, I left Susannah Fletcher in the room, I know nothing of the things being stolen. I saw Susannah Fletcher afterwards, and she said she had two gowns in pawn, that if I would fetch them out, I should have them for two shillings more than they were pawned for. If I had known that they had been stolen, I would not have gone to have fetched stolen goods out.
A young man gave me the things to pawn, and said he would give me a shilling for my trouble. He said they were his own; that it was no harm to pawn them. I went to pawn them, and the pawnbroker stopped me, and sent for one of the runners. When I went back to the publick-house, I suppose he saw the runner with me, and made off. I never could find him since. I know nothing of the things.
I have nothing to support me but singing of ballads. I came up to town to buy some ballads. I went to this house. I thought I could get a cast there in the morning to Hounslow for sixpence. A gentleman was making water at the door; he told me he would make me a handsome present if I would sleep with him all night, and bid me go up to this room. I went and sat on the stairs; I thought I heard him coming up, and went and sat down in the room.
Whether she did not say at the justice's that she took them up in the entry?
The things lay in the entry; Mrs. Fuller wanted me to put them up in my apron, and said if I did not take them up she could not hurt me.
My mistress sent me to ask at this place for one Mrs. Wood, a mantua-maker, to come and try a gown on she was making for her. Going up the second pair of stairs, I met Mrs. Fuller coming down with a pail of water; she asked me where I was going; I said up to the garret to ask for Mrs. Wood, she said no such person lived there. She said I had been to rob her place; she took up a gown and cloak, and said I had been to rob her. She wanted me to take the things; when I would not, she said she would do for me; she called up this woman, and then sent for her husband, who sent for a constable.
Whether he did not leave the watch for sleeping all night with me, till such time as he came to redeem it the next morning?
I was going along King-street, Covent-Garden; the prosecutor followed me and asked me if I would go and drink any thing. He treated me with a glass of brandy. He went home with me, and he asked me if I chose any thing more to drink; we had a pot of gin hot; he gave me a shilling to fetch it. He said, I have got no money about me, but if you will take my watch till the morning, I will come and redeem it. He was gone four hours, then he brought a constable; the constable asked me if I had got the watch. I said I had; that he left it with me for sleeping with me all night. The prosecutor said, give me my watch, I will give you five shillings. I said no, that was not the agreement, that he promised to give me half a guinea, and if he would give me that I would give him his watch. I offered to give it him if he would give me the half guinea.
That gentleman who stands there was not the man who brought me before the justice. He said, will you give me the watch? I said I had it in my pocket but would not deliver it without the gentleman delivered me the half guinea he agreed for; then he took it by force out of my pocket.
I deal in old clothes, I bought them in the street.
Whether she ever saw me before she saw me at the house where she got the cat?
Whether she did not tell her men lodgers (there were about fourteen in the house) whether she did not tell me to tell the people, if they asked me how long she had known me, that she had known me seven years. She said the reason she would tell them so was, as I was a likely young woman, and some of her lodgers had a good deal of money, they might make me a present of something?
Whether you ever knew any thing dishonest of me in your life?
When I had been up stairs and had some dinner, I came down; Mrs. Smith was in the back parlour with about eighteen or nineteen outlandish men. One of them got up. She said if I had a mind to sleep in her house I might. I went out, and one of the men followed me, and put the necklace and stay-hook into my hand. I said what was that for? He said to lie with me. I said, I did not choose it. Her maid is witness to it.
Whether you ever knew any thing dishonest of me?
I found it. I did not know that it was of any value. I kept it in my pocket several weeks. When my sister came I gave it her to enquire whether it was of any value or not.
You are a d - d liar; I don't choose to ask her no questions, my lord.
I was in my own room; the woman brought me these things. I took her to be an honest woman. I pawned them for her and brought her the money.
I went out on Thursday morning; while I was out Mr. Greenwood, who had a false key, went into the room. I had not left the lodging.
These pieces of lawn were given to me by the young woman who was in the shop. This gentleman, Mr. Cashaw, saw the young woman give them to me. They charged me, and let her go.
Being a country woman I lost myself; at last I saw a gentlewoman standing at that gentleman's shop; she was looking at some cottens. I enquired the way to Whitechapel. She said she was coming my way, if I would stop, that she was going in to buy a gown, that they sold them cheap there. I said I would go in with her, and we would buy two together. We saw nothing that suited us; we turned out of the shop again. I was not above three yards out of the shop when I picked up this cotton handkerchief; I held it up in my hand and asked the gentlewoman that I went into the shop with, if it was her property; she said it was not, and I held it in my hand; I declare I never concealed it.
I had the things in security for my three guineas of Fanny Derby till her sister Mrs. Walker came from Bath; then she said she would pay me; but she desired me not to mention it to her sister; when I was going to another place I told Mrs. Thorley there was a trifle between Fanny and me that I wished to settle before I went away; she said she knew it; that Fanny knew where I was going to, and would call upon me. I went to her on the Monday night at her sister's, and asked her for the money; she gave me a guinea, and asked me if I had brought the things? I said no; they were safe in my box; she said then she would bring the rest of the money on Wednesday. I was out on the Wednesday; when I came home I found they had been and broke my box open.
I had the things before I went to live at that house; the waistcoat was my father's, I brought it out of the country with me; the snuff box and row of garnetts were given to me.
Going by I saw the pot stand, and was going to carry it home.
Whether she did not bring Sarah Gahagan to swear against me at Guildhall; and she took her oath she knew nothing of me?
If the constable which took me was here he would tell you the same.
As to what I have laid against me I am innocent of it; I lodged at this gentlewoman's mother's; she is a drunken turbulent woman, though I drink a little sometimes myself; this woman's mother knocked me down in the street. I went to the prosecutrix's house at two o'clock, and asked her to let me in? She did not like to let me in; but at last she did, and bid me not let her husband see me there in the morning. Please to ask them if I did not bring other things to put on instead of those I left?
I told the prosecutor where Mr. Jones lived, upon which he laid hold of me as if I was the woman. I never saw the gentleman before he took me.
I took the lodging for a young man whose name is Jones; he was out of place but about a week; I then took the lodging on myself. I was there six weeks, and paid him all the time. I was then taken ill; I was ill seven weeks, in the course of which time I made away with every thing I had. After seven weeks I was but just able to crawl about with a stick, and the help of a woman who was with me. I had hardly any thing left to cover me. I asked a gentleman to lend me some money to get me some things; I got some, and went out, for I am an unfortunate woman. I had fifteen shillings; ten shillings I paid to the prosecutor; with the rest I bought me a pair of shoes. I had not left the lodging; I told him part of his things were out, but that I would not leave the lodging till I got them in again. He said very well. I told him to let the lodging if he could; I told him on Saturday night I would strain every point to put the things in their place. I heard on Saturday night he had a warrant for me; I said it could not be, for I had been with him the night before, and desired him to let the lodging; he met me in the street and asked me if I had any money; I told him no, but I hoped I should have some on the morrow to pay him, and get his things home. He charged a constable with me.
How came you in my room?
Had we no liquor to drink in my room?
Was there any communication between you and I?
As I was going into Stuart's-rents this lad laid hold of me and said, I have seen you before, 3where are you going? I said do not trouble your head with me. I went home and left my door upon the latch, as I did not think to stay long; the lad came up stairs and said, now I have got into your room, what will you drink? He said, let us have a little drop of gin. He gave me twopence halfpenny, and Mrs. Smith's daughter fetched it; we drank the liquor and came down stairs together, and went up White Hart-yard; in less than half a minute he turned round and said, you have robbed me of the money out of my pocket. We came down, and he alarmed some people. I never saw but that two-pence half-penny.
I have no friend here. I am a Scotch-woman.
There was a fire happened the morning before. When I got up they were moving the things about; I picked the box up; I did not know whose it was.
Where did you sit when you pulled off your shoes and stockings?
On the 16th of March I was in the taproom in this publick-house; Robinson came in with another man; we had five or six pots of half and half at the other man's expence. He went home with us to our lodgings; he gave me a half crown piece, and the other man gave the other girl a half crown piece to sleep with her. He kept drinking spiritual liquor all the evening. We got up and drank again till about eleven o'clock in the day. He sent me to buy him some shamroques; he went and unlocked my door, and sat on my bed's foot, pulled off his jacket and hat, and unbuckled his shoes; he wanted me to lie down; I said I should not in the middle of the day. He said I suppose you want some more money; I said to be sure. He wanted my buckles; I let him have them. I went and pawned his buckles for half a guinea. When I came back he said they cost him twenty-five shillings, and he was sure I could get more for them. I went back and brought him a duplicate; he gave me five shillings for myself. He left his buckles over night at the bar of the publick-house. He said he would come in the evening again; he did, and brought a watchman with him.
I have a witness to prove I was ill at the time, and not able to go out.
I have nothing to say in my defence.
I went to this house to buy some tea; the woman was not at home; a woman came down stairs and asked me if I would pawn these things for her at Mr. Richardson's, and she would give me a shilling for my trouble. I took the things to carry to pawn. She said she would come after me. This gentleman stopped me. I never was in the room, nor near it.
I never saw him before he took me up. He took up two women before, and swore to one of them; and she was cleared before the justice.
I picked the mug up in a passage; I shewed it to a woman; she said it was plate. I asked her what I should do with it? She directed me to Mr. Mealing's.
It is all very false what they have sworn against me. There are a great many women in St. Giles's who are like me. I was a-bed and asleep when Lord Mansfield's house was destroyed. Hyde bid me go out of the way several times, I said I knew myself innocent and would not go out of the way at all.
I had several in the jail yesterday who would have been witnesses that I was in my lodgings, one Mr. Crofts who lives in Tottenham-court road knows I was at home, but he is not here. I did not know my trial would come on to-day.
I found them on the road.
Miss Caton gave me a great many of these things when my old mistress died. - I did not give her one of them; I told her she might either go or stay till I was settled, but I gave her nothing; the things belonged to another lady which was at our house.
My mistress did not give me warning, I gave her warning; her mama was taken with fits, and was very ill, I used to attend her; I sat up with her when she died; I laid her out, my mistress desired me to do it; it is a customary thing to have all that was about a corpse when it is laid out; there were three sheets about her; when they were moving the linen there were but two old servants sheets laid upon the bed; I left them there, and took one off my own bed instead of the three that she died in; my mistress promised me mourning, but she never gave me any thing but an old gown; she ordered me to take it to the mantua-maker's to fit me, and then she took it again, and would not return me the money the mantua-maker charged for it; I did two servants work, because she would keep but one, to oblige her; we had words, and she took me up out of spite.
I never was in trouble before. I leave it to the mercy of the Jury to do what they will with me.
My husband went away and left me with two small children. I was greatly distressed; I meant to get them out of pawn on Tuesday and restore them, but they took me up on the Monday.
He was leaning over a post; I was coming out with small beer in my hand; he said can't you afford more than small beer? I said no, if you will give me strong do. So I went up stairs; there were two young women there. He followed me. He was in the room three hours, and he got himself in that time much in liquor. I know nothing of his money.
I had been tried three years ago, and was ordered to be confined in Bridewell for three years, but was released by the rioters. A person gave me these things to sell.
I do not know what to say, I have no witnesses.
He declared before the justice of peace and this man, that he knew nothing of the purse; he does not know the nature of an oath; he does not know good from evil; he came to me in the prison to make it up with me; I would not make it up with him, as we were all before the presence of the Lord, as he is omnipresent in every place, as I was not guilty of the crime. I have not had time to send to my landlady in Virginia-street; if he was to advertise me for a whole year in the news-paper, nobody could prove any thing against me.
I am innocent of it.
I know nothing about the things more than the child unborn. This girl took me to this house and said it was her acquaintances.
Did he ever see me touch any property, or have any of it, or take it from me?
As I was walking early in the morning, the man overtook me; when we got to Battlebridge he said he had been ill of a fever and asked me to go in and drink; I went in and drank with him; he had a bundle; I did not know but it was his own property. As we were drinking the constable came in, he was shewing me a ring, and asked me if it was a diamond one; but how he came by the property I know not. I never was near the fire nor knew nothing of it till he mentioned it at the publick-house.
I have no friends; the woman I live with expects every minute to lie-in or she would be here.
I know nothing of it; I am innocent of it, I am innocent of the charge.
My three children had the small pox, one has been cut for the stone, and this has lost its sight since it has been in prison. I owed fourteen shillings for rent; I was going to my master's to borrow a few shillings to save my goods, this man met me in the street and knocked me down two or three times; he said he believed I was the person who stole his coat. I know nothing of the coat.
I went into the shop to buy two yards and an half of cloth. I changed an half guinea and paid for it; when I came out the gentleman stopped me and said I had got more than I had paid for. I did not know of it.
I was coming past the place; that woman said I had the things; I never saw her before.
The prosecutor was in liquor, and he took me into the French Horn. I was at the house every night, but they did not take me up for three weeks.
I bought these things in Rag-fair.
I beg the mercy of the court, I have no friends here.
It is nothing but spite and malice, I know nothing of it.
I know nothing of it.
I went in with the woman to buy a clock, and she gave me the buckles.
I was very much in liquor; I went into the entry to tie up my garter. I know nothing about it; I never saw any thing.
She charged another person with it?
That was a gown this woman gave me for taking it out of pawn.
I know nothing at all about it; I am as clear of it as the child unborn.
He gave me the buckles; I went to bed with him; after he used his pleasure with me, in order to get his buckles back again, he charged me with stealing his watch. He had been with another girl and she had stolen all the money out of his pocket.
The Saturday she called to me and told me she had lost a piece of muslin, and that she would have the muslin or my life. I said I never saw the muslin. She said she would not value hanging me, but she would have the muslin, and sent for the constable and had me taken up . The things laid to my charge I never saw. I was searched and nothing was found upon me.
I met a person in Aldersgate-street who asked me to go and drink; we went and had a bottle of wine. He said he had no money about him, but if I would please to accept of this spoon he would give it me; he did give it to me.
I never was inside the shop till he took me; going by I saw a man and woman. I stopped to see what was the matter, and that man took and dragged me into the shop.
I know nothing of it. I was at this house-warming when the purse was missed; the women pulled off their things; she searched me, made me pull off my stays; she pulled my hat off, and searched in my mouth. I do not know why she should charge me more than any body else with taking it. The constable has got three guineas of mine. They used me very crookedly.
I am quite innocent of what is alledged to my charge. I have never been near the prosecutor's premisses for above twenty-two months; I bought the box for three pence halfpenny as a common snuff-box. I have had these doits sixteen years.
I bought that shirt in order to make me some night caps, and gave one shilling for it; what I bought at Mr. Macaulay's I paid ready money for; I had no Bank-note; the money I had I partly worked for, and part was left me. I had twenty-five guineas left me by my mother.
I am an unfortunate girl of the town. I was standing in the street; he came by very much in liquor; he asked me for a lodging. I said he might have part of mine, what would he give me for the lodging? He said two shillings. I went out for a pint of beer; the door was on the latch; when I came back he was gone; he dined with me afterwards on Saturday, and drank with me at night.
I have no witnesses.
My witnesses are not here.
There was a woman in the room before I went up into it. I saw these things in the room. I know nothing how they came there.
At the bottom of Pall-Mall a child of mine picked up this watch; she brought it to me at the door, and said, mama, here is something I found. I took it in my hand; I told a man of it, at the door, and asked what to do with the watch, whether I was to advertise it? He took it, and said he would take care of me and the watch too.
I was not there at the time he lost his money, I was gone out; there were two women in the room with him when I came in; I am innocent of it; when I was on my deathbed in New Prison I told the parson I was innocent of it.
Why did not you attack me at the time?
I am innocent of what I am accused with, and I leave it to the honourable court.
I leave myself to the mercy of the court; I am seven months gone with child.
I lodged in Crown-court. The prosecutor came into the court and took hold of me, and said he would give me sixpence. He gave me a penny, and after that he went home with me, and would lie with me by compulsion, and when he had lain with me, he wanted me to lie with the drummer. I said I would not. He said he would have my bloody liver out. I do not know how I came by the purse; the money was sent me from my husband; I know nothing of it.
I met a woman I had worked with at an upholsterer's; she said she wanted to make up her rent, and asked me to pawn these things for her, which I did.
A great deal she has sworn is as false as God is true. I have no friend in London. I beg the court will be merciful to me on account of my youth. I am not twenty years old; and I am almost seven months gone with child.
I never was in any prison before. As I was going down Long-acre I met that woman; the had something on her head; she turned her head and said what is that lies so white at the door; she said stoop because I have the basket on my head; I stooped and picked up that parcel; she asked what it was, I said I would keep it; then she ran into the shop; and as I was going to look at the bundle they caught hold of me; I never was in the shop.
I leave myself to the mercy of the court.
I know nothing of the things but only a coloured apron she lent me; as to the charge I am innocent.
I found them in the street.
My husband was in St. George's Hospital. I had not bread to eat at the time; I meant to have brought them back on the Saturday when I should have had money coming to me.
This woman asked me to come to this publick-house to fetch her things to wash; I went to the publick-house. A man was drinking with her; he asked me to drink. He pulled out something and put on the bottom of the pint pot, and said that he would shew us a trick we never saw in our lives, that it should come through the pot, and there should be no hole in the pot. As I was in the publick-house, he came to me, and said I had taken a guinea from under the pint pot. He felt in my mouth. I know nothing of it. She wanted me to wash her things for her. She had been out all night, and got her things dirty. He pulled out his watch to shew me that it went upon diamonds. I never heard such a thing in my life; I did not know what a diamond was. I had the watch several times in my hand; if I had been a thief I might have taken it; and so had the woman the watch several times.
I can say nothing in my defence; I leave it to the mercy of the court.
What he has said is as false as God Almighty is true.
I went to ask for Mrs. Williams. I went up the wrong house by mistake; I found the door open; I came down directly. I never was farther than the door. I never had any of the things. I beg for mercy on account of my condition; I am with child.
I brought it to her; she knew I was to bring it out on the Monday following. On the Monday I was taken up. I know nothing of the spoons.
When I came into the shop there was a great quantity of people in the shop.
I have nothing to say.
I have nothing to say.
I am as innocent as the child unborn. I have been in Drury-lane Theatre eighteen years. I was never charged before with any misdemeanour.
On Monday night, going down the street, I met the prosecutor with a young woman. I asked him to give me something to drink. He said he was going farther down the street, and would as he came back. He met me as he came back with two other women; we took him into the Angel and Sun and he treated us with sixpenny-worth of liquor. We then asked him for a shilling to get something for supper? He said he had nothing but two-pence. I went about my business. About eleven o'clock, I went into the Angel and Sun, and the prosecutor was there at supper with three women. He charged the watch with me, and took me to the watch-house. He broke open the door and lay with me all night. He charged another woman with it, and she gave him eight shillings back.
He did upon my honour.
I was going along; I met a young woman. She asked me to pawn this coat for her. She said she would give me sixpence, and treat me with a pot of purl.
I have no witnesses. I lived with that gentlewoman seven months; I am sure I never took any thing out of the house.
It is hard to suffer for a thing I know nothing about. I am going of fourteen years of age.
He took up another girl instead of me, and swore at the justice's that she had got his watch and his two handkerchiefs; the girl came up for another hearing, he did not come up to appear against her so the girl was cleared; then he took me up I never set eyes on him.
I have nothing to say; I have no witnesses. I am but seventeen years of age.
I had been washing that day. I found a pot at a door, I did not know what I was going to do with it; I had rather more liquor than I should have had.
Did not you say if I would tell you of the other woman you would let me go?
It was this man or the master of the shop I cannot say which.
I have some witnesses to call.
I had a brother of the same name; I received an account of his death, my maiden name was Catherine Wallather ; there were plenty of men in the ship heard him acknowledge that I was his sister. The ship is not at home now.
I am very innocent of it.
I live at the other end of the town; I dress dolls .
I went to buy a bit of lawn; I bought it and paid for it. I was coming out of the shop; this man followed me. There were a dozen in the shop at the same time; there was a woman came out when I did. The man brought me back and accused me with having something belonging to the shop. His master asked if I had got any thing? He said he believed it was me. He asked me whether the woman at the door belonged to me? I said no, I knew nothing of her. Then the mistress asked me what family I had, and what I was? I told her. She said if I would tell her she would forgive me. I said I know nothing about it; I am a married woman and have two children, and am now big with child. I have been married twenty-two years and have three children.
My husband is a printer; I am turned of thirty.
I never took any thing. I had witnesses yesterday.
He was very drunk; he gave me these things to take care of; I was to give him them again in the morning. I had no money of his; I kept the buckles till he gave me something as a satisfaction for my trouble.
I picked up the pot at a door in Redcross-street, and was going to carry it home.
Though I took the sheet, I did not do it with intention to steal it, but to redeem it from pawn by getting some of my wages of my master; I was in great distress; there was some wages due to me.
I went into the shop with another person who was an old acquaintance of mine; she was going to buy some china for her mistress; she thought I was a better judge of it than herself, as I had been the mother of children: the young woman asked 7 s. for half a dozen cups and saucers; I said I thought it was too much: she said she would go home and tell her mistress the price. I asked to go backwards. I went into the parlour with this woman to write the direction; after I had wrote the note, I came out into the shop: we came out of the door: the person with me said she saw a gentleman pass that was a good friend of hers; she ran after him, and spoke to him; we ran together; I heard the cry of Stop thief! when this gentleman stopped me, he said, I believe you are the thief; I said, I do not know what you mean; if any thing is lost, pursue that young woman, as she has run away: then the gentleman let me go, and ran after the young woman; but whether he catched her or not I do not know. I put an advertisement in the paper, but could never find out the gentleman. I never knew her guilty of any thing of this sort before, if she is guilty now. I am above five months gone with child.
One Mary Collins told me she had some things in pawn; and, as she was going into the country, if I would take them out, I should have them: I went to enquire for them, and the pawnbroker stopped me; I know nothing of them; I did not pawn them.
I pawned the things for my mistress; I was sent with them by her.
The other person was gone to receive some money, and then I meant to redeem them.
This apron I pawned the 22d of December; she lent me this apron to fetch an halfpennyworth of sand; I was in distress, and pawned it; I meant to take it out again: I know nothing of the things that were lost out of the room; I never was in it.
I have nothing to say; I have no witnesses.
I bought the stockings of a man that sells them in the street.
I went to the prosecutor's house, they being civil and obliging people; I had been up all night; I asked to lie down; they sent for a constable, and gave charge of me: I know nothing of the affair.
I was coming by, and saw it lying on the pavement.
He said, the first time, I pushed him against the wall, he fell on one side, and I robbed him; the second time he said, as he came out of the door, I held him together by both his arms, and so robbed his Worship: I said I must have three hands to rob him when I had hold of both his arms.
I met the prosecutor in Holborn; he asked me to go and drink a glass of wine with him; I went with him to the French-horn; he went into a private room, and wanted a pint of claret; Sarah Keates said they had no claret in the house; he told me to have what I pleased, and we had a pint of red port; he asked me if I would let him be concerned with me; I said, yes, if he would make me a present: he said he had no cash; we drank the pint of wine. Is it probable that I should knock a man down, who declared he had no cash about him, and I saw no cash? There was a coachman he knew; he came out and told him he had been robbed by somebody of eight guineas, but he could not tell how; he said he picked up a girl, and went into the French-horn, at three in the morning, and gave her half a guinea to be connected with her; that he wanted her to tell him where one Miss Mee lived, as he chose to lie with her above any other woman. There is a man in court he told, that he had said to me, he would give me a guinea, if I would tell him where Miss Mee was.
Did I attack you, or you me?
I was searched, and there was nothing found upon me; I am innocent of it.
That money is my own property; I had it when I went into the house; I had been to see my nurse, to pay her, that afternoon, for nursing my child; she was not at home; I had it in my pocket-handkerchief; the man saw I had it. He gave me first a shilling, and then half a crown. I said I would not have any connection with him for all the world, for he had the evil in his neck; then he pushed me; I pushed him again; he said he had met with such bitches as me before, and abused me.
I have no defence to make, farther than that the prosecutrix offered to forgive me if I would say any thing about the things, and offered to make it up for money. I leave myself to the mercy of the court.
The other young woman asked me to go along with her to buy a yard of ribband; I went into this shop with her; the lady and she could not agree: when we came out, and had got a few yards, the lady called out she had been robbed; the young woman put these pieces of ribband into my hand; I did not know where she got them.
I lived with that woman about eleven weeks; I lived a very unhappy life; the man and she used frequently to quarrel, and fight, all hours of the night, not being married to the man, as they have both declared; she used to get up in the night, and pick his pocket, and it was laid to me. On Saturday, the next morning, I went out, and said nothing to them; going to my cousin's, in Bishopsgate-street, I met a young woman, that lives at the Seven Dials, who lent me a hat and cloak. They would swear my life away for a glass of gin.
I have nothing to say, but to beg for mercy.
The gentleman said I had some ribbon: I said I did not know that I had, but if I had, I would give it him.
She lent me the gown to pawn, to raise some money.
I know nothing of it This good woman, when I was going along, much in liquor, stepped out, and said I robbed her of her basket and potatoes. Seeing me in liquor, she wanted to make an advantage of me.
He speaks very true in what I told him.
I am very innocent of stealing the things. As I came through the yard, I saw them rolled together. I took them up, and put them under my arm. I never opened them till the watchman took me.
I never saw the man before he came down the lane with the constable, and took me up.
I was coming through the same street; a person asked me to carry this bundle; I went with it up this yard; a person stopped me, upon which the woman ran away, and I was taken to the Compter.
I am not sixteen till next Michaelmas. They drawed it out by main force: my master and mistress promised to forgive me: my mistress said she would make me suffer for it, if I did not tell her. I know nothing at all of it.
I am innocent of what I am charged with.
I was so drunk, I do not know how I came by the cloak.
I never saw the man till he came on Monday morning: they said I was one of the girls that robbed him.
I was passing by. The prosecutrix laid hold of me, and brought me into her parlour, and charged me with having stole the things. They lay upon the floor. I had never touched them.
I never had the cloak under my petticoats.
I have got nothing to say; but I went to Mr. Steward's, to buy a cushion for my hair. I gave Mrs. Steward half a guinea to change: while I was waiting, this man came in, and used me very ill: he put his hands up my petticoats, and pulled me about. I never saw the watch, till I saw it in the hands of the constable: his wife came in, and then he said, Now, you b - h, I will send you to prison.
I came up to the room. I had lost my cloak. The prosecutrix offered to lend me a cloak, to go after a place. I was not at the house afterwards for two or three days. I know nothing of it.
He did not take it from me, he took it off the floor.
Coming along St. George's fields, this gentleman overtook me: said he, I think I know something of you; where are you going? I said, over Westminster-bridge. He said he lodged in Westminster. He said, I have been having my supper, and had some pig; I should like you to have some. Said he, Did not you live at Maidstone? I said, No. I told him where I had lived. He said he knew me very well. He came with me. When I came over the bridge, I said, I wish you good-night. He said, Oh! I live a little farther. I said I did not know any thing of him. He still followed me home. When I came home, I went up stairs. He fell a-eating my victuals. I said, Instead of eating my victuals, I wish you would go about your business. He said he was tired: he pulled off his clothes, and flung them out of window; he hit me a slap on the face; and I went away much frightened. I never saw any of his clothes or money. I threw his clothes out of window, and told him, if I had strength, I would fling him out too. He said, Then I shall go about my business. The next day, he came to me, and said, Some old woman has brought the clothes; I don't know whether it is you or she. I will not tell lies; there was no woman in the room but me at that time.
The woman in black said she would swear my life away if she could.
On Saturday night, the watchman fetched me down. The prosecutor said I was not the girl. He and another man came into the court on Monday morning, and asked me for his watch. I said I knew nothing of it. The prosecutor made me very drunk, and said, if I would only say I sold it to Mrs. Mealing, he would clear me.
I never saw the gentleman till he laid hold of me in the Hay-market, and they said I was one of the women; that was after he called the watch. I went up the court, to see what he called about, and he said I was one of the women.
A girl bigger than myself ordered me to do it.
I am going on thirteen; my mother spins shoemaker's hemp, she lives in Church-yard Alley, Fetter-lane, and she has three children besides me.
To wind the hemp.
It was through the other girl that wanted the money.
In respect of being on the stairs on the Monday night, I never was near them in my life.
I have no witnesses in the world to the matter, as I was very innocent of the affair; if you please to call my landlord, Mr. Cole, a person I lodged with sixteen years ago.
I know nothing about the cloak, I never see the cloak before; I have no witnesses.
I had some witnesses, but they are gone, they did not think my trial would come on; I am not guilty of the crime; I did not take it; I am eighteen next October.
I leave it to your lordship's mercy, I never did such a thing before.
I was in liquor when I did it.
I offered to pawn the things with the pawnbroker for two days, and then to take them out again; I have nothing else to say, I was persuaded by a person to pawn them for a few guineas for two days, and then the person was to give me the money back again, and I told the pawnbroker I was to take them out again in a day or two; I have no witnesses to call to my character, I am a German.
At the time that I was accused of laying hold of this watch, of stealing it from his excellency, I could not tell it was him that spoke, at the time he said he had lost his watch, at the time he mentioned that, I was behind his excellency, and some persons I cannot tell who, laid hold of me, I was taken into custody, his excellency asked me for his watch, I told him I knew nothing of it, I desired he would take notice I made away with no property at all; I kept my hands upon his, I was taking a pinch of snuff just before, and some person took or knocked it out of my hand; White the chairman looked at me, and said, that is the man, I will swear it, I asked him what he would swear, and what man he took me for, he then said, you are the man that I saw take the watch from the lady's side; I imagine from his hearing Adams had picked it up, and gave it to a lady, he concluded, that was not the gentleman's but the lady's, and that he thought he had a right to swear any thing, as he might get an emolument to himself I suppose, that is all I know of it; on the 23d of January I was at Bow-street, White altered what he said upon the preceding evening, and he said then, that he saw me take the watch from the gentleman's pocket, on the Thursday I was had up to Bow-street for another hearing, his excellency did not attend; on Saturday the 26th, White, the chairman attended, he then swore he knew nothing of the matter, more than he saw the watch in my hand, which I believe to be the same he has given in at present; I hope you will take it into consideration, this man revising his testimony at the time I first asked him of it; Mr. Wright the sitting magistrate of Bow-street, asked if that was true, he then denied it, and Richard Mills confirmed it to be true, that he did say, he saw me take a watch from a lady's side, now he has not attended, I could not find where Mills lived, or I would have subpoenaed him, he is not here now, I was informed last night I should not be tried to-day.
Please your exellency, did Murphy the chairman accuse me of having robbed you of your watch, previous to your saying you had lost your watch?
I had three small children; I buried the eldest a month ago. My husband is gone away with another woman; I was informed he lodged up in this garret; I had got a little drop in my head; I went to see whether he was there or no; the door was wide open; I sat down upon a chair. I did not see any body as I went up; I heard somebody coming up stairs; I thought it was my husband; the bed stood up in the corner; I stood up close to the chimney, upon the bed, but I was not up the chimney.
I beg for mercy.
She sent me to pawn it.
I have nothing to say in my defence.
I have nothing to say particular in my defence.
I was going home to my three fatherless children; I saw a parcel of sugar on the threshold of a gentleman's door; I took it up, and went in to ask if a sugar-porter lived there; the gentleman told me no. I went to go out, but sat down to eat some: I took it to be broken victuals, and was very thankful for it: these two gentlemen came up, and used me very ill; they took my apron from my side, and made my nose bleed.
A young woman, who was a gathering in her pots, found these two pots among hers: she said they belonged to such a person, and asked me to take them; I put them into my pocket, and went to the gentleman's house.
This money they swear to, is my own, I have saved up at a shilling a time. When I met this gentleman first, he was with a black woman with a white gown and white coat on. What he had, was entirely unbuttoned. I was at a distance, against the rails. I went down towards Pall-Mall; I stood upon the stone of a door in Gloucester-court. He asked if there was any house he could go into; I said there was a house there. I knocked at No. 3, and went in. He said, My dear, I have no money; I have been with a black woman; my money is all gone. He pulled out his pocket, and said, I have got a snuff box, and a watch, and a pin valued at so much, and a pocket-book at so much, which he could not part with. I said, if he had no money, I would not go with him. I said, As you have no money, I do not chuse to give my carcase up to you for nothing; and I hope you will give me liberty to get some water, for I am dry. He said yes; but he would keep my cloak till I came back. What he offered to me, was what is not fit: he is a man neither fit for God nor the devil; he is neither fit for a black woman, nor a white woman. What he expressed to me, put a shock upon my spirits, and frightened me. I went to open the door. The maid said, Take this man with you. I said, No; I do not chuse to have any more to do with him. I ran out at the door: I heard no more of the gentleman till I went out; and then the constable took me; and said, I had robbed him of so much. It must be meer wickedness, because, when he took me into the house, he said, he had not any, and because I would not condescend to his will, he charges me with this. I did not come into close quarters; I was at arm's length from him.
I helped a child up that had fell down; I saw two quart pots; I took them up, and was carrying them to Mr. Dolly's, when he laid hold of me.
The gentleman left the watch with me till next day; he did not come. Being distressed, I was obliged to make away with it.
I thought to bring them home again as soon as my quarter was up; the Saturday following, I thought to bring them in again.
We went out together; we met a chairman, who offered to treat us; and we went back to the prosecutor's room; we had some hot, and she sent me with the spoons to pawn.
They sent me half-a-mile for the hot; and she made me take the key, and lock her and the man into the room together: when I came back, he gave me a shilling to go for another pot; and I locked them both in again; and when I came back, the door was broke open.
She sent me to pawn the spoons to get my cloak out, which I have on, because she wanted to borrow it, to go after some work in.
I went into the house to ask for one Mrs. Jones; that gentleman came out, and asked me who I wanted. I said, Mrs. Jones; and he shoved me up stairs, and said I had robbed him.
A young man had given it to me, who had got it for his sister, who promised to give me a gown of it; I went in, to buy the body-lining; I had it open in my hand; I work for a person, who makes tents for the camps.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
I leave my defence to my counsel.
Another young woman and I went into the shop, and bought a piece of lawn. I know nothing about the callico.
A Mrs. Jones asked me to fetch the buttons for her.
I saw the trunk in the street. I know nothing about it.
My mother had the handkerchief of one 'Squire Gates, in the country, and she gave it me.
He pulled me about in the street; I cried out, Watch! and gave charge of him. I lost my cloak.
I have nothing to say, nor any witnesses to call.
The petticoat and counterpane are my own.
I was very much in liquor: I know nothing of it.
As to the two quart pots, I know nothing of them: I never melted a pot in my life.
I did not know that I was so near my time, or I should not have gone to such a place; but I never intended to do the child any injury.
Coming along, the coat lay in the footway; I took it up, and put it into my apron, and went into a house in Wood-street; the gentleman came in, and said he had lost a coat, and I gave it him.
I was in company with the prosecutor, he desired me to sit and take care of him, I took the things out of his pocket, finding myself rather sleepy, for fear any body should take them; I made no secret of them at all: there were several people by.
I never took the boots, nor I never saw the man in my life; I was going along the Court, and there was a woman standing there, and just as I turned up these boots lay, some gentleman came up and said, what do you do with the boots; I would not have the assurance to do any such thing; I was ashamed of my situation, and let nobody know.
I leave myself to your mercy, and the mercy of God. I have not an hour to go, that I know of.
Please you, my Lord, I have a council to plead for me; I have not had time to send for any witnesses, they are in the country.
My Lord, I never saw the gentleman till he catched hold of me.
I know nothing about the man's watch: the constable is here, who can witness to my ill usage.
Before I met this man, my husband and I had a few words, I met the prosecutor, he followed me home, he asked me if I lived there, I said yes, I asked him to drink tea, he said he would call again, he came in the evening; I told him my husband and I had had a few words, and I agreed to live with him; he came the next day and he asked me to take a lodging, and I did not chuse it without he was present; we took an apartment of Mr. Manning, I found he could not support me with necessaries; he would not allow a support, he said he did expect to receive some money, but being rather short, I was welcome to pledge any thing; I pledged these things at Mr. Harrison's; he partook of the whole, the prosecutor came home and said he was short of money, and bid me take the watch and pawn it for two guineas, I thought it very hard to be destitute, and I would not give him the money I pledged it for; when he found I was gone, he took the opportunity of swearing against me here.
I was sitting in the public house, this man, and another woman, and a child came in; he said that is the woman that robbed me; he said, if you will give me 4 s. I will make it up, I said, I have not four farthings. He sent for some man that he calls his brother-in-law, that blacks shoes in Bow-street, the constable took me: I leave myself to the mercy of the court.
I went out on the Friday morning; I buy and sell old cloaths; I had a child not six weeks old; I left my door locked, and found it so; I counted 5 s. 6 d. and five farthings, to put on the chimney piece; the things were so full of vermin and bugs, it was impossible for any body to lay in them, they lay on the top of the drawers in the room, I went to bed; my landlady came up to ask me for some pots, and she took me up; here is a gentleman that she wanted to extort 12 s. of; I said, if she wanted to make a property of me, I would submit to be tried by the laws of my country.
Yes, my mistress promised she would not hurt me, and my aunt and another woman can tell the same.
She said she would hang me if she could.
My master said he would not hurt me.
I have nothing to say.
As I was standing at the corner of Hog-lane, this young man came to me, & asked me to take a glass of liquor, he asked me where I lived, and could he go home with me, I told him yes, he and I went home together, and he sent for some gin, he asked who the other was, he said, call her in, she said she did not care if she had a drop of gin, and went and fetched it, and after that he had two or three pots of beer, and he asked her to have something for supper, he and the young woman agreed to go to bed together, he asked me if it was any harm to me, I said no, I was as willing for her to go to bed with him, as not, and he asked me to quit the room, and I wished them a very good night, and I never saw him from that time, till the time I was taken a prisoner.
I bought the gown about six months ago of a woman, that might be a Jew woman, I gave eight shillings for it.
No, my Lord.
My master and mistress fell out and had very great words, and I really thought there would be murder, and they both fell a fighting, and I was rung up before I had been in bed a quarter of an hour, and then they sent for me up again, and there was my mistress all undressed and her mouth all bleeding, my master was in his shirt, and my mistress had the poker in her hand, and they had broke some glasses, and I went down stairs again, and I had not been in bed long, you know, madam, you was at the top of the stairs, and you said my master was gone to fetch a watchman, and I was so frightened I did not know what to do.
Please you my Lord, they did not go to bed till past three o'clock, and you know, madam, you came down and struck a light to take into the parlour; and as soon as the washerwoman came, I went my ways, you know the watchman came in, do not you remember you came down, and you asked me particular where the tinder box was? I have no witnesses.
I have been a person that has been very well brought up, and have been in a very good way of business, I have met with very great misfortunes, which has reduced me to do the thing I have done, which I do not deny; I was ashamed to beg; I did this wicked deed through the greatest distress, I have great friends to speak in my behalf that have known me from a child; and so I surrender myself to the mercy of the Court, and the Lord have mercy on my precious infant.
I never was near the shop, I was used very ill indeed by that boy coming from the Justice's; he used me very ill, and as for an apron, I had no such thing on; the boy said coming away, he would have a journey to London, he liked the ride. I have not a creature in the world to speak for me.
Sir, I was in great distress, I was a widow with two small children, I buried my husband out of her house.
I meant to return them again, she knows I have worked at several places; I have no friend in the world.
On Friday evening, this girl's mother sent for me to go of an errand, and she asked me to drink; she had an old gentleman a Scotchman with her, she said, this old man has got a watch, and she wished me to take it; on Saturday morning she sent for me again, and asked me to drink; and she told me I had better go and lay down on her bed, she thought I was a little in liquor; and in the afternoon I laid down, and about two I got up, and she was gone out, I asked where she was; I went to get me something to eat; and had two penny worth of pigs face, I went to a pawnbroker's, and took out a red cloak and apron; I came by Mr. Hall's door, and went in and had a pint of beer, the girl came home, and had something lapped up in her apron, she flung it into my lap, I was standing in the middle of the floor, when this gentleman came up stairs, and he found this tankard on the bed, I have nobody here, they were here last night.
I know no ill of her.
I went to buy a cloak and a petticoat with a gentlewoman, and we could not agree, and coming out I met the master, he advised us to go back, and we bought a bit of mode; I said it was damaged, he shewed me another piece, and he asked three shillings and nine-pence, I said it was too dear, he directly cut me off four yards, and I paid him twelve shillings; I asked him to cut it out for me, which he did, and I picked up a cloak, I did not know whether it was this cloak or not; I was above an hour gone, and I came back again, and if I had had any thing of the gentleman's
under my arm, I would not have come back, and the gentleman said to me, says he, I want to speak to you, I understand you have picked up a cloak.
I did not know but it was the same.
I met the man, and he had like to have stumbled up against me; says I, master, do not stumble over me; he said, where are you going, can I go with you, he went with me, and I went into the young woman's room, that was on the same floor with me, and he gave her sixpence to get a quartern of gin, I said, I am a misfortunate woman, what are you going to do says he, I do not want to do any thing; he stretched himself out backwards upon the bed; says he, I want to sleep with you all night, says I, I have let my bed out all night; says he, I will go with you, and pay for a bed; we came down stairs, there was some music, some organ, and a parcel of young girls, he went into the room among them, several of them come, and twisted their hands round him: Indeed, Sir, I have nobody in the world in London; my father and mother live in Tunbridge in Kent; so please God Almighty, that created me in the Kingdom of Heaven to bless you.
On Friday in the afternoon about five, I went into the shop for a halfpenny worth of packthread, I knew they sold it, I sell fruit and things in Covent-garden; the door was shut, I pushed the door, and it went back with force; I heard a noise, then I turned my head round, and I saw it was a whole heap of brushes, I was as far off them as I am to one of them candles, I should not have known what to have done with them if I had them; five weeks I have been in gaol. I have no witnesses.
I did pawn the things out of the room being much distressed, my husband obliged me to pawn them, he told me, that some of his friends had lent them him to make some money on.
I leave my defence to my Council.
The same day I was taken up, I went into her shop, for that gentlewoman, the prosecutrix said, you are another of the confederates.
The stockings were advertised twice, with the Paris mark on them, that was the reason of my asking the prosecutrix the question.
A woman gave me the things to sell, and after I was taken, I told them so, at the very first, and I told them where they were sold.
I do not know where she lives, her name is Eleanor Jones ; she came up to me, and sent for something to drink, and said she had some things to sell, and desired me to go and sell them; I have no witnesses.
I hope you will have compassion upon me, I have five small children.
I was going down to the parish to Bath, my husband is dead, he was a marine; I know nothing of the things, they took me in the street.
I was at work in George-street, and I happened to get in liquor, and coming thro' the Mews, the stable door was open, and I went in and fell asleep; and when I waked, it was dark, and I could not find my way out; I went down stairs in this house, and that gentleman came and catched me.
I was at the Spotted Dog, in Oxford Road, drinking.
I believe it might be very high seven o'clock, my master was here.
The people were here yesterday.
I have nothing at all to say, I never was in his company, he takes me for another person, I am often taken for her, and she for me, I know her very well and where she lives, I have no witnesses.
I have several people for me.
I was very ill and very much distressed; it was my intention to get them again.
Any thing.
Not in London.
Nobody here at all; the prosecutor had the money of me to redeem the sheets, and then he kept it for his expences.
He took the money, and said, let us see what I can do for you; and when he had got it, he said, I will keep it for my expences.
I lodged along with the old woman that lives up stairs, and the prosecutor's door was open, and I went in and saw the things were gone, and I went to look for the prosecutrix, to tell her, and they came and took me.
I put them in my pocket, I did not design to make them away; I hope you will have some pity upon me, as I am a strange girl; I have not a friend within two hundred miles.
I know nothing of the affair; I had been out with my goods that day, and coming home I got rather drunk, and I did not know what I was about; I came to the turnpike gate, and I asked the man to let me leave these baskets there; I knew nothing of the money being in my shoe; I was in liquor; I took several shillings that day, and sixpences too.
The prosecutor's wife gave me this watch to pledge: the pawnbroker I believe is here.
I subpoened him this morning.
When Mr. Biggs came home, he said they had done it very clever, and if they stuck to what they had done, they would get forty pounds, or a Tyburn ticket.
When you made it up with me, you told me you would not hurt me.
I took lodgings in the prosecutor's house at six shillings a week, and a man came to me and gave me these things to pawn, I did not know they were Mr. Kenny's, I came down to pay my rent, and the ticket fell from my pocket, and Mrs. Kenny picked it up, she came to my room, and asked me if I had not pawned some of that pattern, I told her I did, and more, and if the things belonged to her I was willing to give her the duplicates, accordingly the boy went with me, I had fourteen shillings and sixpence in my pocket, I redeemed those things upon promise that they would not hurt me, I had them from a young man in the street.
His name he told me was George Coffee .
A very slight acquaintance.
I do not know indeed.
Yes.
I was going along up the new road going to Limehouse, and I met two men, they had this bundle at their back, and they gave me this bundle and I went with it, I did not know it was stolen, I was in liquor the two men were to meet me after I had sold the things.
I know nothing about it, I never saw the man till they took me up to the house.
No, my Lord.
I put the clothes on the Saturday that they took me up, I was a little in liquor.
I belong to a place called Howe, in Kent.
I was a little in liquor, and so I went to bed there, I have nobody to give any account here, I sent for no friends.
Did not you say you had been robbed by two boys?
Whether she did not treat me with a glass of peppermint?
Ask her, if she did not ask me to go to Bow fair.
On the Whitsun-Saturday, at holiday time, I sat almost facing Jewin-street, and where this woman said she was robbed, was at Mr. Sansome's the bottom of the city road, of a piece of gown; she took hold of a boy, and desired to have her property, directly a man came up, I followed with my lobsters, I had nothing to do with it; she asked me to go into the baker's, and to go with her to Bow fair to sell these things for her, I said, no; and she directly called a man, by the name of
Smith, and she gave him a thing that the people play with.
I deal in Rosemary-lane, and have done so these fourteen years, and I bought these things of a man in the open fair; as I bought them and had no more money to turn my hand upon, I pawned them.
As I was going along home, and turning down this alley, he caught hold of me, and asked me if I would drink any thing; I refused; he gave me four or five penny worth of halfpence.
I never touched the handkerchief nor apron, nor took them out of the place; my husband keeps another woman in Ratcliff-highway, and I went after him, and he advised these people to take me up, and to put me into the Tower gaol.
I have not a friend in the world, nor I have not had a bit of any thing but a bit of dry bread.
The man took me and sent for a constable, and then he picked up this piece of dimity, and told the Justice, that he went to the further end of the shop on purpose to give me an opportunity of taking it; he said, you have robbed me, but shall never rob me any more; here I am as innocent as the baby unborn.
I worked for the prosecutor at half a crown a week, and he could not pay me; his wife gave me the things to pawn, and lent me the gown to go and see my sister at Deptford.
When he came to me at Newgate, he said, it I would not confess he would hang me.
I lodged in this house; the door was open of the prosecutors, and the drawers, and I took the things up for safety; I saw the landlord coming home, and I put the things in my lap, and delivered them to him, and he said, if I would not confess he would hang me, and if I would but confess, he would make a slaw in the indictment; and I hope, gentleman, as I have nobody but God and myself, that you will have mercy upon me.
As I was going down Red-Lion-street, the prosecutor followed me, he was very much in liquor, I had been drinking myself; I told him where I lived, and asked him to go and see me home; he wanted to lay me down in the passage, and I would not, I said to him, if you will go up stairs with me I will do any thing that decency will allow of; and in pulling me about the money sell out of his pocket.
I know nothing of it.
It was my own property, it was in my pocket before ever I came into that gentleman's shop, it was given to me when I came into London to make me an apron, my brother gave it me, I have a cap of the same.
A fortnight before, my brother is gone to Guernsey.
I know nothing about it.
I never was in the house in my life; I stepped into the passage to tie my garter up, I had one foot on the stairs and a woman gave it me in an apron; the woman was a slender acquaintance.
My Lord, this gentleman went home with another girl, and going home, the man that this girl lived with knocked her down, and I did speak to the gentleman, and asked him to let me look what it was o'clock; and she tried to snatch the watch out of my hand and run away; and I asked the prosecutor to go and see after her, and in turning back I met the officer, and he stopped me, he asked me if I had the man's watch, and I said, I had, and I took it out of my pocket and gave it to the prosecutor.
I pawned the gown to get shoes; I have not a friend in the world.
he did not want any thing; I asked him to drink a glass of wine or any thing; a woman that lived in the house came up, and said his wife had been out all day, and had brought him bite or sup.
This gentleman came to me on Saturday night, between twelve and one, and he asked me to drink a glass of wine; I refused it several times, he was rather in liquor, he called for a pint of wine; we went, and he said it was rather too late to stay; he came down stairs and kissed me, and wished me a very good night; he told me to meet him the next night; I went there, and he came the next night, and said I had robbed him; and he took me up; they searched me; I had no money about me.
I never touched the watch at all, nor I never owned it; my witnesses were here all day yesterday.
He swore before the Justice that he believed it was two men that came in to steal?
I have nothing to say.
I had been out of an errand, and coming into the house I picked up the bundle, just entering the door; I opened it; I did not know whose it was, and being in great distress I carried them to the pawnbroker's.
A woman was shewing me the hat who wanted to sell it.
The young man knows I was not nigh the place he is mentioning at all.
I went into the gentleman's shop to buy a bit of lawn; this gentleman was going to serve me; there was a gentleman out of doors; he came in and said, what have you got under your cloak; says I, nothing at all; and before the Justice, another gentleman swore he took it from under my arm, and this gentleman swore I dropped it; I am innocent; and this young gentleman said, I have lost thirteen yards and a half of cotton, and you shall suffer for it all.
I found the things.
I wish Mr. Gray would give me the character I deserve?
I went to help Mr. Bampstead in his distress, as me and my husband worked for him.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
I leave it to my counsel.
I have nothing to say in my own defence; I rely on the mercy of the Court and Jury.
Nobody knows any thing of my situation.
I leave it to my counsel.
I never saw it; the gentleman brought it out of me, and said he suspected me some nights before; and he said before the Justice, he would bring several people to witness that he took it from me; I leave it to the Court; I am innocent.
Being an unfortunate girl, I was away from my mother; so about four or five I went up to my mother's room to see if she would take me in; as I went up I met a man in a brown coat and a round hat, and brown apron round him; and he asked me to take them to a pawnbroker's; as I was going up Queen-street when the watchman stopped; he saw the watchman before I did, and he run away; I told the watchman it was nothing belonging to him; he said let me see what it is, and he took me to the watch-house.
She said, if I had ten necks she would hang me.
I was very much in liquor when I met these children; we had a pint of purl; it was very cold; I asked the children if they would have a drop of purl; I knew them, and my parents lived close by them.
I was coming home last Sunday was a week; I had been to an acquaintance of my mother's; there was another girl about three yards distance from me; she had this man's child in her arms; the man saw a girl run away, and the child began to cry out; I went up to the child, and asked where the child lived; the next day the prosecutor came to me and said, the girl that took my child had a striped bed-gown on; I had never another gown but this.
The latter end of last October, I picked up a duplicate of a watch, and I shewed it to a great many people in the neighbourhood that I do not know, and they persuaded me to have it raffled for; others persuaded me to sell it out and out; I could not do either, because I did not know the pawn-broker. A person informed me of the pawn-broker; I enquired if it was their duplicate, and they told me it was; I spoke to several people to raffle for the watch; two or three people that work for me, persuaded me to sell the watch out and out, and Rourke said he wanted to buy a watch; he went with me to buy it; my husband has been here all day.
What charge did the prosecutrix give?
I was going up Long Lane, and there was a mob; the prosecutrix was very much in liquor, and tore every body she came near, and said she had lost her cloak, and she would take me up for it.
I went in to buy a bason, and the young man shoved me against the counter.
I am not guilty; my father sent to him, and offered him two guineas in part, when he heard of my being in prison; he said he would not take it, but he would take four; and if I would put it into a place, he would come into Court, and tell them it was mislaid.
I lived with that woman three months; I never took away her money, nor robbed her of any thing; and I went away of a Friday, and they came to me and said I had robbed them.
I was sent for a penny-worth of nails; I went to this shop, and they charged me three half-pence; there were two women in the shop when I went in; they went out while I was there; as I was going out I saw the parcel lay; I never touched it.
I beg for mercy; I have nobody to my character; I leave myself entirely to Sir John's mercy and the gentlemen of the Jury.
I intended to redeem them again.
It was for the lottery.
I am innocent of the affair; after I had fetched some raspberry and gin, she gave me six-pence for a pot of half and half; when I returned, she was crying upon the stairs, and said she was robbed; I went and looked after the young woman till Monday night; when I returned, they stopped me.
I was with this person, Mary Ann Pree , otherwise Mary Ann Field , otherwise Mary Ann Teabo ; she goes by three names; she gave me the cloak to pledge; I came to Mrs. Gilham's; this Mrs. Pree, otherwise Field, otherwise Teabo, asked me for something to drink; I said I would have some beer; she chose gin; my child went to sleep; she advised me to go up stairs and lay the child on the bed; the child slept a considerable time; she asked me when the child was abed, to oblige her so far as to carry this cloak to pledge for her, being in her room; I knew nothing of it; I took it to pledge for one shilling; this was in the evening; two people came in, and sat and drank; my husband came to me, and asked me to come home; as soon as the child awoke, I went home along with him; the next morning I met Mrs. Pree, she said, the cloak was too good for her wear, and begged of me to sell it; she told me to get as much as I could; I went there and spoke to the gentlewoman herself; I said half a guinea more; she said, only seven shillings more; I took the seven shillings there, and brought it to her; she stood at the end of Monmouth-street for me; she gave me a couple of shillings; I went a little further and spent some little time; I went again and enquired for this Mrs. Field; I met her; she told me the cloak was not her own; I was terribly frightened, and begged to go home; the next thing she did, they sent a person belonging to the Justice and two women, to know if I knew any thing of the cloak; I was so frightened, I did not know what to do; when I was at the Justice's, and found my infant was going to be torn out of my arms and I sent to prison, I told Mrs. Gillham, on her promising; and afterwards I was committed to this place.
I was coming along, and I met Mrs. Lewis, and we saw this man drinking with several girls, and he followed us and asked us to drink, and we drank, and the watchman drank; then he wanted to go home with me; he told me he had no money to give me, but I should not want for tea, or coffee, or Hollands; I said, I could not take him home; then he said, I robbed him of a purse, with half a guinea and ten shillings in it; Mrs. Lewis is my witness, likewise the two watchmen are here.
I was going to my day's washing, I live in little Drury-lane, at No. 16, I met the prosecutor the corner of the street, says he I want you; says I, in sup, what will you give me? says he, I will give you a drop of something that is good; says I, no, not without a trifle of money, that will be of no use to my children.
I am not guilty; as I was coming out of the shop, with my landlady, a woman came in by the side of me and catched them off, and dropped them down by the side of me in the street.
I do not know that I have a minute to go.
I took them for good; I thought they were good; I went to buy some shirts for my little boy; I cannot swear positively to them.
On the 2d of March I was going up to Westminster, to pay a Mrs. Cordy eight shillings; I deal in Rag Fair, and I met a man I deal with, and bought those things of him; I gave him twenty-five shillings for them; I was going to the fair that very same day.
That man said if I would give him a guinea, he would let me go; I have sent for my witnesses to give me a character.
I never saw the spoons; I asked for a morsel of bread.
The prosecutrix gave me the liberty of pledging any thing that I would, provided I would leave it there when I went away; I suppose in the two houses that she has in St. Andrew's-street, there is not one that has got a pair of sheets; she keeps a pawn-broker's shop herself, and takes in the things herself; the things were pledged to pay her the rent.
Yes, I did indeed, Sir.
I had been at Billingsgate that day, and bargained for three baskets of fish; I came away, and left them; coming over Tower-hill, I picked up this bundle, and this bit of iron in it; coming along Blue-anchor-yard, I met Mr. Mayne; he swears it was two; it was half after four when he took me; he said, Bett, this is forty pounds for me.
A woman asked me to pawn the shirts; I am innocent.
Two people lodged in the same room besides myself; I was a servant fifteen years; I never committed a theft before.
I know nothing relating this matter all, they take me for a different person I am quite sure.
I was very much in liquor when I did it.
I am quite innocent; I had nothing about me, but my own property.
I did not take any thing except the eighteen-pence which he gave him; three of them wanted to lay with me whether I would or not.
Both Mr. Dawson and Mr. Mayne gave me a deal of liquor, and persuaded me to say what I did: as to the house, it is a very disorderly one, people going out all hours.
My mistress and I could not agree: I was not a hired servant; and my young master told me to take as many things as I could, and he would come to me; and he gave me half a crown that evening, before I went away, and paid me three visits afterwards.
Mrs. Brass and I took the room as a two-penny lodging; though necessity I pawned the blankets for eight-pence that I owed; and could not, through necessity, raise the money to get them out.
My Lord, in the ship, in which I went away, after the disturbances arose, I was the only woman that was left on board; I loosed the Captain and the Surgeon from their irons: the Captain disposed of me to Mrs. Ann Redwick , in Spanish town, Jamaica, next door to the Governor's; I served her six years, two years of which I was lame, occasioned by a bite I received in my leg, which was three times condemned to be out off, and I was not capable to serve my mistress: A young lady, Miss Gwyan, came to her house for a week, and she took me to Ireland; we entered on board the Snow, captain Wreckham, of Liverpool, but unfortunately for me, as soon as we came there, she died: I was then left friendless, without a farthing of money in the world; unknown to any body; the captain was kind enough, when we came to Liverpool, to say, he would pay my passage to London, which he did, in order that I might get a cure: I came to London, and sought for my cure, and I partly obtained it; and I have no friend in the world but God and you gentlemen, and I beg for mercy.
No, Gentlemen, I have not a friend alive now.
I am an unfortunate woman. This man met me as I was going home; he gave me these things to take care of.
I leave it to my counsel.
About two, of the Sunday afternoon, as nigh as I can guess, I went to this woman's house; I sell fruit; I bought a bushel of apples on the Monday; she owed me a shilling; I went for it; this gentleman came in and enquired for one Mr. Jones; she said he had left the neighbourhood upwards of a twelvemonth; he asked her to have something to drink, and gave her twopence; and while she was gone, the gentleman gave me six-pence; I hope, my lord, you will excuse my speaking indecent; I said it was too little; I returned it to him; he drank part of the liquor, and went away; he came back, and said he had lost his watch; the woman sent to me, and I came; and he did not know me then; he went a fetched a constable; the gentleman that came, said he was so much in liquor, he should take nobody into custody on his evidence; he let me go; and in about three weeks, or better, I went to the office, and saw this gentleman there; he said I was the person: here is a gentleman that will speak, who went and fetched the constable.
This man, Paterson, that hath sworn against me, often came up to my mother's apartments to get me to wash his shirt, and got me to pawn a many things, but never brought me into this hobble before.
I would wish you to examine Paterson over again, when he gave me these things.
As I was going along tired and hungry, looking for my husband, who left me ten weeks ago, being tired and hungry much, I could not get on, and one of these men came up and asked me what I sat there for; I told him; he told me he would give me some victuals, and he came back to take me to his own house, and put an handkerchief round my neck to hang me; and he did his best to get the better of me; and he said, if I would not let him do it, he would put me into a tub of water and drown me, and so I bawled out, and he gave me these things into my apron; and those people ran after me.
I had been very ill, and when I got well I went to work for Mrs. Ibbetson, and she did not pay me very well, and so I could not pay my debts; she owes me 20 s. now; I meant to take the things out of pawn, and replace them, as Mrs. Ibbetson had paid me.
I was going home in the evening, and called to know if my mistress had any thing for me to do, and I found them the next morning in my little girl's pocket, and I was going to take them home.
She bid me look after the child, and said I might take the child out as usual; many a time have I got a bit of bread, and brought it home to the child.
I am sixty-three.
I do not know what to say.
I leave it to my counsel.
I am innocent.
The other girl and a man took my cap away, and gave me this cap and ribbon and pocket, instead, I put it on, I did not know whose it was.
I did it through distress, my husband was very bad in the hospital, he is dead since I was here; I have no witnesses but myself and God.
Did not you tell me, you was not sure I was the woman?
On Sunday morning I met this man in Cow-cross, in the open street; he tapped me on the shoulder, I turned about, and he said, that he believed he had been in liquor, and had been with me the over night, and he had missed his watch and some money, and that he believed it was me. I told him he was mistaken, I was not the person, and this brought a mob about us; and with that he was frightened, and walked off. He asked me to go a little way with him, and I did; and he said, if I could hear any thing of his watch he would give me half a guinea, and would make me a present for his money. He met me again at seven o'clock, and I told him I had heard nothing of it.
It is my own petticoat, the constable knows I took him to where my gown and coat were made, and the constable knows that the person at home said, that they had made a gown and coat for me, but that her mother was gone to Brightheinnstone; the constable knows they belong to me. My Lord, I have a very good defence; the prosecutrix and I lived in a place together, and I told my mistress I would not live in one house with her; I said she was not a natural woman, and I would not sleep in one bed with her; and so it is through spite that my prosecutrix has taken me up, and brought me here.
I know nothing of it; I never confessed I took it.
It is my own sheet, I bought it of a woman that goes about the street, selling shirts, sheets, and any thing; I had bought it about three weeks.
I was going by the door at the very same time, a young fellow was standing at the door, and he asked me to take the bundle for him to Oxford-road, and he told me he would pay me for my trouble; I turned up Newman-street, and his young man here followed me, and asked me for the bundle, and I gave it him, and the servant maid when I came back asked me where the young man was? I told her I did not know; she asked me if I knew him, I told her I did not.
I pledged these things myself, and the prosecutor promised me, upon his oath, he would not trouble me in the least if I would own to it, and after I had owned to it he told me he would not hurt an hair on my head.
I have no witness but myself.
Did you bring these things to the justice?
You did not, you only brought a shovel and poker.
I know nothing at all about it.
I was going down the Hay-market a little after twelve o'clock, and the prosecutor asked me if I would go home with him, and we went and had some gin at two different places; he then asked me what he should give me; I told him two shillings: he pulled two six-pences out of his waistcoat pocket, and I told him I would not accept of that: he said he had no more silver about him, and asked me if I would trust to his honour; I told him I would not; he said he had gold about him, and said he would leave his watch with me, and would go back to the house where we had the first liquor, and get change, and give me the two shillings; I went along with him, and afterwards he asked me for his watch, and because I would not give it him without the two shillings, after some words, he gave the watchman charge.
I never saw this man till he came about six o'clock in the morning, when he and four Irishmen came and jumpt into the window, and took and dragged me out of bed naked, and dragged me to the watch-house all naked, and they searched me, and found only one six-pence in my pocket, and that was all.
I would be glad if Mr. Stapleton would restore the things which he hath of mine, before I make my defence; he hath got a feather pillow, a pail, a tumbler, and a wine glass.
I never pawned the sheets at all.
I never offered to pledge it; and because I would not take three shillings for it, she sent for a constable. And the way I came by the shirt, a young man met me, and asked me if I would go with him; and he had no money, but he said he would make me a present of that shirt.
I know nothing about it.
I beg the mercy of the Court.
I am not guilty; I never was in the pawnbroker's house in my life; I found the duplicate; I cannot read; and I gave it my landlord to read it.
Did not he swear at first it was three guineas?
The witness insisted at the justice's that I went to bed with him, which I certainly did; and did not you say, first, that you had lost three guineas and fourteen shillings?
I insisted upon my box, and they put the buckle in; I know nothing about it. (Deposed to.)
I was going up Holborn exactly at four o'clock in the morning, and the prosecutor came by and asked me if I could get him a lodging; I told him I did not know where to get one, but he had better go to the French-horn; and he said he would not go there, it was so dear; and he took me to this house, because it was cheaper; and he paid a shilling for himself, and I asked him to make me a compliment; he said he would afterwards; I went to bed with him, and was about half an hour on the bed with him; and then I asked him again if he would make me a compliment; he said he would not; then I went down stairs, and told the gentleman down stairs I would not stay, because the man would not make me a compliment; he came down too, and said he had lost his coat; he went up stairs again; he came down again, and said he had found his coat; he went up stairs again, and said I had robbed him of his money; I was searched, and there was nothing found upon me but twopence halfpenny and my box of duplicates; and when I complained for want of my tobacco-box at the justice's, then Mr. Walker took that knee-buckle in his hand, and asked me if I knew that; I told him I did not; it was put into the box, but I know nothing about it.
I leave it to my counsel.
About half an hour after three the woman who had these handkerchiefs, asked me 2 s. 3 d. a piece, I bid her 2 s. she followed me to the Rosemary Branch; I bought them, I was obliged to make a pledge to buy them. When I was in the shop the gentleman shewed me only two pieces of handkerchiefs, and two pieces he took back again.
I never saw the gentleman till that morning, he said I will not hurt you.
I never saw the man before he came into my room with the patrol, he took me half undressed.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Jury.
My mother gave the things to me; she lives in Green-street, Enfield; I have nothing to say but I am innocent. I have no witnesses.
Did not you say that there were two men in the house of whom you had a strong suspicion?
I have no witnesses, I happened to go to Hoxton, and called in and had a pint of beer; I found the bundle with these things in the privy.
I never told him any such thing.
I have nothing to say, and no witnesses.
I had three or four glasses of liquor, the woman who was in the shop wanted me to take the lawn. I do not know what I did. I have three small children.
On Sunday evening as I was coming up Hedge-lane, with tobacco in my hand, this gentleman was calling out watch, and said he had lost his watch. The constable's nephew found the watch. The man put his hand into my bosom, and seized me, he said I was the person who robbed him.
The house is an open house for every body to come in, loose men and loose women; the things were gone while I went of an errand.
I lived at Sir Charles Asgill 's only a month, and made the shirts, and my mother; I was distressed for lodging, and came to Sir Charles's; I made the three shirts in the country; I brought them to Sir Charles Asgill 's house.
The girl gave me the things, and after I came out she was gone.
I never was in the place, nor ever saw the things in my life.
I cleaned the room out with a flannel, and under the bureau I took out this note with the flannel, and I put it into my pocket; I cannot read or write, nor I did not know, it was a Bank-note, and so I did not know in consequence that it was different from other paper; I never heard it inquired for till my master called me up from my work, and then shut the door; I was quite thunderstruck to see the gentleman and the constable in the parlour; when my master asked me about a 50 l. note, a 50 l. note, Sir! replied I; directly it struck me it must be that that I had put in my pocket; on that, I spoke to Mr. Sadgrove; he looked at me, and nodded at my master, and they both followed me out into the passage; and I told them I did not keep it with an intent to steal it; and therefore I put my hand into my pocket, and asked them if that was the note; says I, please to look at it.
Seven months.
I frequently had a pint of beer in the evening at this door; I had had a pint, and had got the pint pot in my hand, and the boy took up three, and ran and called to his master, and said I had taken the pots, and the master ran after me.
I am not guilty.
I beg for mercy, my Lord, and of every gentleman that is here; for I am really innocent.
I don't know the property.
The woman told me, when she stopped me that day, that the door was not locked.
I was coming past, and the woman met me, and gave me these things; I did not know they were stolen; the witness said, she did not lock the door; whether it was, or was not so, I cannot tell; I never was up in the room; the things were given me by a woman that lives in the neighbourhood, and did live there some time back; I am as innocent as a child unborn; I know nothing but that they were given me; my witnesses have been here all day, but they are all gone home; they are working people; I am a very honest woman, and I work very hard.
I was very much distressed when I came to London, and I went to Mr. Addison's to help her to wash, and she lent me the shirts to pawn; and because I did not get them out against the time, she did this from spite: I was very poor; my husband had but six shillings a week.
The sheet belonged to myself; there is no mark upon it.
I have nothing at all to say.
Please you, my lord. This gentleman asked me to take him home; I did; and when he got there he said he did not like to go up stairs, because he was a married man, and was known in the neighbourhood; he was very much in liquor; and he gave me three shillings and sixpence, to have connections with me in the passage; when I went to go out I kicked something; I stooped to pick it up, and what should it be but a watch; that is all that I know about it.
I leave it to my counsel.
I was coming down Holborn, and going home, the man caught me and took me under a gateway; I told him I did not like that; he asked me to drink a glass with him; I, being an unfortunate girl, I went with; then he called a watchman, and said I had robbed him; I had five shillings in my pocket; he sent this paper to me.
I cannot tell who brought it.
The prosecutor left me the watch till he called next day.
Do you think if I stole them, that I should have the impudence to wear them; she lent them to me.
The man I lived with was out of work, and if he had been in work, he would have redeemed them.
I found it in the dust tub.
My lord, he walked with his breeches down, in a very indecent posture.
Did not you say as soon as you had unloaded your cart, you would come to my lodgings and sleep?
He went out and he was not long before he came back, and said he had found it, and was sorry for the trouble he had given me, and that if he could get change for half-a-guinea, he would give me half-a-crown for the trouble he had given me.
I was there a charing; and the gentlewoman went out of town, and my husband was in great distress, and he went with me, and made me pledge these things; and he had the money.
A man asked me to pledge them, and gave me a shilling; he told me to put the duplicates into my pocket.
I have witnesses to my character; I have worked hard ever since I left the ship
I parted with those things not with any design to wrong my master or mistress. Some of the duplicates were found on the ground, and so was the pocket-book.
My husband was long upon me; I have had a lying-in, and I have lost the use of my hand, and I did this because I was urged by the greatest distress: I have lived with Mrs Hungerford four years and an half, and there is a great difference between us now.
I own I took the shirt and neck-cloth through distress: I meant to redeem them; he owes me more than the things were worth.
I leave it to my Counsel.
I know nothing of it.
I found this watch on the 18th, in the state it is now, and I desired Perkins to pawn it.
I leave it to my counsel.
Mrs. James, did not you lend me the handkerchief to pawn it yourself?
I pawned it for nine pence, and did not go back with the money, but staid and spent it; and on the next morning I found myself in the watch-house, and then she charged me with stealing a gown.
I am a poor girl; I have lost all the use of my limbs on one side; my business is to stop at the shop door to bring in customers; I took this man to the Ship alehouse, and he did not deal, and when he came out he bought a waistcoat, and the people were jostling him about, and I went to him to double it up and to advise him to take care of it; no, says he; you b - h, I will put it in my bag; and presently he cries out, where is the woman; that woman, says he, you b - h, you have robbed me; they took every thing off me and left me as naked as I came from my mother, to search me, and found nothing; now, gentlemen, guilty or not guilty use, your own pleasure.
My lord about half after one o'clock this gentleman took me from one public house to another to drink with him; we drank five or six pints of cider, and three glasses of gin, and he left me this watch chain and his handkerchief; coming along this place he fell down; the porters were going to Covent-garden market, and the money sell out of his pocket, and I picked up the gold; he had not a farthingworth of silver about him; it was my own silver; I have no witness.
He asked me if I would go with him? I said, no, I was going to my work; and he said if I did not go with him he would go and fetch a constable, and say that I had robbed him.
As I was coming along the common I saw the linen laying on the ground, and I picked it up, they were hanging out to dry.
The things were given me by another person, and when the pawnbroker stopped me I begged him to go out of the door to see the other person; he said, no, he had got me in custody, and that was enough for him.
Why should he think that I took the muslin any more than the other women that were there.
I have dealt with him this seven years off and on.
Why should he think I should take it any more than the other two women that were in the shop?
I went to this gentleman's shop, I have dealt there about seven years off and on, my husband is ordered out to sea; I am a weaveress by trade; I have got three children, and a young woman that lived next door to me asked me to make her an apron; work being short I went to this shop, and asked for a bit of muslin; so he took down the muslin, here, says he, here is the muslin; and he says to that young man cut her off a quarter of a yard, for which I paid nine-pence, I went then to the other counter, and left two women at the muslin counter; I was coming out, and there were three women in the shop; just coming out there is a horse like standing where there are prints on it; I looks at the prints, and I says, there is a young woman that lives next door to me that wants a piece of cotton at a shilling a week; I was just going out of the shop, and Mr. Jubb came up to me, and said, come back, you have got some muslin; the two women went out of the shop, and they left me there, and they sent for an officer, and charged the officer with me; Mr. Jubb kept the muslin; he has got now also the quarter of a yard that I paid for; I have dealt with the shop for many years, and they always took notice of my children; I have got three of them now; I have those that would give me the best of characters but they did not know of my trial coming on so soon.
Can you swear to me?
It was the other young woman.
Did you see me take the buckles out?
Between eleven and twelve o'clock I was walking up Holborn, and another young woman with me, I met this gentleman and a tall thin young lad, and I spoke to the young lad that was with the gentleman, and the other young woman spoke to that gentleman; says she to me, shall we all go home to your room? no, says I, my landlady don't like it. O, says she, she will be in bed. We went to my room, and the gentleman gave me six pence to get something to drink; he did not chuse me, he liked the other young woman best; so I asked him for a trifle more; he gave half a crown and a shilling to get some rum, and I went down stairs, and left the other young woman with him; the other young man went off before we were at the top of the stairs, and said to me let me change hats with him, he is quite in liquor, he will not know it. I suppose this man robbed him, I know he was nothing better that a pickpocket, I suppose he robbed him, and then wanted to get rid of him.
I never spoke to the man first, he wanted me to go and drink a glass of wine, but I refused him. It was my husband's money that I had about me; he gave me five guineas; I had got a loin of lamb roasting and my husband was not come home to his time, and I was going to the Horns, in Whitechapel for him, and this gentleman met me, and would detain me, and pulled me about, and wanted me to be concerned with him in the street; At last he took and unbuttoned his breeches entirely, to lay with me by main force in the street; at last he said, when he found he could not have his revenge of me, that I had picked his pocket of four guineas.
Did you ever see me in the shop, or did you ever see me touch a shoe belonging to you?
Ask that gentleman when he came to me in the middle of the street, and when he said stop that woman, he and another naked man with him, whether he saw me have the shoes?
I was coming down the street by the butchers market, Oxford-road, this man and another little naked shoemaker, followed me, and said, stop that woman; and they stopped me, and I said what have I done? they said, you have stole them shoes; I said I had not a farthing in my pocket; says he, you are a liar; says he, you put them shoes down; says I, I have not, I know nothing about them; says he, where do you live? I told him. Then he took me to that gentleman's house, and when that gentleman came in they took me to Marlborough-street, and there they kept me. I never saw them shoes if it was the last word I was to speak.
Her own daughter, of fourteen, took the money out of her pocket; as for the other shift I am innocent of. She is not a married woman, her name is Ann Coleman . - I am lawfully married, that is easily proved.
He has false swore what he has said, this young man has taken up another girl and has had two hearings. - I took the other girl up first to tell where this girl was, because I supposed that she went down and told this girl which pocket the money was in.
This girl said that she thought I was the person; on that I was taken up the last Sunday night, when I came up on Wednesday before the justice, they asked the woman whether I was the person? she said she never saw me in her life time, she took her oath so to the justice; he knows nothing of me no more than what he goes by hearing; I never saw the man in my life time till I saw him last Monday. I am a misfortunate woman.
I and another girl was coming across the Park, we met this gentleman, and he asked us to go and have a pot or two of beer; we went and partook of two pots of beer, and when we came back again it was about half past nine; we were drinking along with three soldiers, we sat down and drank with him a little, and we all came out together, and going along the Park he pulled the watch out of his pocket, for the soldier to see what it was o'clock, and when we came down to the Serpentine River he told the other girl he would give her and I a shilling a piece, and he put down his watch, and I took it up, and took it to one of the Gravel Pits.
I have no witness; I never took the shirts. I was going down the street to the doctress, to a woman that cures diseases, and coming up the street I met a Mrs. Jones, and she gave me these frocks, and I walked on slow, and this woman came and said, I stole them.
I leave it all to my counsel.
They were stockings that I picked up at the door.
This is entirely done through a little malice that passed about a month ago between the prosecutor and me; I sell fruit in Covent-garden market , and the prosecutor came and asked the price of some fruit; I said, it is to dear for Irish people, it is only fit for English people, and so she went and took an oath that I struck her. It is entirely through spite that she has brought me here; I had no money to send for any friends, or else I could have got them here to speak in my behalf, where I have lodged for five years.
This young man is a particular acquaintance of mine ever since he has been in town, and he was in my company every opportunity he had, he came to me at the Star and Crown, where I was charing, very much intoxicated in liquor, and he asked me to let him go and lie down before he went to the recruit house; I said to my mistress, let me take him home and I will come back again directly; says she, don't stop, and you may go; when I got to the room he insisted on my going on the bed with him, and I did; we got up again, and he sat by me, and in come these two recruits, his two comrades, he fretted about something, one of his comrades said it was about a young woman that he had left at Coventry; he fell into a fit, and it was as much as ever his two comrades could do to hold him; he came out of that and fell into another fit afterwards, and he came to himself again, and went into another; he was in three fits before he was sensible; then his comrades desired me to let him lie down, and he asked himself to lay down, and I throwed the bed quilt over him to cover him; they said if he would lay down they would fetch him when his name would he called over, which would be at nine o'clock; they went with me to the Star and Crown, and they promised me faithfully they would go for him, but they did not; before I could get home he came to me to the public house, and charged me with the robbery. I never saw his money; the constable of the night searched me, I had five shillings in my pocket, and some few halfpence, that was all the money I had; and if I had five shillings in silver I had received seven of my mistress to go and buy some shoes, and the lent me the money before hand; this young man took his oath at the police office that I was the woman that robbed him; after he took his oath to that he wanted to go back again to the office, says he, I will go back to get the justice to let you go clear, if you will own that you have had my money, and give me some of it back again, then says he, I will let you go; Sally, says he, try and make the money up to me, and if you will but get your friends to return it to me I will not hurt a hair of your head; and more than that he was with me whenever he liked, and more times than I can mention,
I am not guilty of what is accused to me; I was going along about my business, and there was a person almost pushed me down into the kennel, and dropped this property at my heels; I never saw this property in my life; I know nothing of it, I don't know what it is. I had two witnesses here this three days for my character.
Mr. Timlock I never quitted your lodgings, remember, I told you I was going to lodge where I had lodged five years, you said very well.
I did not pawn the sheets.
Did I give you up the two keys of the door out of my pocket?
When I went to Mr. Timlock's to lodge first, there was a servant maid that lived with my son, she was out of place, and she came and asked me if she could lay with me one night, and I left her in the room, as I went out to work, I had an apron, handkerchief and caps, which she took and pawned, and left me the duplicates in the room, and I kept it secret to myself, I thought I should turn myself round. I went to a gentleman's house to work, and as I was coming at dinner time from the shop they took me up; I had the key of Mr. Timlock's door in my pocket. This was Friday, in order to give up the room up on Saturday. I had a villain of a husband who stripped me and children, who have distressed me very much; I have not lived out of the neighbourhood for this twenty years, and all the pawnbrokers know for these five years I have brought five guineas worth of things to pawn of my own. I had winesses every day, and yesterday they came and told me that no bill was found against me.
I had nothing about me at all.
I cannot say any thing at all about it; they never saw me take them, I have no friends.
I was up in this court, and he came up to me, and said, will you have a glass my girl? and he went to haul me about, and I would not be hauled about by him.
I told them I had eleven shillings all but two pence, in my pocket. This gentleman as I was coming across Buckingham-court met me; and as he met me I heard a noise of some woman, in this said court; with that I went down, and this man, the prosecutor, catched hold of me, and in catching hold of me, I said, what do you want? says he, will you have a glass of any thing? and I said, yes, if you please, then with that he gave me a penny, after he gave me this penny he wanted to be very bad with me indeed, and I would not consent to it, and after that he asked me how far I was going? I told him I was going into the Strand, to pay some money away; as I came out he said he would give me an unlucky blow, that he would make me call the watchman to him, I called the watchman and the patrole, and the watchman came out of his box directly; says I, I will give you something if you will not let this man meddle with me, and after that then the watchman he came out, and behaved very civil indeed, and after that this man charged me for a robbery, I knowed myself very innocent; the watchman said you must go up to the watch-house; I said I will go up with you. I had been working for a person that keeps a chandler's shop in Westminster, one Mr. Burrows, and his wife paid me five shillings for washing, that very day.
I was very much distressed, and one and another snapped on me and I
was going away, but I own it is the gentleman's blanket.
I was coming down below Harrow on the Hill ; I met this gipsy, I had a little lame horse, and they asked me whether I would chop this little lame horse for this ass? and I did; as I was coming along the high road the next day, there was a gentleman met me, and asked me whether I would fell this property? and he left me a card where to bring it. I never was in London before, they took me up at such a nonplus, and my husband being in the militia, that I don't know where to send to him. I have six small babies.
I was fast asleep in my bed when the gentlemen came up, I never got out of my bed, I am as innocent as a child unborn.
I never took the money, she took the money out of a drawer and put it in my hand to carry to some of her friends in the country.
Ask her whether I by any means was engaged or hired by her as a servant?
I did not engage myself as an hired servant with that lady; she gave me two shillings, and told me to keep myself disengaged till Thursday week,(this was on the Thursday she engaged me before,) I have always gone out to dress dinners or ball suppers for going on of three years. I went to this lady's house about three o'clock in the afternoon, one of the young ladies told me I was not wanted then, I was to come and call again at night. When I called in the evening they were very busy, there were two servants going away, and they were searching their boxes for property that they had lost in the kitchen; that servant that was witness against me, she was in the house about half an hour before, one of the ladies asked me if I would go up and make Mrs. Boileau's bed? I went up and helped to make the bed; I came down stairs, and I was told to cut some cold beef for supper and send it up; I then asked the boy if they were going to have company in the morning?
he said, I said what does Madam Boileau want with me, if she was not going to have company? I said I was not going to light the fire, nor clean the door, it was what I had not been used to, nor what I would not do (she gave me the two shillings when she engaged me the week before) I said that was what I never had to do in any family whatever I was in, and I should not do it; in the course of the evening the other servant asked me where I had a lodging, that she might come and lodge with me, because she said she could not think of stopping in such a family (it was this servant that is now witness against me) I told her then I should not stop, and she might come if she liked. She said she should come in a day or two, as the house was so abominable dirty she would not be in it, she then asked me to take part of her property with me, and she would bring the remainder at night; I took that bundle that she gave me into my hand with me, which was a gown, petticoat, and black cloak, I then unbundled it, and took the gown off the outside, and there were two pair of sheets, a table cloth, a counterpane, and two pair of glass salts in the bundle; I then took them into my own room with me, and laid them down on my own trunk in the room, I then went out and left them, I came home in the afternoon, about night; I never went out any more till the Monday morning following, when I went to Mr. Bates's office, Oxford-road. I had been accustomed to advertise at different times, in different papers, I have constantly done it for these two years. When I went to Mr. Bates's office, then the clerk at Mr. Bates's told me I must stop,then he told me that there was a robbery committed, that by my features and person, it was me that had done it; he detained me, and sent for the constable, and I was taken up; there were several duplicates in that bundle, that I had of that witness, but not of my pledging by any means, I never pledged any of the things at all.
I never saw the man, and there was no woman with me, my husband then laid a dying, and he has been dead since I was in goal; there was no woman with me.
That young woman, as I passed by the place, she asked me in, and kept me from half past six, till half past nine; and she asked me to take them things with me; she gave them me herself, and I left my basket there; the girl made me leave the basket, she would not let me take it away; I was to come on the morrow and meet her, and give her what the things fetched.
When we three women came into London, this woman said that she wanted to be passed home, and she wanted to know where she might go to my Lord Mayor to be passed home, I told her I was a pensioner in such a parish, I had eighteen-pence a week allowed me for a child, and it was a casualty parish, that they did pass people to their own parishes, and we went into this public house, because the committee did not sit that day, and the other woman and me prepared to get a lodging, and I asked this woman to stay there till we came back? but she would not; the left her bundles and went with us; the other woman when we were out, said, she would go to her father's, and I said, I would go to my sister-in-law's, No. 5, Lilly-street, Saffron-hill, when we could not get lodgings I persuaded her to go with me, whether I went to my sister's or whatever lodgings I got, and this here woman parted with us, and the other went with me to my sister-in-law's and she staid there a little while, and she went to the Borough and she took me to the Borough with her, and she told me she was going to her father's, but this was not her father's, and she left me, and afterwards came to me and told me that these things were her own, and she said she would come and live along me, but she would go first to see whether her
father would take her in or not, and she left these things in my lodgings.
This here gentleman owes me a bit of spite, and I know nothing about it, I am a distressed young woman; I lived servant with Mr. Wood, an intimate friend of Mr. Scarlet's, and he would not pay me my wages, and I commenced an action against him, by my so doing, the said Mr. Wood hath prevailed on Mr. Scarlet to bring this prosecution against me, I am quite innocent of the crime laid to my charge; Mr. Scarlet and Mrs. Holliday, both said at the Justice's, that they did not believe that I stole the watch; Mrs. Holliday is also quite under the influence of Mr. Scarlet, and hath been ruled by him; I am totally distressed, I hope you will not see me lost, without inspecting into my cafe.
My sister and I went to this place, to buy a couple of muslin gowns, to the first thing that she bargained for, was a bit of muslin, and a bit of callico to make a petticoat, and she told me when she got change that she would buy them, and pay for them; on that account when I see her paying for the gowns, I took them up and put them into my pocket.
When you asked me for marriage, I had lived with you eight months before, and did we not live together then in lodgings at Hoxton?
We had a coach to go to the Commons to take out the licence, and he gave me a ten pound note, and he had said before to me, that when he had some money come to him, without you will be my wife I will never live with you. Another day he bought me a pair of silver sugar tongs, a silver punch ladel, seven china bowls, two large ones, which we had one for our marriage bowl. When he urged me to marriage, I told him I was married; then he said that was nothing, for if I was cast for death, I was dead in law and to all; and when I asked him what name I must be married in? he said, I must be married in my maiden name. I never lived with my first husband but eight months; there he is, he knows what I say is truth.
She agreed to make it up with the officer for two shillings.
I borrowed the cloak of Mrs. Nash.
Mr. Norwood said he would be contented to have his property again. I did not mean to leave my lodgings till I had replaced the things.
Mr. Norwood said if he had his things he should be satisfied.
Mr. Norwood knows that I did not mean to leave the lodgings, and his wife told me that she would be thoroughly satisfied if the things were replaced, that was all that she required, and Mr. Norwood would have made it up in the public house, but he was told it was too late.
I have known this man some time, ask him if he did not strike a light and light me down stairs himself.
I have known this man some time, and I used to cohabit with him, and he used to come backward and forward to my lodgings, and he wanted me to come and live entirely with him. I met him one day in Whitechapel, and he desired I would call on him, and this day I had been at Whitechapel-road and I called on him, and he asked if it was me? and I said, it was Mrs. Peelthorpe. He said he was very glad I come as he wanted some gin; I went for some for him, and he desired I would come and lay down in the bed; I told him I could not stay; I fat with him and then went about my business; he said if I would come back again he would light a fire, and he got up and struck a light to light a fire, and lighted me down stairs, and told me to go over to the public house to get something and he would come over to me.
I am a dealer in Rag Fair , I have dealt in Rag Fair for seven years past; these here things I bought about four o'clock in the afternoon, and I was in a great hurry to get home after I bought them, having three children at home, and when I came home, a gentleman's servant in Red Lyon-street, brought me a few things to buy, and I had not money enough to buy them till I pledged these things; I bought these things in Rag Fair, in a lump, and gave nine shillings and two-pence for them, the woman wanted nine shillings and six-pence; I told her I could not give that to get a shilling by them; she said if I would give nine shillings and a quartern of gin I should have them; I told her I would give her nine shillings and two-pence, and I would give no more, and I gave her that for them.
On Sunday before she went out, I went and borrowed a flat iron of her, she lent me two instead of one; I asked her if she could lend me eighteen-pence, she said no, she had no money, but if I liked it, I might take the shift to pawn for eighteen-pence.
Did you ever see me in your life?
I was going along, and I saw a porter carrying a bed and bedstead on a knot, and a parcel of things in his hands, and he was likely to fall down, and he desired me to carry these things for him, and he would satisfy me for my trouble.
She told me at Marlborough-street if I would give her the things again she would forgive me; she is nothing but a girl of the town, has never done a stroke of upholstery for this twelve months.
I borrowed this woman's things to go as far as Hounslow in; there were three more beds in the room besides the bed where I slept in.
Of Ann Edwards.
My friends are all in the country, and I only came to London quite big with child.
I was at Westminster, No. 21, Charles-street, when he lost his property; at Mr. Jacques's. I went to receive my week's wages, and I was there about nine o'clock at night, at Mr. Jacques's, that I can take my oath of, and coming home I felt something under my feet and did not know what it was, and went back and picked it up, and it was this gown; (I never saw the man in my life, nor know where he lives) and I went and pawned it on Monday, for half a crown, and I never saw the man nor he never saw me before in his life; I don't know where his apartments are.
The shawl was put about the gown.
I offered him two guineas to make it up at the justice's, and he would not take it.
I was very much distressed, or else I should not have done it; I never left my lodging, I only begged for the next morning, and I would replace every thing; I paid a week's rent, and six-pence off the other; I owed her but a fortnight, I never meant to leave my lodgings till I had put every thing in its place, and if she had only granted the favour till the next morning I should have put every thing in its place, but she was very much enraged against me, and ordered the door to be locked and bolted, least I should get out of the place, which I never wished to leave the place till I had replaced the things.
The gentleman speaks very much out of the way, he gave me the sixpence I returned him.
My husband is at sea, and I took in a woman to lodge with me, and she gave me one sixpence to go and buy some butcher's meat, and the butcher objected to the sixpence; and I went to this shop and offered him a shilling, and he gave me the sixpence that I offered to change again; they searched my box and found nothing in my box; if I had known the money was in my place, I should not have sent the gentleman to my place.
I have nothing to say, I have two small children, and I beg for mercy; I was rather in liquor.
My friends were with the prosecutor yesterday, and he promised faithfully he would not appear against me; therefore I have none of my friends ready. It is but five weeks since I buried my husband, and he has left me with two children. A young woman was out of place, and asked me to go with her to buy a shawl, and we drank a little two much, and when I drink a little spirits I have a very bad head, and how those shawls came into my pocket I really don't know.
I know no more of the blanket than a child unborn; she came to me this morning, and wanted half a guinea of me in the gaol.
I know no more of the property than a child unborn; nor she never see me there, nor I never opened my lips to her from the time I was born to the time I was taken.
I have got a young child six months old, and a husband and two brothers at sea.
I went on the last Tuesday in November, to take Mr. Pressy's lodgings, and I left it on the 2d of December last; I was but one week in it, and I never went to the house after that but once, and that was when I went to demand my things that were there, and to pay them my week's rent. As to that blanket I pledged it the 5th of last August for to pay earnest for lodging; and the bolster and pillow were in pledge a twelve month, and I fetched them out, and being short of money, I pledged them again the latter end of September, or beginning of October, I cannot tell which. There is never one of the articles that Mrs. Pressy ever saw with her eyes till she see them after I was taken.
As to the rug, I have had it four years; the sheet I don't know how many years; and the duplicates I found in Clare-market; and I never went to see after any of the goods, my husband said they were nothing to us.
I did not take it, it was the two boys that took it, and I was taking it from them, and they ran into the shop, and told them that I was taking of it.
These things that were pledged, were not pledged by me, though not without my knowledge; there was a week's rent due, and I told her I was only going away for a couple of days, and meant to go back, and take the things back again. On the Saturday following she took me in Rathbone-place; she knocked me about the street, telling every body I had robbed her; when she took me to Bow-street, she said, if I would pay her a fortnight's rent, she would do nothing with me. On the Thursday following Mr. Connolly said, if I would release the things and pay the rent for the time I was absent, he would not prosecute me; I could not do it, I sent to my sister to do it, and she was willing to release the things, but not to pay the rent.
Mistress took me into the room and promised me if I would tell every thing she would forgive me.
I was very much in liquor, and had half a quartern of gin, and I never see the pot till I see it at Guildhall.
A carpenter.
Did you charge any body with stealing this before me?
I lodged two years and better at the house, and I am sure I never wronged them of a penny; I have two small children, and it is my first ofsence.
The prosecutrix asked me if I had half a guinea at that present time, and she would not say any thing about it, but if not she would do the utmost of her power against me.
I was coming through Widegate-alley, and I had got a joint of meat in my apron, and a man came and laid hold of me, and then some gentleman that is here, came and brought something out. I know nothing about it, I am as innocent as a child that is just born; I never was guilty of any such thing in my life.
I picked up the handkerchief about five yards from the door.
My sister's child was very ill, and I sat up with it, and staid till day-light, and coming down Oxford-road I met with these two young men; there were more young women along with me, and that young man catched hold of my hand, and asked me to drink with him, and I went down the stable yard, and he put sixpence into my hand? and I said, what is that for, and he said, you know what for, and then he put another sixpence into my hand, and began g-be very indecent with me, and I began to call the watch, and the watchman was coming, and he said, da-n the watch, I don't care for the watchman not a farthing; and I gave him back, two sixpences and a farthing, and he said, O, stop, you have got two guineas of mine. And I am sure it is a very indecent action, the constable of the night searched me start naked. The prosecutor says he was sober, and I am sure he could not be sober pulling the womens patticoats up all along the street.
I have it to my counsel. I went to a house in the Church yard, which I thought was Mr. William's, I knocked at the parlour door; nobody answered. Mrs. Moore came in, and the servant came down stairs, and came after me, and she asked we what I wanted? I told her I had been to ask for one Mr. Williams; she said come back with me. I went with her; she went up stairs, I stopped while she went, and stopped with Mrs. Moore; she says I went down the kitchen stairs; but I did not, I stopped all the time by her.
This man says that I accosted him, he spoke to me first; I could not ask him home, because I was locked out myself; and another thing, I had no place to take him home.
I had been as far as St. Luke's Church, to see a brother that works at Mr. Whitbread's; I was obliged to stay out very late, and I went and walked up and down the street, and this man met me and asked me to go home with him; this man followed me, and another man, a very tall genteel man met me, and said, how do you do? and they both followed me up to the door; my prosecutor began abusing the other, and the other began abusing him, and the tall one asked me what my name was? I said Elizabeth Hambleton ; and there was a soldier came by, and all went fighting; and I ran up Church-court, and down St. Martin's-square, and then I walked by the Mews, and went up to Church-court again, then when I went to Church-court again, the clothes laid between our door and the butcher's and I picked them up and went down the Strand, and I asked the watchman, just by Lancashire-court, if he had seen a man without a coat? I went all up the street and down again, and when I came down again almost to Church-court, there were a great many people, and two men met me just at the coffee house, and told me to give them the man's clothes; it was two men dressed in black, and they were in the mob, and I stood by, and my prosecutor stood in the middle of the patrols and men, and were like quarrelling and fighting, and then he came to me and said, here is the woman; and I was taken to the watch-house.
Ask him whether he did not give it me to pawn for five shillings, because he had no money?
I met this gentleman Friday morning, he had no money, and he slept till between six and seven o'clock; he gave me the watch to go and pledge to pay myself, and get some coals; I was to have four shillings; and his coat was all over mud, and he wanted it dried by the fire before he went out.
The shawl that I am accused with I bought at the end of New-street, I gave five shillings and sixpence for it.
I have nobody, I have been confined.
I was there of days, but I was not there of nights; I went at seven o'clock in the morning, and staid till eleven o'clock at night; one night it rained and thundered very hard, and I had nothing to come home with, and she lent me the old hat, another night she was leaning on two chairs, and had two or three glasses full of rum, I then asked her to lend me an iron to iron a cap? I took the iron and pawned it for sixpence, being very much distressed; them two neck handkerchiefs she lent me to tie over my head, the night it thundered and lightened.
I was drinking with my brother, and the smoaking tobacco overcame me, and I took the pot and went down the cellar to get a little water.
I leave it to my counsel.
My lord, I had but two sixpences about me, I offered her a sixpence for the meat, with that she had three in her hand, and she put mine among the three, and she took that into the maid, and the maid said it is a bad sixpence; I looked at it, and I said that is not mine, and so I came out, and the child followed me, and another boy, and the boy struck me; there was another man by, who see it, but I did not know where to find him.
Every body in the house might go into that room.(For the prisoner.)
He knows very well that I had been up and down in the house, and made use of the waste paper to light the fire with, and this was amongst the waste paper.
I wish him to be asked for the money that he gave me, and then took away from me again.
He was in liquor, and he gave me the money out of his waistcoat pocket, and said he would sleep all night with me.
On Sunday night I had two acquaintances come to tea and supper; and at ten o'clock my acquaintances were going home; this cloak was on the stairs, I said, I know who it belongs to; I thought they had company, and I did not open the door, but hung it over a washing-tub, at the top of the stairs; being in a hurry, on Monday morning, I thought nothing about the cloak, and when Mr. Atkinson and the officer came it surprised me; and I did not think of the cloak, I had forgot it.(The prisoner called three witnesses, who gave her a good character).
I am entirely innocent; I would be much obliged to my counsel to ask where she saw me last, and drank with me last.
He came into my room, and said, he had been robbed of a guinea and a half by another woman; he asked me to let him stay all night, and he would let me pawn his things; he gave me one half-guinea, and said, it would be no object in the morning.
I have been driven to the greatest distress; I have begged in the street for bread for my children; I was five months in place; I have no friend here, but God and the Jury.
I had two pints from the prosecutor that day, that I did not wish my husband to know; I saw the prosecutor afterwards, and told him I had them.
The prosecutor offered me a guinea if I would inform him how many pots had been stolen before.
I am not prepared for trial, and must beg for three or four days more; I have the certificate of my marriage with Lee coming from Dublin.
I went to enquire of this gentlewoman for one Mrs. Rigge; she said I was a thief, and looked among her things, and she struck me several times, and to be sure I abused her, and she sent for a constable.
I never had it, nor never saw it.
This is not the counterpane that I pawned with this gentleman; there was a petticoat with it, the same as the gown I have got on, I sold it to him out of pawn; that is not the counterpane at all.
As I was coming through Smithfield, I met with another woman, that told me my husband would be at home in a fortnight or three weeks; we had no money, and she went and brought these stays, and pawned them; she left the duplicate upon the table, and I took it up; I went to enquire for Mr. Dawson, and this good woman came and asked me what I wanted; she took me up stairs, and used me very ill. I know nothing about the stays any more than the child unborn. I found the keys as I was coming from Chelmsford to London.
I am quite innocent of the charge; I have never varied in keeping my books regularly; my master owes me 3l. wages, and 8s. or 9s. in my weekly book; I have been in prison fourteen weeks; he took my cloak out of my box, and said I had taken it out of his shop; the property is my own, and he cannot swear to it; I always had charge of that girl; I have come home on a Sunday, and the shopman, and all have threatened me; it is a piece of spite, they told me they would pick a hole in my skirt; I had the care of all of them, and that made them pick a hole in my skirt, because I would not let them have things of my master's; and I used to tell them my master was a very miserly man; that cloak belongs to Mrs. Wilkinson, it is not his.(The prisoner called one witness who gave her a good character).
When I took these lodgings, Mrs. Graham left these things in the room; she does not live in the house, she comes to collect her rents on a Sunday morning. Last Sunday week I left the things in the room, and when I came back the bed was gone; was I to die the next moment I know no more of the bed, bolster, nor looking-glass than you do.
I don't know any thing about them, I did not take them.
I was very sorry I had taken the cloak, and was very willing to make it good.
I have two poor fatherless children; I have nobody to trust to but God and you.
My husband brought these things to me, and I have never seen him since; I have been here ever since the sessions before last, and had nothing but what the gentlemen of the jail pleased to give me and my babe, I have no friend in the world.
There was another man and woman in bed in the same room; I never saw the money nor a halfpenny; he gave me the watch because he had nothing else; he was very much intoxicated with liquor.
I was only committed for stealing one handkerchief, which I did not steal; I picked it up going up stairs; I did not see her then, and I went home to my own lodging; and when I came to the house again she asked me for it, and I gave it her; and she said no more about it for a great while.
I was at Covent-garden from two o'clock till six, and I never saw the man in my life; I am innocent of what he accuses me of.
As sober as I am now.
This man desired me to sit between him and another woman, and then he asked me if I would have a glass of gin, and I said, I did not care, if he would give it me, and we went into the parlour, and had two quarterns of gin, and we went away to another public-house, to get change, and then we came to the Blach-horse, there he had some rum, and he wanted to quarrel with an acquaintance of mine that was in my company, I never saw the note in all my life.
I never saw the man before in my life; I have two fatherless children to maintain, I picked up the duplicate in Shoreditch.
Mrs. Cole desired me to pledge this gown for her for half-a-guinea; she said, her landlord had threatened to seize her drawers for rent; I did not go till between three and four o'clock in the afternoon; I told Mr. Drury it was for a woman to pay her rent; I told him my own name as well as her's; he would not lend me but eight shillings upon it.
What I did I am very sorry for, I did not do it with intent to defraud; I sent the money and the interest to the pawnbroker, and he would not accept it, and I am ready to pay it now.
I never saw the boy in my days; I know nothing at all of the property; the property that I had with me was my own.
I went into Mr. Gongh's to pawn this apron, I never saw the coat, I never was before a Justice in my life before; I have four small children, one lying dead of the small-pox; here is a letter that I received from that woman, Mary Mason ; I sold my bed for a guinea for her, because she said she would not come against me; I had the best people in the Minories to come in my behalf, but they came and told me, last night, they would not come against me;
I had not money to keep on with to pay my little bills, and my young mistress used to give me these things to pay the bills with.
It is the first time I ever did any thing amiss in my life; I was very much in liquor.
My husband drives a dust-cart, he found it amongst some rubbish and dirt, and I pledged it.
I was at Winkworth's buildings, City-road, at the time that he says I was with him.
I found the stockings in the back kitchen; I put them in my pocket to give the gentleman, and forgot it.
That is my husband's name.
It was mere distress that drove me to pledge them; I did not intend to leave my lodgings, and I should have got them out again on the Saturday night.
I met this man and another woman, and they asked me to drink with them, and I took a glass of liquor with them, and wished them good night, and then he came and charged me with taking his money; I went with him very readily; I had no money at all about me.
She desired me to pledge it for sixpence; she had not got sixpence in the world; the other things I never had.
The prosecutor gave them to me among the halfpence.
I pawned Mrs. Holt's gown to pay for some coals, which she had ordered to air the house, and for a servant to clean it; I did not bid the person burn the duplicate.
I was so much in liquor, that I did not know what I was doing.
My father is in the hospital, and I went to sleep with my sister; she had only had the house one week; I sold oysters at the door; and as I was washing the oysters at the door, this gentleman took me; I know no more of the things than the baby that is within me.
I was very much in liquor, and did not know what I did.
I was a little in liquor, I went in to buy something, and another woman came in after me, and he said, he could not serve two at once; and then the prosecutor's wife said, there was a mouse in my bosom; upon that, this other woman ran away, and the prosecutor went out after her; when he came back again, he brought a constable, and took me into custody; I do not know any thing of the property being upon the ground.
I had some meat and some plumbs when the gentleman laid hold of me; the gentleman said, that as the shawls were stained, I must have had them, for the stain of the meat had come through my apron on to the shawls as I stood at the counter.
My mistress promised to forgive me if I gave up the things.
Two doors before I came to the prosecutor's house, I saw a dog with something in his mouth, I heard it chink, and I took it from him.
I did it from necessity and want.
I was coming through the Borough, and saw the child crying; I asked it where its mammy was, and it pointed strait on, I led it over London-bridge, till I got to Spital-square, and I put the petticoats round its shoulders to keep it warm.
I was rather in liquor, and a boy gave me these pots.
Her mother brought me these things to pawn; and I carried her a plate of sheep's liver fried, and a quartern of gin.
I went as servant to Mrs. Smith; when the landlady asked her what capacity she was in, she said, she saw company; and my mistress and I quarrelled that night, and I have never seen her since; I know nothing of the things being gone.
I met with two women, who asked me if I knew of an overseer; I told them I did not, I should be glad to get something if I could myself; and I went with them into this place, and was ashamed to ask, and so I turned out again; I do not know any thing of the calico.
She keeps a bawdy-house on Saltpetre-bank; a young man came in and asked me to get something to drink, and I put the bonnet on; the handkerchief was my own, I had left it with her for sixpence.
About twelve o'clock I met with that man, and he asked me to have something to drink; he said he had no money, and he gave me his handkerchief and his hat for making use of me.
I was very much in liquor, a young fellow gave it me to pawn for him, and as I was going to pawn it for him, this young man came up and took it from me.
I was not at the pawnbroker's at all, I was not out till half past seven o'clock, and then I only went out for a bundle of wood.
The cloak was lent to me; I was in distress, and pledged it. I expected my husband home in a few days, and I intended to replace it again.
I saw none of his money, except half-a-crown that he gave me to sleep with me.
Mrs. Hart gave them to me, she was very much intoxicated, and I told her, I would take them home for her the next morning; I know nothing of where they came from, any more than the child unborn.
I was in Dyot-street between one and two o'clock, talking with two young woman, and he began to pull the girls about, and they ran away, and then he said I had robbed him of five guineas and a watch; the watchman told me if I would give him two guineas he would make it up.
I live with the prosecutor's son; the old man turned me out of the house last Friday night, and I could not get a lodging, we did not agree at all.
I have sat at the corner of Bedlam three and twenty years, I never was before a Justice in my life till now; the girl told me she was a nursery-maid, and her mistress had given her that, and she wanted to sell it; she asked me two shillings for it, I had but a groat in the world, I gave her that, and she was to come in the evening for the rest, but I never saw her afterwards, till the gentleman came with her; I told him directly that I had got it, I pledged the apron to give her the rest of the money.
My Lord, I have lived three-and-twenty years on one spot, in getting my living; I never was before a Magistrate in my life before; this girl came by, and asked me if I would buy some rags, and in the rags which she gave me to look at, there were three or four caps; I told her it was a pity to sell the caps for rags, and she gave them to me. The next day, she brought me two little caps, and I gave her four-pence for them. I never knew where she lived till the day they took me to prison. I have got four children.
That pen-case my mistress gave me, and the other things I had to wash, but had not had time.
On the Friday the Jew came to me, and asked me if I had any old metals; I told him I had not; then he said, had not I got some bad halfpence; I said, yes, the worse luck; then he said, he had a friend in Whitechapel that for the value of half-a-guinea would let me have goods, and take them at the full value, and the next day, when the officers came, I never spoke to him at all; I had been very ill all night, and I was waked by the officers searching a poor woman that was a servant of mine.
I do not know any thing about the halfpence, I did not put them there.
I went into the shop to buy a piece of cloth for a shift for my child, and a piece of print; I put down a seven-shilling piece, and he gave me the change; I came out to the door to look at a shilling, and he said, I had got something more than belonged to me; I told him, I had not, he was welcome to search me; it was the space of a yard within the door; the young man then picked up a piece of print several yards inside the shop, and he brought it and laid it down at my left hand, and said, he had done it on purpose; he said, I was up to her.
My husband has been dead three years; I had some things in pledge that Mrs. Moses wanted to buy, and she let me have these things to get them out with, to see whether she would like them or not, and I went to see a sister of mine for a day or two, and as I was coming out of Thomas's-street, a man met me and took me to the Compter.
I met the prosecutor about a quarter past eleven o'clock at night, in Oxford-buildings; he offered me 3s. to stay with me all night; I said that was too little, and he pulled my cloaths off my back, and treated me very ill, if it had not been for assistance, he would have choaked me; he put his hand in his pocket, and missed his watch, and then charged me with it; I never saw his watch or money; I have a witness here to prove that he had been with other women before.
I am a widow, left with one child; I hope the pawnbroker will shew me a little partiality.
It was quite a wet evening, and I had had a little beer too much; if I took it at all, it was by mistake, I do not know that I did; my husband is in the guards in Ireland, and I have three small children.
Mrs. Bell gave them me to pawn, and I did not think any harm of it.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
I had been three days and three nights, without breaking my fast, and could not get any thing to do.
It was none of Mr. Jones's property; I was very much frightened, for the officer used me very ill, and said he would take me and my, daughter; it belonged to a young man that was pressed, and gone to sea; I told him I had two tickets, but I did not tell him they were Mr. Jones's property, for it never was.
I went to Mr. Boyd's shop for some thickset, it was a dark night; I was going out at the door and stepped over something, I stooped and picked it up, I had it in my apron when Mr. Boyd stopped me; I did not know that I had any business to stop, and I went out again, and they fetched me back.
I went in to ask for a lodging. and the prosecutrix was not at home; I told her I was very tired; she said she saw that I got my bread by washing, by my hands being white, just come from the tub; she told me she could get me a great deal of work if I lived that way, and she gave me that gown to wash; I have four children.
She was a person that I conceived was a sincere friend to me, as I was to her; she told me that if I wanted any thing in the world, any thing in her room was at my service; and she lent me several things herself to pledge. I intended to get them out after Christmas.
I never saw the young woman in my life, till I saw her at Bow-street; I get my bread by hard work; I never was brought up to fortune-telling in my life; I go a harvesting, hay-making, and hopping in the summer, and in winter, in making mats, and carrying them about, with\\ to\\ asting-forks and meat-stands.
I was rather in liquor.
I picked the purse up just by the play-house, and when he said he had lost it, I gave it him directly.
I pawned it on my mistress's account.
I know nothing about it; I pulled all my things off, and she could find nothing; she said she had lost a great many things, and she would make me pay for all; and then she went into the one pair of stairs room, where two women were in bed, and she brought the sheet out from behind the door.
On Monday night, in the Christmas week, I met with Mr. Perry in Smithfield, and went with him and had some purl; and then he took me up into this room, and asked me to oblige him with my company for a quarter of an hour, and he would give me half-a-crown; he said he had no money, and desired me to call the next day; and he said I was come too soon, he had no money, and he gave me the things to pledge; it was not that young man, but the elderly man.
I met with the prosecutor, he wanted me to take him home with me, but he said he had got no money; he then told me to go up that dark passage, and he gave me the watch till the morning; and after I had obliged him he wanted the watch back, and laid hold of the chain to pull it forcibly from me, and that was the way the chain broke.
I had the cloth from that woman to sell, and she paid her landlord part of the rent out of the money, and bought herself a pair of shoes with it.
She was committed to Clerkenwell with me.
That woman sent for me down stairs, and informed me that her brother had given her some cloth, and asked me to sell it for her.
My first husband left me about eight years and a half ago; and unfortunately young Mr. Thomas happened to be going by my house; there was a lady in my parlour sitting with me; there was a gentleman with Mr. Thomas that knew the lady that was sitting with me; Mr. Thomas came into my parlour, and sat down, and when the gentleman went away, Mr. Thomas stopped; I asked him if he was not going with his friends, he said, he had something to say to me; that he had taken such a liking to me, that he could not be happy without he had me; I told him it was extraordinary what he should have to say to me, being a stranger to me, and I to him; I told him to consider, and to call upon me again the next evening; I told him I was a poor woman, and he was a gentleman, and that his friends might not approve of it; he said, he was not under the jurisdiction of his friends, he could earn a livelihood any where; I told him that I had been married, and that my husband was gone abroad, and I believed he was dead; he paid his addresses to me, several times, and at last he said, if I would not have him, he would not see the light of another day.
I went in with this young woman to buy some muslins for caps; I came away with her, and never saw the calico at all.
I took the things.
I picked them up, tied up in a red pocket handkerchief, the corner of Coleman-street, at four o'clock in the afternoon.
I know nothing at all of it; I never was in the place.
The reason of my not going was, that the house-maid came to me the night before, and told me not to go, for it would cause a great deal of confusion, as there were many things missing, and the butler had lent the plate out; or else I should have gone.
I never saw any thing of them.
When I first met this man he was in company with another woman, and he went home with us both, he was very much intoxicated; he gave me two shillings, but that was not enough to satisfy me; I left him with the other woman in the room, and did not see him any more that night till about two o'clock, I met him on the stairs, and I went out to sleep at a friend's house; I knew the woman that he was with; and when they took me, the constable of the night said I should have my freedom if I would tell where the property was; and I went with them to the house.
I meant to take them out again.
I was going up Little-Britain on a dark night, the carts and coaches were going along, and that made me walk quick, I believe as far from the parcel as the distance of the press-yard; I saw a woman running up the court-yard, it was a dark night, and impossible for them to swear that it was me.
I had come three hundred miles, with three fatherless children, and buried one on the road; I was very sack and fatigued; I went into this house and sat down, and slept about half an hour; I did not know that I had the things till I saw them at my feet, when he stopped me.
I went to see my father, and being very much in distress, I took them and pledged them at Mr. Purse's.
I picked it up at the door, and pledged it in my own name.
Mrs. Moses had two guineas to make it up; I bought the cloak.
A sister-in-law of mine gave me the coat to pledge, I did not know it was stolen.
This woman keeps a house of ill same; I was in the work-house, and this woman would let me have no rest till I came to her house; she lent me these things for the use of the house, keeping a bad house; and I ran away after she had made away with all my things.
My master and mistress both promised that I should not be prosecuted if I would own to the things.
My little boy picked them up, and brought them to me; he used to play with a pot-boy; he brought the pots, and he said they are Jem's pots; I immediately said, you little villain, how dare you touch them, and I took them out of his hand at the moment that this man came up.
My little boy was three weeks in the House of Correction, and when he was had before the Magistrate again, the boy was discharged.
I have nothing to say any farther than that I was in distress.
I am entirely innocent of it; she lent me the cloak and the petticoat; Elizabeth Bessall did not know but what they were my own things.
The whose of these things I had been entrusted with by Mrs. Clymer; they were going to part, and I was to get her a lodging; she was to have them whenever she called for them.
I was quartered in Mr. Clarke's house; I belong to the Tower Hamlets militia; I bought these plates of a man that was there; and having heard there was to be no parade the next day, and as I have a family, I came to London to do a day's work, as I always do whenever I can; and I was stopped at Islington.
I do not know any thing of it; he was very much in liquor indeed; there was another woman and a man with him.
I know nothing of it.
He often desired me to buy articles for the house without giving me money, and I could not buy them without money; I was obliged to pledge some things to get money, and he owed me a quarter's wages, and denied paying me, because I wanted to go away.
This gentleman met me at Charing-cross, he was with me up a passage a quarter of an hour, and when he had done, he gave me three-pence; half an hour after that, he came to me and charged me with robbing him; the three half-crowns a gentleman gave me that I had been to see at Temple-bar, I told the constable so.
I have nothing to say.
I never was in the house before that Monday; I had a pain in my belly, which I am subject to, and I went in to get a pennyworth of gin; I did not know it was a bad sixpence.
I did not know that they were bad, I picked them up in a piece of paper, in Fleet-market; I never was in jail in my life before.
What I had in my house Mr. Lack left with me, and told me he expected the officers to search his house, and he would fetch them away again on the Monday.
So help me God, I know no more about the peas than any of the Gentlemen of the Jury.
My brother made me drunk with wine, and I was guilty of the error; he enticed me to commit this cruel fact.
I was in Cross-lane, drinking a pint of beer with another young woman, and a young man, Murphy and his wife, and some more of his country people were on the opposite side of the way, and they began quarrelling; I said to the young woman, we had better go, for they would use us all alike in the quarrel; the next day I heard that he had lost his watch, that he had said, I had taken it; I directly went down to Cross-lane, from the Seven-dials, to his wife, and asked her what demands he had of me, and she said, demands enough; I asked her where her husband was, and she said, he was gone to look for me, and I said I would wait till he came home, and I did, I waited above an hour; and when he came in he laid hold of me, and used me very ill, I had not a rag upon my back but what was torn to pieces.
He told me at the Compter, if I would pay for the shoes he would let me go; I told him I should not pay for what I knew nothing about; he knocked me down in his shop, and used me very ill.
I went into a watering-house, and saw this man and another girl drinking together, and I came away; after that, I saw him again by himself, very much intoxicated, and he wanted me to take him home with me, I took him to a house in a court in Whitcomb-street, and he made me a small compliment, and then wanted it back again; and because I would not give it him back again, he said I had robbed him; and as we came down the stairs he turned his breeches-pockets inside out, and they were full of holes.
I found them in a bag, at the corner of Gracechurch-street.
I had a dirty sheet in my apron, I did not touch the shirts, they were lying upon the floor.
The beadle of the hospital came to me, and told me, if I would acknowledge the articles, I should be safe, which I did, his name is Richard Payter.
I saw a woman with a child in her arms, with this pail, and the child was crying; I asked her if I should hold the pail for her, and then this gentleman came up, and I saw no more of her.
I had had nothing to eat for some days, and had a drop of drink, and how I came into the house, I do not know; I don't remember any thing about it.
My husband went away and left me in great distress, I was in hopes of being able to replace it.
She lent me the bonnet, and the apron; the other things I know nothing about; there were two more women slept with her all night.
I acknowledge I took them, but I did not mean to take them. GUILTY , aged 48.
I was in at the Oxford-arms, David English was there, and when the landlady would draw him no more beer, he had three or four half pints of gin with some other people; he was very much intoxicated; I picked up this watch in the passage; I did not know that he had a watch in his possession; he was drinking from nine till past eleven.
I have nothing to say; there was another woman with him before I came up.
I kicked the watch before me, and I carried it to my own pawnbroker's, where I was known, and pledged it for a guinea, and paid for things that I owed with it, all but 2s. 4d.
The things that were in the box, my mistress made me a present of; the officer searched my pockets, and found nothing there; my mistress told me my pockets were very dirty; she lent me her pockets, and the thimble was in that; when I was looking for the pocket where the dirty clothes were, I saw these watches; I took them up in my hand, and one of the officers laid hold of me directly, and took them out of my hand; it was an open house for every one.
I have nothing to say, but to claim the mercy of the Court.
I borrowed her cloak to go out, as I had often done before, I did not mean to steal it; I thought to have slipped it into the box again without her knowing it.
I have nothing to say.
I know nothing at all about it.
I told Mr. Bond that the person who took the property went across the road; I am not guilty; I am not the person he believes, for he found no property on me.
I beg for mercy.
I went to order half a sack of coals, and desired them to be sent only across the way, where I was at work, and finding they did not come, I went over again, and then Mr. Willes laid hold of me, and challenged me with taking the bundle.
I went to Mr. Everitt's, the basket would not hold all the pots, and I put these into my pocket; I did not take them out of the house; but when Mrs. Ives charged me with it, I gave her them directly; I had worked a year and a half for her aunt; she said she would transport me, and if she could not Mr. Everitt should.
I had been after a place; I was taken violently ill, and this woman pressed me very hard to go home with her, which I accordingly did; I asked her if she would have any thing to drink; she said she did not care if she did; I gave her a shilling, and she fetched a pot of porter; I was there three quarters of an hour, and she pressed me to come and see her the next Sunday; I asked her to see me part of my way home, and when we had got down the stairs, she said she must go back again, and she came out again with something in her hand; I did not see what it was; and when she had got into the court, she fell a screaming, and said, I had robbed her.
I did not mean to wrong these people, I had lived with them five months before, and he never found me dishonest; the week was not up till the Wednesday.
I came from the Isle of Wight, with three small children, and another woman, in the waggon; she had the care of both her bundle and mine; she left me, and was to meet me near the Abbey; I wanted victuals for my children, and went to sell what I thought was my own, but instead of leaving me my bundle, she left me her's, with these things in it.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
They were brought to me by a person who lives in their house, and asked me to pledge them; I never was in the house, for I gave the person the money at the door.
She had used me very ill, and I gave her warning; she called me a strumpet and wh - e, and so forth, so that I was determined not to stay; she would not let me go, but confined me; she kicked me several times, which made me get a warrant for her; then she said she missed several things, which amazed me, because just before I I left her, I saw her put her linen into her drawers, and she never said she had missed any; I first asked her if she would search my box; she said, by all means; I suppose the lock had been picked, for when the box was open, there were the articles, but I don't know how they came there.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
I went into Mr. Todd's shop, with my aunt; I bought a pair of stockings, and asked to look at a shawl; Mr Todd then said he had lost a piece of muslin, and I had got it; I looked down, and saw it upon the ground; I picked it up and gave it to him.
I was going for a pennyworth of potatos to Spitalfields-market, and I had nearly fell over the chair at the corner of the street; I took it up and put it on one side.
I was going of an errand; I saw a crowd of people fighting; a drummer threw the coat out to me, and desired me to take care of it. GUILTY , aged 50.
I picked it up at some distance from this man's house; it was lying upon the ground. GUILTY, aged 38.
I found the muslin on the ground. GUILTY, aged 49.
I hope the Court will be favourable, I took them through distress.
I met with this man, he began to pull me about, and began to behave very blackguardly, he dragged me down a court, he pulled out his handkerchief, and said, I had robbed him of his watch, it was found coming through a hole in the bottom of my petticoat, how it came there, I don't know.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
As I went past the shop, I took the shoes off the step; a gentleman said they were his; I said they were not, and walked on; then he went in and told the people of the shop.
Did you not say before the Magistrate, that some person had knocked at your door and asked for coals?
I know nothing of it any more than a child unborn, these things I purchased for seven shillings and sixpence.
I received the bonnets from a young woman; I bought the pillow-cases a year ago, the knives I had had some years.
That woman keeps a bad house, and enticed me from my father and mother, and took off the things I had on, and put on others, and her husband gave me some things; every halfpenny of money I got she had, while I was there, which was three weeks.
As I was going over Westminsterbridge, I asked a man for work, and he said, he wished I would pawn the planes for him, and he would give me 4d. which I did; I went down the area for the purpose the man has stated, but never touched a plane.
Her daughter sent me to pledge it for liquor; I often pledge things for them both.
That lady has sworn false.
I did not know I had it till I was brought back; I was in liquor; I have three fatherless children.
I never knew of any thing from the London Tavern in my life.
Did you not employ me to pledge things?
The prosecutrix lent me spoons at different times, and I pledged many things for her at different times, but I was not to pledge them in her name, least her husband should find it out; she used to get tipsey, and make me so, that I did not know what I did.
I did not intend to hurt the child, I meant to take it down into the country as my own.
I was distressed, as I had just come out of the country, and did not know what to do; I had had no victuals for two days.
He sent me frequently to pawn things for him.
I asked Mrs. Cockerton to lend me a little money, and she said she had none unknown to her husband, and she lent me the spoon till Monday.
I intended to bring them back before they should be missed.
I bought them of a Jew in Monmouth-street.
I Left it in the drawer.
There is a thoroughfare through this passage; the door is always left open for the sailor lodgers; when I got into the passage, the servant cried out stop thief, and they alledged it upon me; I was very much intoxicated.
I am innocent of it, if I was upon my dying bed.
This man was standing among a number of girls, and I went to see what was the matter, and he laid hold of me.
I leave it to the gentlemen of the Jury.
I was coming through Chapel-street, and kicked something before me, I picked it up, and it was a table-cloth all over dirt and fifth.
I have nothing to say.
I never saw the watch.
She first said she had left the penny pieces on the table?
I had not to my knowledge any thing about me, I was searched in the morning, and Mrs. Cross bid me go to my work-again for that she suspected other people. I did, and cleaned a room out. She then asked me to go up stairs and clean some other rooms. I was called suddenly down, and just as was stooping to take the pail in my hand, I met with three papers, which I picked up and put into my bosom, not knowing what they were, but intended to take them to shew Mrs. Cross, as I had heard a great piece of work about them, the constable met me and took me into the parlour, where he put his hand in my bosom, and said, what is this you have got here. I said it is the papers which I have brought down to shew Mrs. Cross; then she said she is the thief then, take her away. I can say no more.
This was a discorderly house, and my room was without lock or key, and there were five more lodgers in the house, so that any body might go into my room; I know nothing of the things, and never was before a Justice in my life before. GUILTY , Death , aged 64.
I have nothing to say; my father and mother were killed by a house falling on them in Baker's-row, Whitechapel, and I have not a friend in the world. GUILTY , aged 49.
I have nothing to say; I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
Did I not put them under my head for a pillow?
Those things were in the room when I went there; Colonel Wood asked for another pillow; I lent him mine, and took the bundle for a pillow, but did not know what was in it. GUILTY .
A man desired me to pledge the gown for him, for eleven shillings, which I did, in the name of Jones, and he presented me with the ticket and sixpence.
I never was in the parlour at all. GUILTY , aged 35.
I have nothing to say; but if Mrs. Gordon had given me a character, I could have got a place.
I lived with the prosecutor between three and four years as his wife; I met him, and asked him to give me a trifle, and he gave me the coat to pawn, which I did for seven shillings and sixpence, and gave him the duplicate.
Mrs. Lloyd owed me one shilling and sixpence; and said, I might take something to pledge for it. GUILTY , aged 46.
I have nothing to say.
I went to buy some cotton for a frock; I chose one, and paid four shillings for it; I was coming away; he said he would detain me, for I had stolen something; I said I had not, nor did I; I saw no prints but some bedfurniture.
I was at the fire, and a woman with a child asked me to hold the bundle; I could not find her afterwards.
I have nothing to say.
I found the watch.
A woman asked me to carry it for her, and she would give me sixpence, and when there was an outcry, she ran away.
Mr. Johnson told me, if I would pay for the goods I should go home, and he sent to several places to get security for the money that I might go home.
My husband was drunk all that week, and beat me and used me very ill; he knocked two of my teeth out of my head; I did not see him take these things, nor did not know when he did it, or any thing about it.
Mrs. Stevens and I lived in the same house, she goes out at night, she was intoxicated, and had pledged my apron; I said, never mind, she lent me a handkerchief and apron; she had a man with her, and I acknowledge I put on her cloak to take home a pair of gaiters, and was going home with them when I met her.
I was in the shop which was full of people, they accused me with it, but I know nothing about it.
I was much distressed, and took the watch and pawned it.
I pledged the things, not meaning to cheat, but to get them out again.
The door is open all night; my husband is a prisoner in the guard-house, being a soldier in the Tower Hamlets militia; I went home late at night, and found the bundle on the stairs, which I pledged.
I took them from distress, and leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
I borrowed it of her while I mended my own; I carried it home twice, but she was not at home, and I took it home again for safety.
I never took the pockets away at all; the patient was quite insane all that night and day.
I never saw his money; he used me very ill because I told him I could not take him home with me; it was me that called the watchman.
Another woman gave it me to carry for her.
I know nothing of the table-spoon.
I have nothing to say.
I was coming home with my water-cresses, and found these stockings in an old handkerchief.
I heard a great noise on the Sunday morning as I lay in my bed, and a person calling out, watch! I asked what was the matter; the people said, it was a drunken man had been robbed; I put on my cloaths, and went to the door; the people were all laughing at his calling out, watch! he pulled some papers out of his waistcoat pocket, and said he had got some notes left; he then pulled out some silver and halfpence, and gave to a parcel of girls that were about him; he went into a public-house with them, and I saw no more of him till the Monday morning; after he was gone I found this foreign coin in the passage; when I was taken I was so flurried I did not know what I said; I told them I had had it two months; but when I came before the Magistrate I told the truth, that I had found it.
Here is an entry in the book of a child's white had lined.
It never was Mrs. Harnett's sheet.
I have neither father nor mother, nor any creature in the world to speak for me; I lived with my mistress a week.
This cupboard is never made use of by any body in the house; I know nothing at all of the gown.
I know nothing at all about it.
I never had such a thing in my possession.
I am innocent of the charge.
I know nothing at all about them.
I have nothing to say.
I only took it to put into a chair-bottom, and not to sell.
I have not any thing to say.
I heard a noise, and saw the gentleman with a girl having some words; I went to see what was the matter; he then laid hold of me, and said, I was the girl; I said, I would go any where, and went very quietly to the watch-house.
My master said he would not hurt me, if I would tell him where they were.
I have nothing to say.
He was very much in liquor, and gave me the watch to pawn.
I was very much disguised in liquor at the time; a man gave me liquor, and told me he was going to sell those things, but I might have them; and by the same token he put the candlestick in my pocket, for I could not hold the things, and I stopped at that woman's house, where I met the child.
I went with these people in a coach to St. Giles's; we drank a great deal of beer and gin, and it affected my head very much; then we went to a lodging-house, and this man went to-bed; I sat on a chair; he desired me to come to-bed, and I told him I did not belong to him, and I would not; he then gave me a shilling to get something to drink, and I went away; I had no more of his money.
He said before the Magistrate that he had shewed some of this lace for sale after I was taken up, and the Justice told him he should not have shewn it.
I was going home at the time Mr. Mitchell met me; I had the key in my pocket, and after he took me up, he came to me several times, and offered me two or three guineas, if I would tell him where the things were, and I told him I did not know any thing of them.
This man lodged in the next room to me, and things of this bulk could not have been carried out without his knowing it; I can hear every thing that he, and his wife, and child say.
I am innocent of the charge.
I never said I had a husband at all.
This man was very much intoxicated, and had not two-pence to pay for a pint of purl.
I leave my defence to my Counsel.
I told Mrs. Hill she should have her things in twenty-four hours if she would not hurt me; she said that was all she wanted, and would not hurt me.
I was going to Highgate; the patrol laid hold of me; I told him I was going to ease myself, my breeches were unbuttoned at the time; I was taken to the watch-house.
The night before my mistress called me into her bed-room, and said, she was to have a gentleman to sleep with her that night; she said, she had a bill to make up in the morning, and the gentleman would not give her any more than two guineas, and desired me to pledge these things, which I did accordingly; and I went to see a fire in my way back, lost part of the money, and I was afraid to go home.
I live in Dove-court, in the Old Jewry; I left home between three and four o'clock in the afternoon to meet my father, who was gone to Hampstead; when I got to North End, I found he was gone; I came to town again down Gray's-Inn-lane and down Liquorpond-street; I crossed over at the end of Liquorpond-street, when I saw three fellows running away; there was a cry of stop thief, and that man immediately laid hold of me, and took me to Mr. Page's; it was a wet afternoon, and one of my gloves were wet; I have a habit of walking with one hand in my breeches-pocket; I put my hand into my pocket with my glove on, and my glove being wet, and the breeches having leather linings, it stuck; and, when I got my hand out, it was bleeding.
Mrs. Davis has got a bed of mine now, a feather and flock bed, and other articles; Mrs. Francis owes me between five and six pounds, and she has no other means but swearing my life away in this rascally manner.
I was as sober as I am now, it is all spite, I will not excuse my prosecutor; I asked her to lend me some halfpence, and she said she had none; she gave me the cap to pawn, and when I had pawned it I received a shillingsworth of halfpence for it, and she followed me and knocked me down; she knocked the halfpence out of my hand and set me a bleeding.
The linen is my own, I have a pair of sheets of the same now in pledge; the handkerchief was left in my room by a person that slept with me; I know nothing about the name of the person that left it; the duplicates are all my own, they have been advertised, and nobody has come forward to own any thing; I have three small children, and am pregnant now.
I was in distress when I took them, and hope you will have mercy on me.
The silk stockings were given to me by my mistress when she was looking up some things to sell; she looked up seven pair of stockings, and she promised me one more pair, and the shift and the spencer likewise were given me by Mrs. Boutevile.
I was coming along Charing-cross in the evening, and met this gentleman and Mr. Scholey; they took me to the Duke's Head, in Charing-cross, and we had two pints of gin hot; we came out of there, and went to the Axe and Gate, in Parliament-street, and sat there drinking; Mr. Scholey took the watch and two dollars out of his pocket before he went out of the house; after he had gone, this Scholey, a soldier in the Third Regiment of Guards, took one dollar away from me, and wanted me to deliver the watch up to him, and because I would not he gave charge of me to the watchman.
Please you, my Lord, I was very intimate with these people; I went on Saturday night to this woman's house, and told her I was deficient of a little money, and I was going to meet a person; if she would lend me a trifle, I would bring it her to-morrow; she said she could not lend me any money, but she would give me something to make it on, but she did not wish her husband to know it, which she did accordingly; I went to this pawnbroker's, where I have dealt a number of years; if I had stole the cloak I would not have gone where I had been known so many years; I bought a small article out of the money I had pledged the cloak for; I gave the man the rest of the money, and the ticket; they accepted of the money, and the ticket, and when I was at the watch-house, they returned the money again; since I have been in the milk business, because she could not drink tea to do her good, as she had an asthma on her lungs, I have sent her bottles of neat milk from the cow to do her good.
Can you speak God's truth, Macdonald - do not you know me?
My cousin is a milk-woman.
Please you, my Lord, this is the ribbon that she bought for my cousin, being so kind in\\ send\\ ing the new milk to her; I am telling you the truth, if you please to hang me up this minute.
I never saw the scraper at all.
I came into the gentlewoman's house for half a pint of beer; I gave her a shilling to get a drop of gin; she did not come with it, and I went to the bar to get the change of the shilling; I stood at the bar and was going back again, and how it was the gridiron was at the bar, and my apron being ragged, it caught hold of the gridiron; she put her hand to my side, and said, you have got my gridiron; I said, no, I am sure I have not, madam, and on my looking round, there was the gridiron hanging by the handle in the hole of my apron; I am a poor woman, who works in the street for my bread, and my having the liquor in my head, I did not know any thing of it; I have two small children to take care of; I work for my bread very honestly.
I did not steal these aprons; you brought them to me, and desired me to tie them before me, and you asked me if I had put off the aprons when I came to you; I said they were dirty, I will wash them before I bring them to you; I asked you for my wages, you said, you could not pay me my wages; I pawned your aprons to pay my lodging, I expected my money from you, I worked hard for it; and your husband d - d and swore he would not give me above sixpence a day; I was going to bring them to your house as soon as I got my wages from you; you recollect, your own dear self lent those aprons to me.
I gave it her to pawn where I was, because I could not go myself, to pay for my lodging; and when Mr. Williams came to pay me, he would not give me more than sixpence a day, I could not sleep in the street.
I did not intend to defraud her of the sheets, or of her blankets; I was out of work at the time and the young man too, and I was very much distressed; when they sent the Officer, on that day the young man was to bring home half a guinea, which he did, but before he was come home I was at Clerkenwell; I meant to get the things out with that money; I hope you will have mercy on me; I never mean to do so again; when I was taken to prison I was all that day and the next day without any thing to eat till dinner time.
I had dealt with the gentleman often before.
I know no more of what is laid to my charge than God upon his throne; I have dealt with Mr. Glover four or five years.
My mother sent me of an errand, and as I was going along I rushed against a drunken man; I was afraid of him, and went into that gentleman's house, he went backwards in the yard, and came out again, and said I had killed two of his hens, and brought a piece of carpet to wrap them up in; while he and his wife were talking together, some women came down stairs, and one of the women said it was her carpet, and then they sent me to the watch-house.
I was walking along Soho-square, he stopped me, and asked me if I would take a walk with him round the square; I told him I would, and I did, and that young man gave me three shillings for a compliment; then he said I had robbed him; I told him I would not give it him back, as he had given it me; I had three shillings and sixpence in my pocket before he kept me walking round the square with him.
Mrs. Calverley, did not you know that these things were in pawn before you broke open the door; I hope you will not take a false oath; she knew at the time the things were pledged?
At the time this happened I had two children to support; I had a friend of the name of Jackson, who paid the rent for a considerable time; he went away, and left me with the children; I worked for Mr. Rose, in Bishopsgate-street, and the work was very slack, I could not get any work to support my children; she gave me leave to pledge the things, provided, when I received the money from my brother in the country, I took them out; she said, get them out as soon as you can; the very night that I pledged the blanket she said so. Mr. Rose is out of town, or he would have come and spoke for me; my husband died at the time he worked for Mr. Rose; Mrs. Calverley said, if I would pay her four pounds, she would not prosecute me, otherwise she would punish me, - if it was possible to have me transported she would, without I gave her four pounds; my friends told her they would pay the money for me as far as the things were worth; it was not in my power to raise four pounds; she made answer they would not take less than four pounds, as they had brought it so far; I have got three small children.
Did I not buy half a quartern of soap; it was another woman that took it and you let her go?
I bought half a quartern of soap, and I paid for it; I never stole the man's soap.
On Saturday, about one o'clock in the afternoon, I went down with something for my husband's dinner; I called upon this person; and we had something to drink together; she said she had a trifle of money to make up that she did not want her husband to know of; she told me to pawn this coat and hat for her, and as I did not go back again to her, she went to Mr. Hincksman, and stopped these things.
You were to pay me half a crown from Thursday to Saturday?
I knew nothing of the candlesticks no more than of my dying-day; I really did not know that I had them.
You told me that that table-cloth you never had in your custody from the family; and that you could take your oath of it?
She told me that she never had the table-cloth to wash, nor in her custody; and the shift she had given in a mistake to a person, and she had put another in its place; I never was guilty of such a thing in my life; I never touched a thing she had, a wicked wretch.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I told him, if it was his property, he was very welcome to it; I picked it up in the street.
I was looking into the picture-shop, where a great number of people were looking, as well as me; I picked this piece of print up, four yards from the picture-shop, on the ground; I never took it off from the stool; I kicked against it before I saw it; I took it up, supposing some person might have dropped it; the prosecutor promised my witness that my trial was not till to-morrow, else I had a witness to speak for me, that I had lived with five years.
His master has done it out of spite; I never came in with an intention of taking his master's barrow; his master knew me when I was in as good circumstances as himself; I do not say I did not sit down on the barrow.
I had no intention to take the barrow off the premises; it was of no use to me; I was out in the evening with some friends, before I came to Fulham; I stopped later than I should, I was tired, and went to sit down in the barrow in Mr. Howell's ground; I went to pitch it farther, as the people were coming in to get ready to go to market, and finding it cold there, I pushed it farther into the ground, and where there was no place to take it out; if I had meant to take the barrow, should not I have brought it out the same way as I went in, there being no other way; my husband's friends and the gardeners can make laws among themselves; if they like a person, they will give him any thing, but my husband's friends wish to send me out of the land, and the reason why I appeared in men's apparel (as has been stated by my husband's friends) is, that I being able to execute the work of a gardener , and being dressed as a man, I had the same wages as a man had; I had no intention of stealing it; the prosecutor knew me in better circumstances; it is all spite and malice.
I was going through the market, to provide for me and my family, and there was a cry about this goose; I saw several people stand to see what was the matter; I was standing there because I could not get through; this young man came to me, and said that I was the person that took the goose.
I am not guilty, I never took any thing out in my life from Mr. Page; I took two gowns from one of his shopmen, on Saturday night, and I gave him a one pound note and he gave me a shilling, and as to the broach I never bought one of Mrs. Page, I bought two pair of ear rings; Mr. Bliss ordered me brandy, and behaved very ill to me indeed; he used me extremely ill, and told me I should be hanged, for Mr. Holt had given me the notes; I told him I never had them of him in my life.
I asked you to pawn the buckles?
I had got nothing but the spoon, I never had got the three sheets; the sheets on my bed I pledged, and I brought them back again; the things were all on the bed when I left the room.
I leave my case in the hands of the gentlemen of the Jury; it is the first crime. I know no more about it than the child that was born last night. I know nothing at all about it.
I picked up the pocket book when I was sweeping up the room after the carpenters had done working in the room, the young gentleman moved out of his room into another room, I did not consider the pocket book of any value, I thought it was to be thrown away; that gold pin I never noticed was in the pocket book; as for the spoons I gave five shillings and ninepence for them, they have been in my possession near five years, I bought them at a pawnbroker's in Red-cross-street, the table linen has been mine fifteen years, before I ever saw Mr. Vandercombe.
I was in distress when I took them, I had not a bit of bread to eat for my child nor myself.
When I went into Mrs. Brown's place, I only took a bundle with me to see how I liked the place, as soon as I came acquainted what kind of a lady I was with I gave her warning; the lady said if I would go she would have me taken up, and she never would pay me the two seven shilling pieces I had lent her; she kicked and called me violent names, and said I walked like a rotten hedge w - e; she told me she would cut my throat from ear to ear; she said that I had very little coming to me, she had lost several things and she should lay that to my charge; I never was in Matilda Nelson 's house; the boy, James Kirby , came into the kitchen with a new one pound note in his hand, he said he was going to pay it to the lighterman, I asked him to change it with me for an old one that I had.
I live servant in this house, and the lodger asked me to pawn it for him, the man being sick, I pawned it for him, his name is George Singleton ; he told me if the pawnbroker asked any questions to say it was my husband's; he now denies he ever gave it me.
My husband is on the debtor's side of Newgate, he wanted half a guinea, I pledged the sheet, my husband said he should have some money on the Friday, it never come, I wrote to Mrs. Lemoine to inform her; Mrs. Lemoine let me sleep with her one night, and the next morning when I was going to my uncle's, she came after me and brought me back.
This young man (Lake) and his apprentice lodged in my house, they used to board with me, he had a deal of work on his own account; he used to cut out in my room, I used to go out of his errands, and carry home his work, he gave me these shoes, and asked me to sell them, which I did; Lake told the officer that I was the person he had sent with them; I should have appeared last sessions but I have laid in, I have five small children.
My mistress told me to make haste with the basket of clothes, and as I came back to bring one of the children with me, I brought two with me, I asked the cook for a little bit of bread and meat, I just shut the door after me while I eat some of it, then there was a parcel of dirty coarse kitchen cloths, which I put in my apron, as we never put them with the clean linen; the waiter came after me, he says you are wanted back, I went back with him, Mr. Kempshead told me to sit down, he locked the door, I says what is the matter, he says I do not know, but if it is true you may be transported; these cloths I laid down on the table, and when the constable came I took the cloths up in this hand, the constable searched me, and when he had done that, he takes these greasy cloths, and the two spoons fell out.
I am very innocent of it, it must have been there before I came into the shop.
I was in Cold Bath Fields, I met this poor baby, about the hour of half past eight, or near nine o'clock, I could not hear who it belonged to one way or other; I went up and down Mutton Hill for half an hour, I could not hear any thing; there was a poor woman that persuaded me to take her to the workhouse, I took the child to Clerkenwell workhouse, there I left word my name was Brown, and my father lived in Shoe-lane; I told this good man that I was going to meet my husband at the Cow, in Cow-lane, is it likely that I should have told that if I had robbed the child; I have had seven children of my own, I never touched the child's clothes, I have too much feeling for a baby.
I was going to gather some dandelion, and coming along this road, where I serve with asparagus, some women called after me, you have got something that does not belong to you under your cloak, I turned back to go to the woman that said I had got the property, and before I got over the second channel, a man came out and said he would take good care I should not go; I stopped an hour before the officer took me, the officer took me into a public house and searched me, I had not any thing in the world but one halfpenny; he asked me where I lodged, I said it is nothing where I lodge, I get my money very hard; I am really innocent of the fact, you may depend upon it, as innocent as God is just and true in heaven.
I leave myself entirely to the mercy of the court; I have four small children, my husband left me quite in distress.
I beg for mercy.
I have been living with this man four years as his wife, these flannels were hanging on the line in the passage, he got up in a passion, and told me he would kick me down stairs: I tore my clothes from off the line and these flannels; they have been in my trunk ever since last May; he was mad and jealous because I was going to marry a Frenchman.
If I struggled with you as you say, and I dropped the basket, would not you have picked up the basket and brought it, and not to let it be brought in ten minutes afterwards.
I had not the basket, I never saw the basket in my life.
All that I can say, I am a hard working woman; I have known Mrs. Wright twenty-four years, we were always good friends together, I know nothing at all about the basket and the pewter pots, nor the iron pot, I do not indeed; my husband is on board a man of war.
I can say no more than I make soldier's coats and waistcoats, I was told by Mr. Matthews, that I work for, to go to this house in Short's Gardens, to enquire for Mrs. Pritchard, as I was coming from these people's stairs I saw an old white handkerchief, and on it lay these white handled knives and forks, I saw a woman whom I supposed had dropped them, that good woman in black came in apparently with some steakes, and before she had been to her room door she called me a blackguard b - h, and said I had robbed her. She was very much in liquor the Saturday night I was committed.
I was very much in liquor, I did not know any thing about it.
I had drank more than did me good, I did not know that I had the gown, as I sat down I must have taken it up in my petticoats; I told Mr. Kelly as soon as I found it I meant to bring it to him.
Them things were never hers in the world.
The sheet I have had these four years, I bought a pair of them in Cranbourn alley; there is one lock I have had twenty-two years, that gridiron I bought at a sale; there is nothing that belongs to them but the two old pasteboard patterns.
The prosecutor promised to forgive me, they had three or four different nurses, and one of them slept with me.
I was going home as an unfortunate woman, I live at a distance from there, I met that gentleman, he solicited me to go with him as well as I solicited him; as for robbing the gentleman of any thing I never did, he pulled me about undoubtedly, and I found it on the ground.
That has nothing to do with my crime now.
He told me he would give me the watch for an ilicit purpose, he having no money, he did not come with any money to me for three nights after he gave it me, and without he gave me some money I did not mean to give it him back again.
I take in washing, I took that gown of Mary Mays , I have washed for her two years; I told the prosecutrix if she would go with me I would go after the woman and find her; she was at my house, I told her my husband was coming home to breakfast, she stopped all the time my husband was there, and she sent out for something to drink, she said she would not hurt me; when my husband was gone she locked the door, and would not give me liberty to go, I asked her over and over, and she would not then let me go; I have three small children, I am an innocent woman.
This woman was in my place on Saturday, and asked me to let my daughter pledge it for her.
The house is full of lodgers.
I only beg for mercy, I would not hurt any person living.
Mr. Davis came into the apartment where I was, with Elizabeth Phillips , they asked me to go out and get some gin, they gave me a tenpenny piece; I returned and told them they would not take it only for sixpence; Mr. Davis gave me a pound note, I went and got the gin, and gave the change; then we asked him for something to eat, he gave me some silver, and I got some cold ham and beef; I took part of it, the prosecutor wished to stay all night, if I was not afraid to sleep with them; I thought it was very improper for a man to sleep with two women; I got up and went out. I saw no more of his property whatever, than the one pound note and the tenpenny piece.
I am a porter at Billingsgate ; I had been to the Fourteen Stars, I was rather in liquor. Going along I met a woman in a dark brown coat, she was in liquor, she said she knew my husband, she was his countryman; she said will you go along with me, she asked me to pledge some handkerchiefs; I said, I will go and pledge these handkerchiefs at the Fourteen Stars; I went backwards, I shewed them the handkerchiefs, they would not take them in, this woman gave me the handkerchiefs, she staid in the street. I went with her to three pawnbrokers, there was never a one would take it in, they were so old; she gave me these things to take care of till Friday, I did not know that she had stole them, and Mr. Griffith's coming up and taking me, I was frightened; I threw them out of my pocket. I am very innocent, I know nothing of it; if I was to drop down dead I do not know where that woman lives.
The brush was for the kitchen, and the shaving case I had to put my cap on in general. I believe the children took it up and put it in my unlocked box; the stockings were taken in a mistake, they were old, and very bad ones.
I know nothing about them.
She lent me these things, we were in the habit of lending one another things.
I was going along by the door, and a young woman overtook me, and asked me if I would take them for her.
I beg for mercy.
I was going down Tottenham court road; a woman in a cloak dropped these articles. I picked them up and put them in my pocket.
I went to this woman's house, I took a chisel and opened the door, I went and took these things out of the drawer.
I know no more of it than you do at this moment; I was very much in liquor when this gentleman laid hold of me. I have got this child, and I work very hard for my living.
I am an innocent woman, I never saw the oysters in my life.
Forgive me Mr. Knight, O , what have I done.
I know nothing further than I gave the duplicates to Mrs. Carlisle of the window curtains.
I had a drop too much on that day, I was very sorry the next morning that I had done it, and I thought I should have broke my heart.
She tells false; I saw the cotton lay at the door, and I picked it up.
When I went to Mr. Price's shop to redeem the cloak, he says, my dear, did not you take a cloak last night; he took me into the parlour, and with a great deal if persuasion I confessed. I was very much intoxicated, or else I would not have pledged it if I had known it was not honestly come by.
I have this to say in my own defence, that I am the daughter of a clergyman, and was bred up in a plain genteel way, till the death of my father, I was obliged to go to servitude. I am now left without a friend to give me good advice; if I was not ashamed, I could bring forward those who could prove that I never was in disgrace; they would prove that I was never before a magistrate before.
I was going along in the evening, the gentleman stopped me and asked me if I did not sell him a pail and a tub, I told him I knew nothing about them; he said I have got your description, and you must be the person; I went willingly to the office.
That gentleman who has witnessed against me, and said I was the person before the magistrate, he said I had a long sleeve gown on, and that is a thing I was never in possession of in my life. In the next place, he told the magistrate that he saw the woman give me two shillings and a penny in my hand. When the magistrate asked him again if he was sure - he said, no, he saw some money; he said it was half after seven in the evening, then it was dark. It is very odd he should come and swear against me in such a manner. I would sooner go to a prison immediately than take a false oath.
When the pawnbroker asked me where I had the watch from, I told him from a man in a leather apron, he gave it me to pledge; he stood at the corner, I went to the door to look for him, he told me not to go out; I came back and told him not to send for a constable, I would go with him any where and fetch the man; I came with him from Kingsland.
I did not see the watch; I did not know that they had a watch in the place; that girl is a gossiping person. What made me go behind the door was, my mother was in liquor, I suspected she was coming up, and when she is in liquor she does not know what she says. This girl is in the habit of leaving the door open and going a gossiping.
I was going up the town between seven and eight o'clock in the morning for tea and sugar; coming home I picked up a few things on the dunghill. Mrs. Dimmock's mother tells fortunes, and carries gingerbread nuts about; I went and talked with her; I met Mrs. Martin coming out of the house, she said good morning to me. On Tuesday Mr. Dimmock came to me and said I had taken his soldier's great coat; and when his wife came she came and abused me, and asked me for the things; I told her I had not seen them; whether they were red or white I know not. On Thursday afternoon I was sitting mending my clothes; Mr. Read and Dimmock came up stairs; they searched my place; I had nothing but my own; Mr. Read took me to Tottenham Court Road, from one pawnbroker to another. I am as clear of it as a child unborn.
The prosecutrix said if I would make the things good she would not hurt a hair of my head.
I bought these two pieces of bacon at the corner of Grub-street; I had the bacon with me, a woman asked me what I gave a pound for it; I told her ten-pence; the woman said they asked eleven-pence for this; I took it in my hand, I did not go from the door with it.
I am sorry for what I have done. I beg for mercy.
I made away with all my things for that money, I was going into the hospital; when I went in the public house he sat with another woman, he had some silver on the table; I was not near him at all; he was in liquor and his coat was all over mud.
The witness has been in the habit of borrowing a shilling or two of my mother she left them two gowns in the box and nothing else; she is a false swearing woman. Here is a bill that she owed my mother for her lodging.
I never had the property at all. I am innocent of the charge.
I had come from Bristol but two days, I had expended what money I had to come up to London; a woman gave me two glasses of gin; she told me her husband and her had words; she asked me to go and take that bundle; the girl came out and asked me whose patterns they were; I said they were not mine. The liquor had made me much intoxicated, or else I should not have done any such thing.
I saw them lay; I was in great distress; I picked up a bit of blue, and they brought what they pleased to me.
I was in sad distress, which drove me to do what I did; I have two children. My husband has been dead six years.
When I brought these things down in the kitchen, my master said take these things away or kick them away; when I came from the place being a poor girl I took these two or three things, they were not of much consequence.
I was coming across the square I met a woman that I had carried milk for her sometime back; she gave me this tray of knives and forks; she told me to go to the bottom of the square; I expected her back in a minute; this man asked me what I had; I told him; I never went down the area till he took me down; the cook took me into the kitchen and took them from me.
No; her name is King; I have not seen her since I have been here.
My prosecutrix came to me in Rosemary-lane, where I get my bread; she told me she was informed that I was the person that came out of her house with the tea tray under my cloak; I told her I would go with her any where; I knew nothing of her tea tray. I said ma'am, you know me well enough to think better of me. I gave her a direction to come to me in the morning, she never came nigh me in the morning; I waited till half past ten o'clock, and then I went down to her house, to know who was the person that informed her that I had the tea tray under my cloak; I had no cloak on, I had not been in the neighbourhood two months; she said she would not prosecute me if I would tell her where the tea tray was, I told her I did not know any thing of it; I said I would sooner tell her if could, than he taken to a prison.
On Sunday three weeks, I was going to fetch some water, and on my coming behind the pump, I saw the shawl laid in the lane, I picked it up, not knowing who it belonged to, I sold it for one shilling and six pence.
This young woman and I lodged with my mother some time; she was in the habit of lending her things; she lent me some on the Sunday before; she said I should be always welcome to her things till she got a place; I took them, but not to make a proper of them.
I was very much intoxicated when I took these things. Mrs. Priestly persuaded me to leave my home, and live with her upon the town, and she would take a lodging for her and me: she has got a girl now in the hospital that lived with her. That woman that took me to her place, she took a shawl and brought in some gin and victuals; she pledged all the things herself, and when the money was gone she turned me out. I was in the watch-house two nights. She went to this woman and sold the tickets; she said, if the tickets were found I should be prosecuted.
I am innocent of the charge alledged against me; I have six children.
I am innocent. My husband found the notes.
I never took the hat nor saw the hat.
When I went into this house I had nobody with me. I had no cotton. I called for a glass of gin and a pipe of tobacco. I went out, they brought me back again. I told them I brought nothing in with me. I am a poor woman that works very hard; my husband has been on board a man of war fifteen years.
I went into the shop to buy some calimanco, he had only two pieces to shew me, at fifteen-pence a yard. I told him, I could only afford to pay a shilling a yard. The gentleman told me to stop, he had plenty. I stopped a minute, he took the pieces of silk handkerchiefs off the counter; he said, he had lost a piece of silk handkerchiefs between the three. I stood still: whether the handkerchiefs fell from the women, I do not know; the gentlemen said, they fell from me.
I went into Mr. Simonds shop, I bought a yard and a half of ribbon; I came out of the shop and was going towards my home, I saw a woman drop this piece of ribbon, I picked it up, this gentleman asked me what I picked up, I said, a piece of ribbon; he said, it was his, he pushed me into a shop; I refused letting him have the ribbon because I saw it drop, he saw a woman run away.
I have no friend in the world. I am blamed innocently in what my master is laying me in blame of; and in regard of the ear rings you could not find a gold ear ring in his shop if you were to search it.
I did not go away with the gown, I took it down, and went into his own place to ask the price of it, he took it away from me.
I was in liquor at the time.
I throw myself on the mercy of the court.
I had worked for a person three years; Mrs. Catlin persuaded me to leave that woman and work for her, which I did. I found the apron in the passage, and pledged it, and when I came home my prosecutrix and I spent the money in liquor; then I found it was this poor woman's apron, I said I was very sorry, if she could lend me fifteen pence I would take it out and work it out; she told me she had not the money to lend me, but I might have the spoon. I had the spoon and sold it to Mrs. Coles, and then the pawnbroker's were shut up, I could not get the apron.
I used to get up at four o'clock and work hard for my living.
When she took me up she told me if I would own to the note and pay her five shillings a week she would not hurt me. I am a poor unfortunate woman.
In the first place, my box was open, Mrs. Lemay had been to my box before the officer had been to it. In the next place, after they searched the room, I said to them, would you like to look under the bed, Mrs. Lemay said, no, there is no occasion for that, Sarah has made the bed, there is nothing there. After I went away I left the key in my box; on the following day my master brought me the key of my box. On Wednesday Sarah Reeves was brought up, she then said she had found a key and a pocket handkerchief in my pockets, under the bolster, on the Sunday evening; when it had been said there was nothing there, and now she says she found it there. Concerning the salt spoon, we had two young women lived in the house before I came, one of them young women lost the salt spoon, she was willing to pay for it. With respect to the snuff box I saw in my mistress's mother's hands, her name is Page; and as to the keys I never heard they were lost, nor do I know where they came from; they were laying about for two months before this; I never knew where they belonged to. The candles I acknowledge putting them in my box, but I did not know how they came in the cupboard, but seeing them there I put them in my box, for fear my mistress should think it was my doings. The key that my master alludes to, of the copper drawer, is in a room that is never left alone; if master or mistress goes out of it they always turn the key of the door, which my master will say as well as myself.
I did do it; I was in great distress; I took no more than what is laid before you.
I was going by, there was a man and a woman standing at the door where they had dropped down, he asked me what I had taken, I said I did not know; I told him I picked this up, if they were his I would give them him; I gave them him and he dragged me in the shop.
I am away from my husband, his son and daughter; I have not been used very well by them, they did not use my child very well; the prosecutor advised me to come and have the child baptized on Christmas day; I was short of money; I asked my husband for money, he would not give me any; I thought I might make free with these things, I took them; I said Mary, take them out on Saturday night, that is three shillings and nine pence, and bring me one shilling and three halfpence; I told her to take the three shillings and ninepence out of my money; I bought herrings and potatoes with the money. I hope you will pardon me this time for my baby's sake; I thought it was no harm.
I was going by, and seeing the door open I went in, I saw the child, she told me I was doing wrong, I did not know any thing of it, I told her; no more I did not. I went in there to hide myself from the boys throwing mud at me.
I went to Mr. Dignam's house as a servant ; I had been in the house about an hour when Mr. Dignam came home; Mrs. Dignam was gone to bed; Mr. Dignam told me to go down stairs and put the kitchen fire out, but the door was never fastened; Mr. Dignam went to bed and left me in the kitchen; there was some one knocked at the door; I opened the door; it was my husband; he swore if I resisted in letting him come in he would take my life, accordingly he came in, and my fright was so great that I went out of the house, and went to my lodgings near Temple Bar. He brought the property in question home, and made away with it as he thought proper. After that I left London; and after that I came back to London I went to the Waggon and Horses, Newington, where I saw Mr. Snow; he told me he would search me; I voluntary gave him the pocket book that he has got in his possession, there was the ticket of the gown and the tablecloth, but the handkerchief in question is not theirs; he told me if I confessed where any of the property was Mr. Dignam would forgive me, and let me go; I did as far as I know, as my husband had told me where it was.
When I first went to live with this person, she hired me, to work for her. She was a person on the town, and I went with her; she wore my gowns, and I wore her's; and part of these duplicates the clothes belonged to me. I asked her to give me the duplicates; she refused giving them me; she asked me to go out with her; she had another woman with her at the time I went out with her. I had left my key in her room on the table: I said, Mrs. Thompson, I forgot my key; she said, go and get it. I asked the landlady for the key; she saw me go out; I was very ill; I had lost the use of my limbs; I heard that she had a charge against me; I went and delivered myself; she has been the ruin of me entirely.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
A woman asked me to hold the pots; I did not know she was a thief; she said she was going to a servant maid for some victuals; she did not like to take the pots. I held the pots for a quarter of an hour; at last the old woman came; Gregory would not take her. I never stole any thing in my life.
I was going up Paul's-chain, about six o'clock in the morning, I found the lamp there by one of the pillars in St. Paul's Church-yard. I am a chairwoman ; I was going out to work that morning.
On the night I was taken to the watchhouse I was in North Audley-street, two grooms came to me and asked me to have something to drink, they took me into the public-house and charged me with the watch, I never was in that pawnbrokers shop in my life, nor did I ever see that young man that charged me before in my life. They charged another woman with this before.
I was coming up Long Acre, this man took me by the arm, he said he should wish to go home with me, I told him I was not fit; he was quite intoxicated; he asked me to have something to drink; I told him I could not drink any thing, and as we were coming up Belton-street he staggered and let the watch fall, I picked it up; he got hold of me and tore me all to pieces; he drew his knife out and cut me after he knocked me down; I got up and ran away. When the watchman catched hold of me, I said, do not hold me, he pulled out the watch, and I will tell you where it is.
I do not know how the watch got up the chimney.
I was very much distressed, when I met with these two people she gave me them two things to pledge. I told her when I received my husband's half pay I would return her the things and something in the bargain.
She gave me the things to pawn; her husband came in and asked her where I was going with the things, she said I had stole them, the shift I got from St. Giles's Workhouse.
I am perfectly innocent of it.
When I went out I asked her to lend me a pellise, I went out and pledged it. I asked her for some money, she denied me, I was ashamed to return. When I met this young man, I said I would go home with him, as he said they would not hurt me if I would own it.
I was coming along Diot-street; there were three or four women, with the man under the gateway; he knocked me down, and said I was the person that took his watch away.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I am guilty of what I am charged.
Kind Gentlemen of the Jury, I hope you will take my sad misfortune, which I now labour under, into your consideration, as I am left alone in the wide world, and I am the mother of ten children, and brought here to answer the faults of my deceased husband. My husband in his life-time rented an apartment in Mrs. Deamer's house; after living there some time, he was out of work; he made use of these things, and meant to return them when he got work again. Mrs. Deamer received of me a variety of duplicates for the rent; and as soon as she found he was buried, she sent me here, and threatened to transport me. I beg for mercy, as my husband made me pledge them.
I leave it to the mercy of the court.
In the cold weather I had not half clothes enough on the bed; one of these window curtains were on the bed; the sister of Mr. Swan used to take all the things in the shop, and I used to put them in the bed out of the way.
On the 19th of March I was standing at the end of the court where I live, the prisoner was with another girl, he returned and asked me where I lived; he followed me up into my room; I asked him if he was going to give me any thing to drink, he put down sixpence; I went for a pot of porter; he said he did not drink any gin, and when I returned the prisoner and the other girl were gone. I am innocent of the crime I am accused of.
A woman asked me to hold the pots in my hand while she went down the street; she asked me to take one off the rail.
She took the key out of my hand and went into the room.
That gown I have had two years. She said, it was her gown; I said, it was not. I never saw the child I came from Somersetshire. I have not been five weeks in London.
I went in the shop and bought a yard of cotton at 3 s. 2 d. that gentleman followed me out, and told me to step back; he asked the shopman, if he missed any thing from off the counter; he said, no, he did not; the gentleman accused me of taking a piece of print. I never was before a magistrate in my life before.
I was sent by a woman to fetch some milk with this pot, for whom I was at work.
When I came out into the court I saw the prosecutor, he was intoxicated; he had two women by the side of him, and he was crying; he came to me just as I was going in doors, he said I had three one pound notes in my pocket; these women were after taking them out. I went in doors and came out again; there were six or eight women outside of the door; them I saw a piece of paper on the pavement, one of them stooped and picked it up; I went up stair and did not hear any more about it till they came up, searched me and the room, and took me to the watch-house.
He never saw me drop it. I never had it. I was washing and ironing for a woman, it amounted to six shillings; she came in and asked for the linen; he said she could not pay me without I went with her to Mr. Grove to sell some silk ferris to get change. I waited for her till such time she went out of the shop, and when we came out she ran away.. I have never seen her since.
I met the prosecutor in Rose-lane, he asked me where I was going; I said, home; he said, go on, I will follow you, he came up stairs; I asked him if he was going to give me any thing; he said, he would go and get more money; he went down stairs, some children were there that knew him, they said they would go and tell his wife; and then they came and took me, and charged me with robbing him; I said, I had none of his money, I took the tobacco box out of my pocket and gave it them; his wife said that is enough, I will swear that is his box.
The prosecutor asked me if I could tell him where to get a bed, I told him in Church-lane, where I lodged. I went and called the girl, I said, Jenny, this man wants a bed; she said it was one shilling and sixpence; he said, he had got only half-a-crown and some halfpence; he gave the girl a shilling; and after the girl went down stairs, he said he would give me eighteen pence to sleep with him; I said, I would not stop for eighteen pence; I never saw any more than the eighteen pence which he put in his pocket.
I took a pair of stockings there of my own to wash. I brought them away in a mistake of my own; I intended to bring them back again.
She gave me them things to get them washed for her.
They gave me the caps to get washed for them, and the ribbon my mistress gave so me.
I found that handkerchief in a room next line coach-office. I know they found the two towels upon me, I put them in my pocket, I meaned to return them; the bonnet is not my mistress's, nor any body in the house. I do not know that I wronged my mistress of two pence. The handkerchiefs were wrapped up in a bit of paper, and finding it in a public place I thought I had a right to it as well as any other person.
I went in to buy two handkerchiefs, which I paid for; and as I was coming out these two pieces stood outside of the shop door, I picked them up. This young gentleman followed me; he said, I had something that was not my property. I said, he might take them. When I was brought before the magistrate he was asked, if he could swear to them; he said, he could not, because there was something cut off them; at the same time he put a mark on them, then he said, he could swear to them.
I was coming along Holborn, at a little distance from the prosecutor's house, a woman came by and put it into my hand, I went after her the constable and a young man stopped me.
I bought the shoes of a woman in Shoreditch, I gave two shillings for them, and twenty one pence for the handkerchief.
I was very much distressed at the time I did it.
I met with a girl, she asked me to go in and ask for the pots.
I was at the Red Lion, Whitechapel, a woman asked me to go to this shop to sell the clothes; she said, she would go with me to the door, she had quarrelled with the woman a week before; she told me to ask one shilling and sixpence for them; she came with me to the door, I went in and asked her to buy the things; she immediately took hold of me. I never saw the child nor the woman before in my life.
I and my sister met this gentleman between ten and eleven in the day, he walked alongside of us, he asked us if we were not Irish; we told him we were; he talked about different parts that we knew in Ireland; he said he was once there, and was used very well; he asked us to have something to drink; we took something. We had a few little commissions, we called at several places; he treated the people; he acted very civil and good-natured, he behaved indeed foolish, he doubly paid them for every thing that we had to eat. We stopped in his company, I got a little intoxicated. I know nothing about his money.
That I know nothing about.
As I was coming past the wind blew the sheet off the bush she put it on, and I put it up again.
The counterpane and tablecloth I found in an apron, they laid upon a bush on the heath, that any body might steal them for three hours. I folded them up, and when the prosecutrix came, I said, they are not mine, if they are yours you may take them.
I leave it to to the generosity of the court.
I went into the shop to purchase two yards of print, I gave three shillings for it, and when I came out of the shop the gentleman brought me back, there was a great deal of print laying on the counter, another young woman stood there, the gentleman saw the print lay at a young woman's feet, they said I dropped it there.
I am an unfortunate girl of the town About half after eleven this man came to me and said, give me my property; I was coming up the yard; he struck me and called the watchman.
I was a servant. I went down into the country for three months to see my friends. On this day I met Mrs. Robinson; she gave me a glass of peppermint; she said she wanted to buy something for her children; she took me into this shop with her, I saw her bargaining for something, I took no notice, and went out; she came to me, and gave me the bundle, and told me to go on, she was going into the market to buy potatoes.
I was in liquor; I could not tell how I came by it. They took me to the watch house; I did not know where I came from. I never was guilty of a thing of the kind before.
Prisoner's Defence, I am perfectly innocent; that man has taken me for another woman.
I met with the lady, she gave me a crown piece to get some flannel; she gave me these pieces to carry.
I throw myself on the mercy of the court.
I was at the corner of Noble-street, the woman gave me a five shilling paper of halfpence; I came home and went to get a pint of beer, the paper of halfpence fell out of my hand, she called me a thief.
I was going to pledge my shawl, going into the shop I picked up this gown.
I became acquainted with my prosecutor, he has three children, he repeatedly sent me with things to pawn, to support them, he told me to take any thing to support the children; the week before, he sent me with a tea-pot and a milk pot, he looked upon me as his wife, and he took that liberty with me; and what I have done, I did for the support of the children; I have been in the habit of working for them, for which I never received a farthing.
I throw myself on your Lordship's mercy, and the gentlemen of the jury.
This woman keeps a house of ill fame, she induced me to live with her. One night she ill used me and beat me, I came away, and these things I was to wear. She keeps several bad girls in the house, I was one.
I did not mean to take them, the handkerchief I put in my box in a mistake.
I did not take the pinafore off.
I was very much in liquor; I did not know that I had the gown in my handkerchief.
I picked them up going along.
The sheets were very old; I had got one about me as an apron; the tea-kettle I took out to get water, I lost that; the pail I lent to a Jack-ass man, the ass knocked it to pieces in the stable; the bolster I was willing to pay for, and the tea-kettle and the pail; the other sheet had one good piece in it, I tore it up for a towel.
That is a house of unfortunate girls. He gave me the notes and told me to pay for the last half pint of rum.
I left every thing in the room when I left it.
I am innocent.
I beg the benefit of the statute.
I took this money on Lord Mayor's day, it was a dark day, and I am no judge of money. I was a little tipsey, they are spiteful against me and wrong me very much; there was a woman her last night that saw me take the three shilling pieces.
I went out to service at the age of sixteen years. I was in my first place five years. I was at another place two years; from there I went to another, and continued eight years in this place. I purchased a quarter of a hundred in the 3 per cent. stock, in the Bank. I had a profitable place of it. I had money in the Bank. I sold it out to the\\ amountof more than was found upon me.
I went down the gateway. I was going to see two persons off by the Exeter coach. It was better than half after six in the morning. As I went down the yard I met a man with a load. He offered me the bundle. I know no more of it than you do.
I beg for mercy.
I went to her as a lodger. I was to give her two guineas a-week. There were two more ladies in the house. They left the house two days before I left.
Was I ever in your shop
I know nothing at all about it. The gentleman laid hold of me, and the cloak laid on the ground.
Last Wednesday, was a week, I was going home. I was going home in the morning, between two and three o'clock. I met that man: he asked me, where I was going. I said, home. I went home, and took a candle with me. He said, could I get any thing to drink. I said, yes. I took a bottle and got a quartern of rum. He asked me, if I should like to go on board a ship. I said, yes. He took out a pocket-book, and two watches. He told me, if I wanted any thing he had plenty of money. He said, how much will get your clothes. I said, about three pounds. He said, take all; buy what you want, and take care of the rest.. He said, take care of the money, and make haste back. I went to Westminster, and spent four pounds buying me things. I was coming home with the two ten-pound notes: if I had intended to rob him, I could have taken the two watches. He was very tipsy.
I went into this shop to buy callico. I bought it. I put my hand into my pocket to pay for the calico, and instead of putting the calico into my pocket I put the muslin, and when I found it I knew it did not belong to me. I threw it down.
It is my first offence. I was very much intoxicated at the time I took it.
Distress drove me to do it.
Them pots were laying in the mews two days before I touched them, and very dirty they were.
I was going to get my child from school. I met a woman; she desired me to take care of them pots, and not to let any body see them. She said, the man was coming out to fetch the pots in himself; she did not want him to see them.
I pray for the mercy of the court.
I became acquainted with the prosecutor, through his wife washing some linen for me. When I met with him I was a little distressed. I wrote to a friend, who knew me in better circumstances. My friend sent me a two-pound note. The prosecutor asked me to lend him fifteen shillings; and the few things he had in the room, he said he would put in my possession. He told me, if he did not pay me the fifteen shillings by the Saturday following I might do with the things as I liked: and I seeing him spending money on the Friday, I asked him if he could pay me the money on the next day. He said, no, he had not a shilling. On the Saturday morning I told him I must have the money. I fetched Mr. Martin, the broker. He gave me half a guinea for the things. I waited the whole day. The prosecutor did not come in. Two or three days after, I went to look for the prosecutor. I could not see him. Afterwards the prosecutor took a warrant out against me. He claimed two pounds for his furniture. The broker came before the magistrate, and declared that he gave a fair price. He only gave half a guinea. After that he followed me to this prison, and said, if I would give a pound, he would let me free. I wrote to a friend for a pound. The friend would not lend it me. I have now to lament that ever I became acquainted with them.
I worked for that woman three or four years. She often paid me in farthings. I had been some time gathering that money up to buy me an apron.
I was discharged by the magistrate, and she sent me to prison again.
I was in great distress when I went into the shop. I beg for mercy.
Prisoner's Defence, I was in distress.
I would wish to have the property I am going to suffer for.
It is all malice; on this day this woman came to me to pawn a petticoat for her; I did, for three shillings and sixpence; she asked me to go to the club with them; we were all in liquor; she was not able to stand. I had always a suspicion that she went with my husband, and when my husband informed me that she accused me of taking two pounds worth of halfpence, I went to her and said I would have it settled; I know nothing of the halfpence; she lodged with me all the time my husband was abroad. I never saw her with a halfpenny.
I wish to know the reason you knew me
Can you swear that you saw me throw them away
You swore before the magistrate that you picked them up, and now you say Mr. Cole's shopman picked them up.
I had but that one shilling I offered. Not one of them that they found belonged to me; neither can they say truly that they saw me throw any away.
An acquaintance of mine that I had known five years, asked me to pledge the pantaloons. I went to this man's; she presented them to the pawnbroker. I never stole them at all, and the other woman I have never heard of again.
Some of the articles belong to me.
I was very much in distress. I applied to the parish to take my child; they refused. I have a bad state of health, and am very poor. I am not able to go to service.
Did not you put the clothes in my trunk yourself
I gave six shillings for the petticoat and gown to this woman.
The prosecutrix lives by prostitution. She lent me the ear-rings to go to Vauxhall.
I was out on bail. I surrendered myself for the trial.
I did not take the cotton at all. When I was at the door, the cotton dropped off a chair at the door.
I took them out of a basket. She went to Vauxhall. She desired me not to put the chain across the door. I did She could not come in, so we had a falling out. I had neither tea or sugar. I went to get a friend to take them out; they would not give me time. I am a relation to the old Lord; he is not in town.
I brought them from Hammersmith. They took me on suspicion; that is all.
I left my box at Miss Richardson's house; how these muslins came in my box I can't say. The lace and the broach, she told me she thought the other servant had taken it out of the house before I came there.
If I have done any thing, it was through necessity.
This woman asked me to pawn this shirt. I have known her for years. I said, Mrs. Rapp, is it your own; she said, what do you ask for; do you think I stole it.
I am sorry for what I have done.
I was very much in liquor. I took the pot home in a mistake.
I did pawn the spoons. I asked my mistress for some money. She refused me. I was obliged to pay money that day. My master told me, if I would tell him where they were he would never do any thing to me, and the constable said the same.
I had been drinking. I was not in my senses.
I was in liquor. I did not know how I came by that counterpane.
I lost my way. I do not know any thing about it.
I laid my cloth on the counter, and I must have taken it up with my cloth in a mistake.
I did not leave the apartment. I went out one morning, Mrs. Taylor went into my room, and took what things I had in my room. I should have got the things, according to agreement, if she had given me time.
I lived in the prosecutrix's house three years ago. Her servant had a child, and I had the cap of her, not knowing it was Mrs. Brown's.
I leave myself to the mercy of the court.
A woman gave me the tub; she said she had just bought it. A gentleman came up to me; he said, this is my tub. I said, is it; take it.
I was in a little trouble. I picked them up. I did not know what I was doing of.
I pledged the spoon at Mr. Cotton's. The person that worked with me gave me the spoon.
I pledged a pair of sheets and a pair of blankets.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court. It is my first offence.
When the young man came up in my room I asked him, what he was going to give me. He said, he had no money. I said, I am an unfortunate girl, I must have money. He then said, he would leave me his coat. He took his coat off, and said he would call in a day or two. On Tuesday morning he came and said, come along with me to Bow-street. I took him to the pawnbrokers, where I had pawned the coat. I am innocent of robbing him of his coat.
A woman gave me these things; she said, she lived in a one pair room, No. 4, Mill-yard. She told me to take them up two pair of stairs, and leave them there for her. I did. I told the woman in the two pair, the woman in the one pair ordered me to leave them. She would not take them in. A young man came up stairs; they kept me in custody till an officer came.
I do not remember taking any money at all. I did not spend it. I must have lost it.
May it please your lordship, gentlemen of the jury, the tablecloth was not used in common; it was used only when we had company. I had not put this tablecloth in its proper place. I put the tablecloth there for safety until I returned from Bath. I knew I should not have Mrs. Deering's keys to put it away before.
I know nothing of the sheets.
I thought I had the shawl that I paid for when I was coming out of the shop.
I know I got charge at Mr. Lucas's. I met one of the brothers; I asked him to go with me. He knows nothing of it.
It is my first offence.
I have not seen these things at all. I have been out frequently from twelve o'clock in the day until five o'clock in the evening. I should not have sent that woman if I had intended to pledge them.
I am as innocent as a new born baby. I never saw the prosecutrix before.
I was out of employ. I did it through distress. I have got two children.
My mistress told me if I would tell her the truth she would take me back.
It was really through distress that I did it. I had not earned above two shillings for two months.
I picked up this gentleman in the New-road; he asked me if I would go and get anything to drink; he gave me fourpence. I brought out a quartern of gin, and at Baker-street he fell down. I picked up his hat and put it on his head, and I picked up this note. If I had stolen it I should not have changed it in the neighbourhood. I did not rob Mr. Hornsby. He behaved very rude.
When this gentleman accused me of taking the money, I said, send for an officer. He said, he would not. I said, search. The watchman was coming round; I said, call the watchman, and you give charge of me. I am quite innocent of it.
I did not take the thing out of Mrs. Grummell's apartment. I saw the bundle lay between the parlour door and the stairs. It was distress made me do it.
I never touched the fowl, nor saw it until it was shewn me.
I am entirely innocent of doing it, or intending to do it.
I told him I gave ten shillings for the gown piece, and told him where I bought it.
I am entirely innocent of the charge.
I have six small children. I hope you will be merciful to me. I have no husband.
My landlady knew of my pawning the things. She said she would wait until my work came in and she would not hurt me. She has got my working things in her possession now.
He asked me if I would have anything to drink. I said, no. He took me into a public-house and gave me a glass of spirits. I wished him good night, and went away. He came to me in the morning, and said I had robbed him. He said, if I did not give it him he would put an end to my existence.
My mistress gave me the milk to take home for my supper.
I was rather in liquor at the time. I am very sorry I have done it.
I did it through distress.
I know nothing of the shawl. I never saw it in my life.
I am innocent. I am a poor hard-working woman.
I picked up the cloth in the afternoon, on the road. As to the pail, I brought it home full of water, being in liquor.
When I came into the shop, I asked for a quire of paper. I gave him half-a-crown, and in about half an hour after the young man picked up these six shillings, several people came in the shop. I told them I never saw the shillings until I saw them in his hands.
I happened to be in distress I took the coat up in the passage and put it into my apron. I met the gentleman with it.
I never saw the money nor touched it, the money I had was my own property I had it gave me, I thought it was a one pound note when I came to look at it, it was a twenty pound note.
I did sleep there two nights, I do not remember saying I should sleep there three nights.
I sent for a coach; she said, I should not have the box until the box was examined; my master told me my wages was safe, and if I died my child should have it. Gentleman, my mistress looked over my box, and found nothing but my own property. I missed a little tin box that contained three one-pound notes, and a two-pound note; I had a cloak, my mistress took a fancy to, and tried it on, and pursuaded me to move it from that box to one where it might lay strait, and when different people came for money my master used to write a note, and I was pretended to be sent for the money, and to come back and say the people were not at home.
I had no money, I was very poorly indeed; I took a cap and tippet to sell in the Minories, as Swaine would not get his wages on board a ship until Saturday; I went to sell them until he brought me some money home on Saturday night, and when I got into the Minories, I was taken very ill; Mary Brown , the woman in the green bonnet, that says her name is Fisher, she met me, and asked me what was the matter; I told her I was going to be brought a-bed; she said, no, nonsense, come along with me, I will give you a glass of liquor; I went; she gave me a glass of liquor; it made me worse; she took me to her room, and desired me to set on her bed; she fetched a doctor; I was delivered there. The doctor carried me down stairs, and put me into a coach; I went down the steps of the building as well as I could. My mother said I had been gone long; I said I had; she gave me a glass of brandy, and put me to bed.
I was intoxicated I knew nothing of the trunk, nor did I ever see it until I saw it at Hatton-garden-office.
I was in liquor at the time.
I did not have the hair belonging to any person whatever. It was found on the counter.
I did not take them with intent to keep them.
The prosecutor gave me his coat to pledge. I pledged it for ten shillings; he had four shillings out of it.
The gentleman came into the shop and took the two pieces of ribbon off the stool, he said they were the pieces that I had in my pocket; I never had them in my pocket.
I was a little intoxicated, a woman asked me to go into the shop with her, she asked to buy a boy's hat.
I have nothing to say for myself.
My lord, I am truly innocent of all the charge, as God is my witness; I am innocent, indeed I am; I liked my place, I was very comfortable; as to my master saying I did not assist him, I was too ill. I had no concern with the drawer at all; when I wanted a piece of paper I always asked for it.
I pledged these things with intent to get them back again.
I was passing Mr. Darvells, shop; I picked up this print outside of the door; I had no apron on.
I meaned to replace the articles as soon as I had my money.
I took the child to a gentleman's house to get some money.
A man left it at our house, I never bought it.
I bought the gown in Petticoat-lane.
I pawned the counterpane for a sailor, he said it was his own.
I had seven shillings in my pocket to pay for it, and halfpence besides.
The humble petition of Elizabeth Green, sheweth, that she is an unfortunate woman, and rented a room of the prosecutrix, for the weekly sum of four shillings and sixpence; that your petitioner always most punctually paid her rent, until this time, when she was driven by distress to commit the act which has brought her before this bar. She fully intended, and told the prosecutrix that she would, leave every thing as she found it. I was about to go and get these things out, when the officer took me into custody, and I surrendered up the tickets freely, and without hesitation. By receiving the mercy of the honourable judge and jury, your petitioner will for ever feel bound to pray.
Mr. Johnson never saw me in the butcher's shop. I found the three shillings wrapped up in a piece of paper.
Prisoner's Defence, I took the ribbon by mistake.
I found them in the street.
He made love to me, and gave me the watch in the way of courtship, and I was glad to accept of the present.
I was sent for this wheelbarrow by two women, whom I knew, and did not know it was not theirs.
I was going along, and a porter with a load, pushed me against the carpet, and knocked it down; and I was going to put it up again, when they stopped me.
My Lord, I had a friend at Portsmouth whom I wished to see, my mistress would not let me go, so I went without leave.
I had been to carry a parcel, and as I was returning the gentleman laid hold of me and said I took the handkerchief.
I am a distressed widow, with six children. I beg the mercy of the Court and Jury.
Friday night was the first time that I was asked about this. They kept me confined in the house, and I never went out until I went with the officer; and then Mr. Prosser said, would it not be better for me to be in my own bed, and that if I would confess it I should be let loose, and I did confess it.
To deny this charge would only be aggravating the offence; I had no criminal intention in taking the property; I had been pressed for a small debt. I pledged the property, meaning to take it out when I had more money, which I very soon expected. The money was offered to the prosecutor to take the things out of pledge, but he would not accept it. The magistrate wanted them to refrain from prosecuting me, and take the money. I earnestly implore the court to have mercy upon me; I hope I shall never transgress again.
I never knew any thing about the note. I was never inside the shop. The prosecutrix came to me and said, she had found the note at a linen-draper's shop, and that the man would know the person again. I asked her to go with me, but she would not; I got a neighbour to go with me; I asked the man if he knew me? - he said, no; the prosecutrix came in; she was looking at some gingham, and she said, that I had got a piece of it; the shopman then said, I must be the person.
Have you never seen me within the last fourteen years in the Borough
Could nobody have taken the child but me
Have you not seen me for these thirteen years
I did not steal the clothes or the child.
I was going past the door, and saw the print; a little girl came up and asked me, if she gave it me, would I have it; and she gave it to me.
I throw myself upon the mercy of the Court.
The prosecutrix lent me the things to pawn for her.
I pledged them from distress. I offered to take them out on Saturday.
Did you not say, that you could not swear to the fringe
I bought the bonnet ready trimmed.
A woman told me to take them.
I dropped the dollar; the prosecutor was looking at it at the bar, and I took it from him.
I met a man and his wife; she sent me up for the sheets.
I beg for mercy, not for myself, but for two fatherless children.
I offered her 2s. 6d. for the shift, she said she could not take it. I was going out of the shop. I did not take the shift.
The man gave me the money.
He gave me the shilling to get some bread and cheese.
He laid hold of me, and said he wanted to speak to me, I would not have any thing to say to him; he then said, I had taken his ring.
I stood at the door half an hour for them to search me.
I could not get my money, and was in distress.
I deal in clothes, and bought it of a man at the corner of Burton-street, for 1l. 5s.
The thimble was lent to me, I know nothing of the other things.
He gave me the guinea; I never had the watch.
I picked it up.
He gave me six shillings, and wanted his money back again.
He gave me all the money he had; he pulled me about, and I called watch, he then gave me in charge.
I found the note on the bed.
I had 2l. in my pocket to pay for them; I left my boy playing at the door - I went about two yards from the door, and she laid hold of me. I did not intend to steal them.
Mrs. Jenkins gave me leave to pledge the things.
I am innocent.
I bought one pair, and took another pair to the door to see if they were stronger.
I was not in the room; the constable has spoken false.
I found them in the yard.
A man asked me to carry it to Rosemary-lane.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
They fell down, and I picked them up.
He gave it to me, and wanted it back. I refused, and he gave me in charge.
I intended to return them. I unfortunately committed the act having been left with two children.
I was in liquor.
I did not intend to rob him.
The blow stunned me, and I did not know what I did; nor did I know what I had done until I saw him fall.
It did not drop from me. The woman told me to see if any person was coming after her.
I never saw the girl before.
Did I not fall down stairs about a week before
I have been in town but three weeks. The piece of handkerchief got entangled with my bundle.
A man got me to sell them.
They have sworn falsely against me.
I have been only thirteen months in London.
Do you not let your house out to prostitntes
The prosecutrix robbed a gentleman, he charged me with it, and I ran away.
It is not the prosecutor's property.
I met a gentleman in Leicesterfields, who took me to a house, asked me to meet him again on Saturday, and gave me the note. I was going to the Edgeware-road, and went into the prosecutor's shop, where I had frequently been before. for grocery to take to my daughter. I turned towards the Edgeware-road, but thought it was too late to go, when I returned, and was making the best of my way to Blackfriars-road, where my daughter was apprenticed, and the officer took me. I told the prosecutor I had lived in Mary's-place, but now lived in George-street, Fitzroy-square. I did not give the right address, not wishing to disgrace my family, as I knew how I got the note. I did not know that I was being followed.
I know nothing of it, and have witnesses to call.
I never pledged them.
I picked the bundle up.
I never saw his money.
I am sorry for it.
I could not get my wages-the prosecutrix told me to pledge them. She keeps a house of ill fame.
I went to see a person in the first floor, and found the coat in the dust-hole. I thought it was thrown away.
I bought it of a Jew.
She gave me the shoes.
I picked it up outside the door.
I know nothing of it.
I know nothing about the gowns.
I left the prosecutor at the public-house in company with two women; I afterwards saw a mob in the street, and was taken-nothing was found on me. I know nothing of it.
I beg for mercy.
He gave it to me.
I was going to Fulham to receive 8s., I saw Gordon at eight o'clock, very drunk, he gave me the crooked halfpence to get some porter, the publican would not take them; as I returned I went to the tollhouse, and tried to awoke him, as I came out I was taken.
She lent me the handkerchief.
A woman brought it out, and gave it to me carry.
I was taking care of her house. There was no money to buy her children any victuals. Her husband told me to pledge them to feed the children. She was not in prison for debt.
They were both intoxicated, and gave me the watch; they behaved improperly to me, and left the room. NOT GUILTY .
I intended to redeem them.
What wages did you give me
My sister gave me the things.
Did you not find your child better dressed and better fed, than when it was with you
I have been married twenty-three years, and have a good character. I did not take the child with intent to steal it; I treated it very kind, and meant to return it to its mother.
The evening before, I had some words at home, and went out; I fell in company with two young men at a public-house, and told them I was out of work. They said if I would meet them at the corner of Bernard-street at six o'clock they would get me work. I met them; they sent me down to the scullery for the bag. The patrol came and caught me on the steps.
I was returning from Dean-street, heard the call of Thieves! went up the gateway, and the prosecutor laid hold of a man, who got from him - he took me, and pulled me down. A woman brought the watch, and said she saw a man drop it, who went towards Holborn.
I bought them.
I picked it up.
I picked up a bundle, containing the matches and things.
I leave it to the Court.
I met a person in Oxford-street, who asked me to go and pledge the coat at Brooks's
I am not the person. I never saw the prosecutrix. The other woman was not taken into custody. I asked her to go with me, and she did.
I meant to pay it, but was taken in by a man.
I was in great distress.
I had the money from a gentleman.
I did not take it.
Did you not go home with me
The prosecutor went home with me, and was three-quarters of an hour there. In about half an hour afterwards I found the watch in my room, and shewed it to Weir - she said if the gentleman called she would give it to him, but it being left in her house she had the best right to it.
Did you not send a boy with the note to a neighbour to see if it was good
Was not the note handed to several persons, and compared with two or three more
Was not the note given into several person's hands
I was coming from Salisbury, and met a bargeman at Brentford. I was in distress, and he gave me the note to stop with him till the morning. He said his name was Jones, and gave the me address which I have given, as I had no residence of my own.
I was intoxicated.
I found them in the street.
He left it instead of money.
I was in want of money.
I was sitting with the landlady, who was very ill. The prisoner came in, and said he should not know the person. He was going to swear to another woman.
He said he had only 1 s.
There were four servants in the house.
I gave her 3 l. 10 s. for them - the landlady saw me pay her 10 s. in part.
He gave me the money in my room.
The prosecutrix took me home to tea, but I saw no silk.
I brought it back at four o'clock, and did not take it out again.
I never saw the property; I went to enquire for one Carpenter.
I met a woman while I was seeing the Lord Mayor's shew. She sent me for them.
He kept me company from Wednesday till Friday, and told me to pawn the watch, or he could not pay for the ale.
I am in great distress.
I did not take the blanket or sheet.
I was going into the Borough, and in Whitecross-street the cans stood at the door. I wanted to have a bit of lark with the woman, as another woman told me to do it, and said she knew her. I carried them home, as I could not find her.
I was going through the yard, and picked it up, and she said I stole it.
It slipped down, and I picked it up.
I did not take it.
I beg for mercy.
You came on Monday, and asked the boy if he knew me
I bought the things of a woman, who had a child in her arms, and said she had burried her husband the day before - was in great distress, and was going into the country.
I was not insane - the reason I made my escape was, that I might not go back to the Penitentiary.
He gave me the notes.
The prosecutor called me in, and gave this girl sixpence to fetch gin - his wife and he had a glass. The girl said if I went away her father would beat her, for bringing 3 1/2 d. gin instead of 4 d. Presently they charged me with this. I never saw it.
He was very much in liquor, he offered less money than I would have, and then he charged me with the robbery.
I am sorry for it - it is my first offence.
It laid by the door folded up.
He came up to me and said, a woman who had been with him had stolen his money and clothes; I was tipsy, and broke some panes of glass, and was taken in custody for that.
I say it is false. I was talking to these young women, who I knew by sight. The two gentlemen came up and began talking to them. I walked away, he followed, and said I robbed him.
I went to pawn an apron; the other woman pushed something off the guard and gave it me; when I came out I went to pawn them.
I do not think my mistress ever lost any thing, she is a very suspicious woman; she once said she had lost her husband's shirt, and I saw her take it out of the drawers herself.
He was in liquor - he said he had been drinking all that evening. I have a bad knee, and and cannot run.
She gave me the second pair of sheets to pawn to redeem the others. She insisted on my leaving the house. I wanted to stop till I had a remittance to redeem the goods.
On Friday I asked her to lend me 2 s. She said she could not, but would lend me any thing to get money on. She lent me a scarf and frock, which I pawned, and gave her the duplicate.
I am in great distress, my husband has left me.
I was in the passage when they brought them up; I never had them.
I pawned it by her desire to get money for drink; she afterwards went with me to get the duplicate altered in her name. After I was in charge, she said, if I could get 20 s. she would set me at liberty.
I asked him to change an egg, he threw it at me, and said he would be revenged, and when I went on that day, he said I had stolen the bacon, but I paid for it.
Babb gave them to me to enlarge for her husband. Whether you give me seven or fourteen years, or hang me, I will speak the truth. She said she was embarrased, and asked me to assist in moving her furniture; I agreed, but in a few days, I thought it improper, and told her I declined it, but took an oath not to divulge it. She said she would serve me out. I said I depended on my needle, and hoped she would not injure my character. I saw no more of her till she took me in custody.
I was out of a situation, a person came and asked me to assist in cleaning a house - I went in, the man came and gave me in charge.
My husband made some mats, and I sold them about the town. I went to this house, and asked if she wanted any. I asked the price of a bit of cheque, and went out, and came to an archway, where a man asked me to take this cloth for him, and he would pay me - the lady came up, and would not let me stop for the man who gave it to me.
Have not other people access to the room
The child has sworn falsely.
I never wished to injure her. I heard she had missed the things as I was going home, and did not like to go. My husband allows me 3 s. a week - I meant to let that run till I could redeem them.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
I did not have the bonnet on; one of the lodgers asked me to take a cup of tea in his room, my husband came and found me with him, and sent me up stairs and give me a kick. I borrowed this bonnet just to run out of his way, and as to the cap I have had it many years.
I do not disown any thing.
I never pawned them.
I beg to say it is the first time I was ever confined; any one might enter the room we were in, by getting over the partition, or pushing the bolt back; the house bears a most infamous character. I got up in the morning to get some drink, and met an acquaintance who I drank with, and got intoxicated.
They were playing about, I asked them to go to Symond-inn and did not do them any harm, the biggest child, took me down the place to buy cakes, instead of me taking them. I did not think it any harm to send them where I had sent different children before. I told the man I had been in company with people in Surry-street, and he said I said I was going to take the children there. At the first hearing, the child was brought full dressed, and at the second hearing, it was brought meanly dressed, as I first saw it.
He gave the other woman the stockings, and she put them on. He gave me the other things, and told me to leave them there.
I know nothing about the things.
Mrs. Brown lent me the apron on the Friday. I know nothing of the coat and waistcoat.
I was taken in a fit, and did not know where I was - I sent her a letter to come for the child.
A parcel of boys knocked the tub down, nobody came to it, I took it up, and said that I would take it home.
I took the penny-piece of Mr. Thompson, of Charing-cross.
Did I say the child was mine
I met a man whom I had not seen for two or three years, he took me to Oxford-street. I met this child child crying, and two or three people round it, it wanted to go home, I asked where it lived, it could not tell. I took it down two or three streets to see if any one owned it.
It was a handful of beans which I took out. I never took a halfpenny from any one.
I unfortunately met a friend who gave me more to drink than did me good. I did not know what I did.
He gave it me to keep till morning, I walked off with it.
I drank with him and was in his company four hours, and went with him to several different houses, and went to a public-house where he was dancing - I came out and left him there.
He took me to this house, and refused to give me three shillings which he promised; and locked me in. I went to the window to call the watchman. I concealed my own money in my hair. I never saw a farthing of his money.
It is all false. I never saw them till it was brought to the office.
She knew I pawned them.
I bought sixpenny-worth of giblets, and left my coat. I went into the shop, nobody was there but a lady reading. I took the coat and said, \Thank you;\" it rained, and I put it over my head, found it was not mine, and was coming back with it."
I picked it up.
On the Thursday before the robbery, I was next door and returned about eight o'clock, the street door was open, and I lost some shifts, stockings, and four sovereigns. Another box was robbed of several things, and a counterpane of my master's - they said next day they had lost a purse, containing twenty guineas, and hoped I would keep it secret, or they would be discharged, I agreed. As to the things, I do not know how I became possessed of them, unless they got mixed with mine at the mangle. The prosecutrix was much embittered against me for not conniving at her changing some feathers out of the bed - she said she would be my destruction, unless I gave her a sum of money.
I saw a bundle on the ground, a woman advised me to pick it up, which I did, and two women came and asked what I had got. One key belonged to my lodging, and the others to a shop and parlour which I had taken.
I intended to return them when I got money..
He gave them to me, I refused to go with him, and he gave me in charge.
I met a gentleman who gave them to me. I did not know they were bad.
Mrs. Hesse promised not to hurt me, and said she would take the money by instalments, at 6 d. a-week. I paid the first 6 d.
I pawned them for a man.
I never saw him in my life, till they took me.
I picked it up.
He says it was Thursday; it was Friday.
He said I should go away that night, and so I took him at his word. I sent my things home. The spoons were safe after I left. I went the next night for my money, this woman called me to the pawnbroker's and asked me pawn a spoon for her.
I took this woman two pillows; she gave me 6 s. for them, and told me to bring as many more as I could, and she would buy them.
I went to Moss's to pawn some clothes, and saw a respectable woman at the door. I went to Harris's and saw her there also; and when I came out, she asked me to pawn the spoons for a sovereign; they would only give me 16 s., and I took them to Ashman's. I did not say they were my own.
I have two children.
He was drunk, I never touched him.
I took the pillows to lay under my head, and told her I had them.
I put my hand in my pocket, he came round, and sent for a constable. Is it feasible if I threw it away, that he should search me?
I went to have something to drink, this man came in, he said he had been drinking with several friends; he had a woman with him; he took me up the court - I returned to the house for my pattens; he came and said he had lost this money, and I must go to the watch-house.
I did not know the consequence, or I should not have done it.
The man who was with him has been imprisoned two years; they came several times to me, I refused to have any thing to do with it; the man came on Saturday night with this parcel, and said this man would call for it at eight o'clock,
I was from my husband five years and seven months; and did not know but he was dead.
I leave it to your mercy.
I came into your room; told you I was going on an errand, and asked you to take charge of my room
I have not been in this country eighteen months.
I never saw this woman till she was following Jacobs, and came behind him, and took something from him, and the watchman saw her.
It is false that I was ever in the middle of the street - or said I would give charge of him.
All I have to say is, that when I was here before I told the truth; when I was at the office all the blunder I made was, the watchman said it did not matter whether I said where I was going, and at the office I said I was going for a pail of water; but before you, my Lord, I told the truth.
I never saw him before.
I never touched him, as true as I am here. Coulton is the man who took it from his pocket.
I found it.
I got in liquor, the boys threw mud at me, I fled for refuge to Williams's; and in the morning my clothes not being dry, I took the liberty of using hers.
I was distressed.
I saw it lay by the shop.
He gave me the money to go home with him.
When I get drank I do not know what I do.
The boy took it from the till, and gave it me.
While Mrs. Watkins was at the door, did not Johnson get up
Did you ever see me move
You came into the room with an old man, did not the old man charge you with being pursued from Sloane-square with two thieves
I came from the country; I had been to Chelsea two days, and went to my friends who could not keep me; I went to a public-house, Johnson, a man, and woman were there, they made me drink with them; I enquired of them for a lodging, Johnson said he could recommend me to Mr. Watkins; I said I had rather go with a woman - he went out, returned, and said he had mentioned it to Mrs. Watkins, and had said I was a friend of his, and told me not to contradict it; I gave him 6 d. for the bed; he said I could not have one unless he slept with a single man; I went to the house, but never said I was his wife or any thing of the sort; two boys came in soon after. Mrs. Watkins went to answer a knock; Johnson rose and went out at the private door without speaking to me; when she returned, I asked where he was, she said he was gone out; I said he went out at that door, she said,
she went out to fetch liquor for a man and woman, they were drunk, and she put them to bed; I went to bed, fell asleep, and heard the boys saying
They said a watch was lost; I said I was as innocent as a child unborn.
I wish the prosecutrix to produce the duplicates of the things I have pawned for her - her husband could not go into the country till I had pawned the things for 30 s.; I pawned these things for her.
It was never in my pocket, it dropped from the stool to the ground.
I know nothing of it.
He gave me the money, I thought it was silver, and when I found it was gold, I had not honesty enough to return it.
I was in great distress.
There was a man in the room
They wanted me to swear the man took it - she owes me a spite.
I know nothing about it.
He gave it me to fetch liquor; I met a friend and did not return with the change, so soon as I ought.
Any one might take the sixpence off the shelf.
I bought the shawl a long time ago - it is not my own but was given me to pawn.
She gave me leave to pawn them, as she had no money to pay me. I have often pawned for her.
She gave it me to pawn to get her liquor..
I picked them up.
They were put into my box.
I took them to relieve my distress. My mistress keeps a house of ill fame, and sent me out with the rest of the girls. She offered not to prosecute me if I came back.
I never saw him or his things.
I leave it to the mercy of the Court.
The article lay at the side of the door, and it had footmarks on it where the people trod on it. I was not in the shop.
She gave me the stays because they were too tight for her; also the pockets - I have worn them in her presence, and she gave me the cloak as she had no money.
I get my living at upholstery business. I gave up the key of my lodgings, and several pieces of calico were found, which I had taken out of pawn at Dobree's, in Bloomsbury-steps - I make it up to sell. Mine was 1 s. a yard, and her's only 6 d.
Was you not in company with one Irish Ellen
I had liver in my hand, and if the ribbon had been in my pocket, it must have been all over blood - my pocket was very small.
Did you not send me to pawn it
She gave it to me to pawn, and I pawned it in my own name, not knowing her's, for she first married the father and then the son - she is an infamous woman; she starved me and the boy for four days, and when we were going to leave, she said she would floor us - she lives with Crawley, the fighter.
You and I were out drinking, and you sent me to pawn them
We had been drinking together all the morning; she sent me to pawn them, and afterwards to get another shilling on them.
I know nothing about many of them.
It was a mistake.
Had you not been drinking gin with me
She said I might pawn it, if I redeemed it next day. We were drinking together.
My mistress had me taken to Hatton-garden for an assault, and I was discharged - she said she would be revenged.
At the first hearing, she said she dropped it from her hand. Wood said to her,
\You say the same as I do.\""
Did you meet me before four o'clock in the morning
We walked about, and went home to lay down. She gave me the ear-rings to pawn, but they would not take them in, and I took the shawl instead, as she owed me 8 d.
The watch was put into my hand by a woman unknown, so suddenly that I cannot describe her.
I met a man who I believe to be the prosecutor - he gave me some beer, then took me home with him; we were both in liquor; he took me up stairs, and after being a short time with him, I asked for money; he told me to take what things I thought proper, as it was his lodging. Not knowing the way down, I opened another door, and this young lady came out.
I had words with the landlord, and left. I returned for my things, and found these on the stairs.
Was I out on the 4th
The lodger came down and gave it me to pawn, and said she would give me the money to redeem it on Monday - I often pawn things for her; her name is Turtle. Lowe keeps a house of ill-fame.
Could I not have gone away with case if I liked
I went to pawn an article for 6 s., he offered 4 s. I turned down the court, and finding it no thoroughfare, I returned, and met him - he asked me to walk back, which I did; he examined my parcel, and then begged my pardon. Two women in the shop said, they saw it taken, but could not say it was me; he desired me to go about my business, and I was angry at being accused. The young man brought the things in, and said he would detain me for my impudence.
Was I not comparing the ribbons
I was comparing two pieces, and she took one out of my hand, and said I was going to steal it.
I met a woman, who said she had a duplicate of four spoons, to sell, and asked me to buy it - I gave her 5 s. 6 d. for it; they were pawned for 15 s. I redeemed them, and pawned them again to buy clothes to go into Mr. Hodson's service.
Were you not tipsy
I met him about eleven o'clock, very tipsy; he would kiss, me, and in so doing his hat fell off. We went into the Queen's Head, public-house, and had a glass each; he began to be very sick, and said he would go home with me all night - I said he should not, he said if I did not give him a lodging, he would give me one. The watchman came up, and he had the purse in his hand all the while.
I recollect nothing of it till I found myself in the watch-house in the morning.
I did not take them; though I sold them.
I went to the door for my things. I found the servant had been warned against my calling. I gave the door a push, and walked in - she screamed out - her mistress came down, and a constable was fetched. I was shewn into the parlour, where the bundle was. Mrs. Rowley requested the constable to turn me out of the room, which he did, and I could not see my things examined. I did not like to give up the key of my box, as I was not allowed to see my things, so I ran to the door to tell the neighbours. The moment the box was opened, Mrs. Rowley fell back, and pretended to go into a fit. I looked at her instead of the box. I turned round, saw the fork, and said, \Oh! you wicked woman.\""
I unfortuneately engaged in this situation. The witness had a good character of me, from Bury-street, St. James. I found this a house of ill-fame, and told her I would have her severly punished for hiring me - she and three women came down and ill-treated me. I was obliged to lock myself up in my room all night, and left them next morning, called afterwards for my clothes, and on Wednesday called for 3 s. they owed me, and was taken into custody.
I had been drinking with two women; this gentleman came up, spoke to one of them, and turned up a passage with her, stopped there some time, came back, and said he had lost his watch, and they were going to take me - I fell down and resisted, but never had it.
I met him and another man, they took me to a public-house, and treated me; the other man asked him to pay for the liquor; he said he had no money. I left them, and met him again; he took me to this house, and said he only had 2 s., gave me one, and the landlady the other - his money was not found on me. I had three half-crowns of my own.
Did you not give it to me, and tell me to do what I thought proper with it
He gave it to me.
I am innocent.
Before my late mistress died - she said my present master and mistress were to pay my doctor's bill, as no nurse had been employed, and I had injured my health by attending to her. After her death, a renewal of my complaint increased the bill - it amounted to 3 l. 9 s., my present mistress said my wages should be stopped to finish payment of the bill - I objected to it, and they were going to part with me on the Saturday, as this occurred on Wednesday. I should have had 15 s. to take, deducting the doctor's bill. I was in great distress.
I took nothing but the handkerchiefs.
Was there not a man and woman in the room
I did not know they were in my possession.
I went to the office to insist on the beadle's coming to take the daughter and another woman, who I heard was concerned. The daughter acknowledged to me the night before that she had received the money her mother got for the pan. I gave myself up at the office.
I know nothing of it.
I had scarcely got into the market before I was secured, and charged with this. I had three halfpence in my hand, and they wanted me to give them my money.
He was very drunk when I met him; he gave me the handkerchiefs to take care of for him. I asked him for 4 s. - he said he had no change; I went with Davis's daughter to get change. I saw a man in distress in the street, and went to take care of him, and told the watchman I had left a drunken man in bed.
Did you not give me the money to get something out of pawn
She told me to put them on. They encouraged me to do what I have.
She knows they were things she lent me; the caps she gave me; we wore each others things. Witness. I never gave her them. I had nothing to do with pawning the shirt. I lent her the shawl when she came up here last Sessions for her expenses. I never wore her things.
The officer there knows this woman lent me a shawl to come up here last Sessions to take my money; she also lent me the pattens and cap, and the shirt to pledge, because she pledged my chemise; she has the ticket of it now, and will not give it up.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
Did you not take me up Leadenhall-market, and give me as I thought 4 s.?
I said I had nothing but what he gave me, and I thought they were shillings. He said if I would send to him by any friend he would not appear against me, as he did not care for his 40 l.
Did not you offer to give me 3 d. to go up the court with you?
I had been at work, and this man came up and said he would give me 3 d. to go up the court; I said there were some persons about; he then came after me, and said he would give me 3 d. more to go up the court - we did so, and he took out his money and dropped it himself.
My work was very bad, and I hope to get into work in a short time, and replace them.
Did you not meet me between three and four o'clock in the morning?
Did you not treat me then with some rum?
We had three quarterns of gin and two pints of porter
On Wednesday morning I met the prosecutor at the corner of Hatton-garden - he asked me where there was a public-house, for he had left a sovereign, and could not find the house again - I told him there was no house open, but the watering house at the corner of Bartlett's-buildings, where he took me, and we had several glasses of rum - he then requested me to remain with him till day light, and he would pay me for my trouble, as he wanted to wash himself, for he was covered with blood; some one had cut his eye, and very much ill-used him. We went to several public-houses, till at last we came to the Pheasant, when he offered a country note, but the publican did not like to change it - therefore he left it, giving me two more to hold till we went to the coach office to get them changed. Before we left the Pheasant he forgot what he had done with his notes - when I told him I had got two, and the publican one, he insisted on having his notes, and called out murder, and said he would have it back from the publican, but I told him it was impossible till we had been to the coach office. By this time there was a number of people collected together, and I lost him. When I found so many people round me, and not having any pocket on, I put the two notes into my mouth for safety, as I found myself the worse for liquor. The man who took me brought me to the prosecutor, who then swore I had robbed him, but he was so much intoxicated he had entirely forgot giving me the notes to hold.
A woman named Taylor, sent me up; she said she would give me sixpence, if I would go and get the sheets, and if any one stopped me, to say I was going to a man of the name of Edwards.
It was done through distress.
You gave me half a crown, and I gave you 1 s. 9 d.?
Did you not send me for a quartern of rum, and pay for it?
I have had that piece eight or nine months in my pocket - I got it from a sailor in East Smithfield.
I know nothing about it.
I have been in very great distress. I have been out of a situation nearly five months, and have two children. The woman said, in the morning,
I returned home very much distressed - I took the gown and thought I should be able to return it in the morning.
I did not take it out of the drawer, but out of a little tray, and put it into my lap.
The prosecutor came into the Sun, and got in company with a female - they drank ale and gin; he went out with her for half an hour, and was quite drunk. The female knew my room - whether she took him there I do not know. I went about eight o'clock to put my child to bed, and thought somebody had been there; - I went home about eleven.
I went into the shop, and was in such distress I did not know what to do; these pieces of muslin laid on the floor, and I took them up.
I am sorry that I did it.
I never saw the trunk.
The constable would not take a young man who was with me. I picked the basket up in the passage.
Did you not give it to me to hold, and then tell me to run after a man who was your fellow-servant?
Did you not on your going into the country leave me one sovereign, and tell me if I wanted more, to pawn those things you least wanted, and you left me the keys of your boxes?
Were you not compelled to part with some things when you returned to town?
I attended a raffle at this house, and after most of the company had left I went out with the remainder, and about two yards from the door my foot touched something, which on my picking up proved to be a shawl - I enquired whether it belonged to any of the parties present - they did not claim it, but advised me to keep it. I am aware I was reprehensible in so doing.
I was in the habit of taking letters to persons for the witness, and taking money to several of her men near St. Giles's church, and she gave me the things to pawn, which I did.
I know what I have done is wrong. but the things were lent to me, and I intended to replace them.
I never left it for gold.
I was intoxicated - my husband had left me in a very improper state a fortnight before. I had gone out to see where he was, and got intoxicated. - I have two small children, quite unprotected.
Did I not meet you in Long-lane, when another young woman was talking to you? You insisted on my laying hold of your arm - you gave the purse into my hand, after we had been down a passage. Witness. It is all false; I made no proposal to her; I was not in Long-lane; I asked where her friend lived, and where she lived - she said, in Cow-lane. I was not out of the city while she was near me.
I was unpinning my clothes, and had the purse in my hand - he thought it was in my mouth. He gave the note into my hand in a passage of a house; he asked my direction, which I told him, and in an hour and a half he came and asked if I was within - I said, \Yes, who wants me?\" but if I had robbed him, I would have said nothing."
I went into the shop after buying a loin of pork, and bought three yards of ribbon, which I put into my basket - I set my basket on the counter, and when I came away he tapped me on my shoulder, and brought me back; there was nothing in my apron but the loin of pork.
It is my first offence.
I was coming out of Wheeler-street, and saw a woman throw this down - I picked it up.
I was not five minutes there - he said he did not know whether he had pawned his watch or lost it, and that he would have given any money rather than have given me in charge, if he had known his seals had been in his pocket.
Was it not ten o'clock when I called?
I had bought a bonnet of a woman in Smithfield, on condition that if it would not do she would exchange it, for which purpose she gave me her address, No. 16, Barbican, and when I got home, finding it did not suit me, I went to change it; I met a young woman on these stairs, whom I asked for the woman; she asked me to hold this gown while she went to fetch her, and staying longer then I expected I became alarmed; being in a state of pregnancy I trust to your mercy.
I was very much distressed.
This lady has no claim to the name of Gordon; but she has gone by the name of the Duchess of Gordon - she is a common prostitute - the last witness keeps a house of the same description. When I met her, near one o'clock in the morning, quite intoxicated, I asked her if she would have a coach home, and she said she had not the money to pay for it. I am married to a person of the name of Benjamin - all the articles were given me to pawn except the bonnet, which was lent to me.
I picked up the bit of a bowl of a spoon, and I asked the witnesses if it was silver; they said, No, and I threw it away.
I came out and met a friend, who took me back, and told me to go up-stairs, to the bagatelle-room, and he would follow me; I did not go up, but put my hat on the stairs; I heard an alarm, took my hat up, and ran out; the property was in my hat - I do not know who put it there - I was intoxicated.
They went away in my debt, and what I found in the house I took as security.
I found this by the door, as I came out.
A woman gave it me to pawn.
I was in distress, and intended to return them - the prosecutrix has often pawned people's things and redeemed them.
I am innocent; I never saw him before - Donovan said, she took money, and that I was innocent.
Did not you go home with me?
He was in my room, and gave me the watch.
I was in the public-house - we came out together, and get into a few words; I was rather intoxicated, and she said I had robbed her.
The woman who took the money I do not know - I never had his trousers in my hand.
Pitt was ill-using Woolf - I went to assist her, and the ring came off; I wished to have given it her; but McDonald came and took it from me.
I never saw the man.
He was in liquor, and gave it me to pawn, as he had no money; I lent him the old one.
I was not in any room - I went on an errand to a man's wife there; it laid on the bannisters and as I turned round, it fell down.
Did I agreed to meet you that night?
I have had twelve children - my husband is a painter and glazier, but neglected his business; I have been left in distress, and for a week together have been without a bit of meat; I have been brought to this through a person who owed me some rent, and gave me seven score of these - I kept them by me a long time, and wanted bread while I had them. I have often returned, after going out to pass them, and pawned something instead; it was nothing but distress led me to do it.
They were given to me in the street by rather a genteel man - I was not quite sober - he asked me to hold it.
I found the duplicate.
I know nothing about it.
I meant to ask the price of it - a man came and said I stole it.
She came by me crying - I said, \What is the matter?\" she said it was a basket-woman who took the money; her father came to my house, and asked if I she was the woman - she said, No. Witness. I said so, but covered her face. I told my father a basket-woman took it."
I never saw the watch.
I met a woman whom I had not seen for two years - we went and drank together; she had these things in her apron, and asked where she could get a lodging; I said she might make shift at my place - she got me to pawn these handkerchiefs.
Can you deny walking with me in Beech-street, and going into Golden-lane, giving me 4d., and asking if that would satisfy me - I left you, and you had white trousers on?
I am innocent. I was told I was not to be prosecuted.
Did not you take me into a public-house, and give me some gin?
She gave me them to pawn, and we spent the money in gin.
I met the prosecutor about half-past nine o'clock - she asked me to go and have something to drink. I took him to the Half-moon, public-house, and had three glasses of rum; he said, \Take my watch and wind it up.\" I said, I did not like; he then took it from his fob, and put it into my hand; he and this witness came out with me. I had my shawl taken off my shoulders and was knocked down - the prosecutor was tipsy."
Did you not cut my hand with a penknife?
He threw them on the fire - I only took one off.  Witness. There was no fire in the room - I went to my sister's room, who lives in her house, but not into the prisoner's room.
I know nothing of the note; he threw some paper on the fire; I took it off, and gave it him - I only saw one piece of paper; he was throwing his money about; he cut my hand; I said I would not go out of the house till a constable was sent for; when I caught the paper off the fire I said, \Nobody shall have this but his mother.\""
I was going to Kilburn, and was asked to pawn a shirt and shawl.
I bought it in Petticoat-lane.
My father turned me out of doors - I was in the street for a fortnight; I then came home, and asked my mother to give me a bit of bread - she would not, and I took the shoes.
Did not you take it out of the man's hat?
I found the watch in the bed, and gave it to him.
I picked up the hat, and the witness asked me to give it to him.
I met him - he gave me 5s. 6d. to sleep with him - I refused, and he gave me in charge.
He asked me to take care of the handkerchief; he said he had been robbed of 35s. 6d. in the morning, and lost his apron.
I met him, and he took me to two public-houses; he said he had no more money, and left his watch with me for 3s., and when he got down-stairs, he called Watch!
Her mother lent me the gown to pawn.
I once found Mr. Newcome's purse, with eighty or a hundred sovereigns in it, and took it to him - these things are of no value - they were in my box when I left her house.
I had bought a bit of cotton - this parcel fell from the counter - I took them up, and gave them to the shopman; he said, \Go about your business.\""
I have only to say, I know nothing whatever of their property.
He proposed to go up stairs; he gave me the glass in the parlour, and said it was worth a guinea, and I should give him 3s. to boot; he never opened his box up stairs; he put it on the foot of the bed; I said,\Have you no money?\" he seized me by my hair, and went out. He brought an officer - I gave up the glass, and told what I had it for."
I saw it lay on the ground, and took it up; I was only half a yard from the shop.
I was coming from Kensington; the prosecutor offered me his arm, I was ill; he asked me to drink, and wanted to go home with me. I said, I could not, as my husband was at home; he then gave me the purse, which I believe he thought had only got the change of the sovereign in it. I went home, and on finding what was in it, I left the two sovereigns with a friend, and gave up the others.
I went into the Queen's Head public-house with her; she said she had dropped a sovereign; she got a light, and went down to look for it: she came up, but did not charge me with it; and the publican told me to go home; I heard I was charged with it, and went back to the house.
He gave me the sovereign to get change; I gave it to Julia Sweeney, and, as she did not come back, he said he would murder me, if I did not give him the sovereign.
He given me the sovereign, and I gave it to the other girl for change. I could not help her not coming back it.
A man pushed against me, put the cloak into my hand, and told me to pawn it.
I saw it laying on the ground; and being two days without victuals, took it up; I took it to the court to look at, and thought I would take it back, but they knocked me about, and gave me a dreadful black eye.
I picked them off the ground - I never opened any drawer - I found the drop in the ashes, and the rings on the floor. I received no wages.
I had not been into my own room that evening. Witness. I think she did; her husband had made me a pair of shoes, and she came to me for the money that evening, and I paid her.
How came I to be acquitted from Bow-street for a whole week, and then taken again?
Blythe said he would take 12s. for the del but my husband could not get it, so I was taken again - my husband signed a paper at Bow-street - it was to be settled for 12s.
I leave it to your mercy.
I believe I met the prosecutrix, and had a glass with her; I was much in liquor, and at the office she was too tipsy to be examined - she gave me leave to take the things.
He gave me 5s. to go home with me, and when I did so he had no more money, and left me the keys and other things.
Myron could not have lived nineteen months in the family, without knowing the things.
He told me to go out of the shop, or he would give me in charge; I said he might, as I had bought them an hour before, and could not afford to lose them. Witness. She did say so.
I am in the glove-line, but having a gathering in my hand, I could not make them. I had an order for some; the first pair were not large enough; I went to buy another pair; they said they could not tell how many pair they had.
I hope you will have mercy upon me; it is the first time I ever did such a thing.
The things were pawned with my landlady's consent, and she had 1s. 6d. of the money.
This woman came to me, and treated me; we were both drunk; the officer said there was a sixpence in my hat - I said it was not mine - he told the Alderman it was a sovereign - it is likely he put it in.
I knew nothing about them till they were shown to me.
On Wednesday night I spoke to Rigg, near the Olive Branch public-house, and he said,\Let me have none of your noise to-night - you are very abusive when in liquor;\" and on the Friday night following I went with a young woman to have some drink; he came over, held up his light, and took me to the watch-house - Holt said at first that I had a bundle, which she thought was was broken victuals."
They were brought to me by a man at eight o'clock at night; he asked me to take care of them.
It was given to me by two boys.
We had not left the lodging - my husband had gone to get the money to take the things out; he did get it - she offered to settle it for two sovereigns; my husband would have given her one, but she would have two.
A woman, named King, told me to go and take them for her.
I took it because the children had nothing to eat; my mother was very ill - she died yesterday morning; I have no father, and no friend.
Mrs. Miller has been in the habit of\\ send\\ ing me to pawn other people's property, which came to be washed; she has let me stand for weeks without one farthing of money - her husband knows he has taken me round in a cart before now, and I have gone to the persons they wash for, and told lies to cover their crimes.
You say three half-crowns were found on me, and the watchman can witness that only two were found; because I would not gratify you, you gave me in custody. Witness. There were three half-crowns found on her, and one shilling.
I said I had 3s. 6d. and 5s. 2d. besides; the prosecutor said he had lost five half-crowns, then he said four, and then he said a few. Witness. He did say he had lost a few half-crowns.
The officer did not take three half-crowns from me, beside what he had given me.
I was out of employ for three months, and was in great distress; I met a man, who took me to the place, and gave me the flats - he escaped; when I heard some one coming I concealed them.
I can be upon my Sacrament oath, that I never denied having the watch. Witness. Yes, you did, and in going along, she said, \For God's sake don't tell the man; you may keep the watch;\" the prosecutor appeared to have his faculties about him."
Did you not tell my friends that you saw the man give me the watch?
Had not you and I three pots of beer together?
I was with him almost two hours, and had three pots of beer; he wanted the fourth - the landlady brought it, and he had no money; he then took his watch out of his pocket, and said, \Here, my wench, take this:\" that is the truth, so help me God."
It was mere distress; my five fatherless children were without food, and I was tipsy.
I was very much intoxicated, and took the diamond for the one I went to pawn.
Mrs. Phillips came to me, and said she was in a deal of trouble - that she had pawned her husband's clothes unknown to him, and asked me to get her something to pawn to get them out on Saturday night; she was to pledge them again on Monday, and take these things out.
It was Mrs. Robinson told you to take it, you know that well; I live in your mother's house. Witness. You lived at my mother's, and it was you told me to take it.
It was another person told her to take it: I do not know who put the handkerchief in my yard.
I was very much in liquor.
I had been laying on the boards for several days without a bit of food; it was the height of distress led me to take them - it was the devil caused them to come in my way; I throw myself on your mercy.
He struck me in a broker's-shop before that.
I did it through distress.
When she came in she had only 10l.
I followed this gentleman a considerable distance up the shop; they said they suspected I had taken something - I said I had not, and opened my shawl; they left me two or three minutes, and then said they had picked up a piece of ribbon which I had dropped; the gentleman first said he saw me put the ribbon under my shawl, then into my pocket, and then take it out again, and yet he did not take me; I have been married twenty years, and was never accused of any thing of this kind in my life.
I went to match a trifle-dish, and what he showed me was too large - I then looked at a pair of salts, and he did not know the price; his mistress came out, and asked 5s. for them - I bade her 4s., and she would not take it; I was then going out.
Did not I ask you the price of the pork?
I went into the shop, and asked the price of the pork - my husband was with me; I was very much intoxicated - the pork laid on the bench; he asked 5d. per lb., and I offered him 4d. - he served me with two pieces, and took 1s. 6d.; he then came, took hold of my apron, and said,
\What have you here?\" I said,\" What I have paid for;\" he said, \"You have paid for nothing\" - he threw me up against the counter, and this other piece fell off."
When I met him he had a young woman with him, and he accused me of robbing him of 5s.; he took hold of me, called the officer, and said if I would give him 4s. he would let me go, and have no piece of work - when he was down at the Thames Police he said he had found 6d. in his pocket.
I took none in the wash-hand basin - I took that in the glass; I took not more than two table-spoonsful, and it made my head swim; it is the greatest falsehood to say I was drunk; I have been an honest hard-working servant for upwards of thirty years - trace me all round, and you will find me an honest character; they have a spite against me.
I did it from distress and want; from my husband's being out of employ, and having four young children.
I do own to taking the things. but not with an intent to steal - this witness has pawned many of my things. Witness. Yes, but I always fetched them out again.
Did she not say she would take 6d. per week if I would give it her?
I had no cloak on; I had a shawl and a basket in my hand - I bought a bunch of lights for three halfpence, and paid for it; when I was taking it out this man said, \Where is the piece of meat?\" I laughed at him, and asked what he meant - Mr. Somers then told his man to go and fetch another; they pushed me about;. and the piece of meat was found in the shop."
He did not take them from me. Witness. I received them from the person who took them from her; I did not go into the room while she was being stripped.
I took them home to wash.
These things do not belong to Mrs. Harben - I bought the two wine-glasses in Oxford-street.
I have been a respectable servant , and lived with the Rev. Alexander Fletcher, of Homerton. On this night, at half-past eleven o'clock, I met this gentleman very tipsy - he parted the young woman and me, and said, \I will have you, can you go home with me;\" I said I never took any body home - he said he had very little money, but would give me his handkerchief; he took it off, and tied it round my neck - I walked with him for near an hour; he said if I would see him to No. 8, Devonshire-square, he would give me 1s. 6d. - I saw him to the door; he pulled off his great coat and hat, and offered them to me to go home with me - I refused; he said could I meet him next day - I promised him, and when I got to the gas-light, the young woman said, \"Look in your hand, and see what you have got;\" I found it was a piece of paper, and was going to throw it away - she said, \"Don't throw it away;\" on looking at it I found it was a 10l. note: I should have returned it to him when I met him the next day."
I was standing at the corner of Mapleton-street; a woman came and told me to fetch the things, and she gave me 6d. - I met her again, and she sent me to pawn them; she gave me 6d. - I met her on the Wednesday again, and she sent me to the pawnbroker's, where I was detained; I was to meet her again, but she did not come - I know nothing of them; I have no father, but I have a mother and nine brothers and sisters.
My master left me in want, and I did it to procure subsistence.
Her mamma gave me the jelly-mould to keep my sugar in?   Witness. No, she did not, and the prisoner did not say so at the time.
I left the place because I was ill-treated - my young mistress asked me one day to pawn my gown to get some money to go out, and I would not; she then asked me to pawn one of her dresses - I refused, and she said she would tell her mamma, and get me turned away; she wanted me to go and do it unknown to her mamma, because she was blind; and at the office she offered to take me back, if I would do it as the other servants had done.
I met the girl, and she gave me the watch.
Were you not in company with three or four different girls before you met me?
I went to fill the kettle.
Did I not take a light up stairs with me?
Was I in the street?
I met this man talking to two others; he crossed, and asked where I was going - I said to No. 26, Almonry; he said, \Can I go with you?\" I said there was a young woman lived with me, but she was not at home - I got a light, and took it up; we went into the room - he shut the door, and bolted it; he said, \"Put out the light, and come to bed\" - I said, \"I beg your pardon, what are you going to give me?\" he said, \"I have only a few halfpence, but you need not be afraid to trust me till to-morrow\" - I said, \"That won't pay my rent;\" I sat down on the bed, but would not go to bed."
I met him in the middle of York-street; he said, \Mistress, this is a dark night for you\"- I said, \"Yes, and it is very slippery;\" he said, \"Take hold of my arm\" - in going up William-street he gave me two pieces of coin; I said could not he give me some halfpence - when we got to a lamp he said I had taken some money from him; he put his hand into my pocket, and took some money out - I said, \"Don't rob me.\""
I know nothing of his money; he gave me 3d., and because I would not do as he wished he beat and kicked me, and knocked me down - I called out Murder! and several persons came up.
She gave me three handkerchiefs out of her drawers by mistake for my own, when I was coming away; the handkerchiefs she owns are not hers; I had none of hers.
The prosecutor delivered his watch to the other woman to take care of. Witness. She was several yards from the bed.
I was not in his company, but with the other man; the other woman got up, and came out with me; the witness asked if his things were right - he said Yes, but he had left his watch with his companion; he was very tipsy.
You asked me to lend them to you - I never sold them. Witness. No, you sold them; I gave them up as soon as I heard they were stolen.
I acknowledge pawning the blanket and pillow, but I never stole the books - the prosecutor's son wanted to swear I stole a pin, but I had not seen it.
Upon your oath did you not say you lost four sovereigns?
There were a great many men there - the prosecutor walked up from the fire with the gold and silver in his hand.
I never saw the watch; you took me to a public-house, and gave me some gin.
I saw the prosecutor sitting on the step of a door; he was very tipsy, and his clothes were loose - he said, \I have been having a sleep;\" he got up and took me to a public-house to have some gin - he felt his pockets, and said he had no money; the landlord took the gin up again - he then felt in his pockets, found 6d., and paid that - we then came out; it rained very heavy, and he put the handkerchief round me; he asked if he could go home with me - I said, No, as a female slept with me; he said he could not get into his lodging - I said I could not help that; he then said he had lost his watch, and gave me in charge of the officer; I stood by him till he came, and then I was taken; the next day he said he had lost a sovereign, and his landlady said he had only half a sovereign."
I never touched you.
I know nothing of her, but she asked me to go and buy a bit of bacon - she took this cheese, and ran away with it; I told the officer where she lived.
When I was taken Mr. Padden said he had given 6s. for it, and at the office he said he gave her another shirt - I had plenty of time to have taken the mark out, but I knew it was my own.
I met the prosecutor with a young woman; he asked us to have something to drink; as we were coming out of the house, he said he wished to speak to the other young woman - I walked on one side; I kicked against the purse and took it up, but I did not know it was stolen: the other young woman owned that she took the purse.
I was very much in liquor - I never took any thing before; I have a child ten years old.
Did you not treat me with a galss of rum?
I was not searched; I put my hand into my pocket, and pulled out the sovereign, a latch-key, and about 4d.
It was an accident; I am innocent.
I went to pawn an article - this shift laid under the place, where the linen hangs - I took it up, and when she inquired for it I did not like to own it.
I picked them up in Leather-lane- I had them in my hand ten minutes when the lad came up.
I met a woman, who said she was a bellow-maker's wife, and offered them for sale. I bought them for 1s. and a silk handkerchief, which I had round my neck.
I bought them two or three months before, of a person who was taken ill, and wanted to return to the country; I did not know they were stolen, or I should not have sent to the prosecutor.
How much gin did we have there?
Did I not say she went with me, and gave it me at the door?
I met the prosecutrix so drunk that she did not know me, though we had lived in one house together, in Charless-street, Drury-lane; she had hold of a woman's arm - we went to a shop three doors from the pawnbroker's, and had two quarterns of gin; she then said, \I have a gown in my basket - I shall go and pawn it;\" she took me to the pawnbroker's door, and got me to pawn it for 2s.; we went back, and had another quartern of gin - she had the duplicate, and the rest of the money."
I saw it on the ground - I took it up, and offered it to a little girl; she said it was not hers.
I bought the smock-frock for 1s. 6d. - I did not touch the basket.
This man came with a woman to my house, and begged I would send for something to drink - they got a pot of beer; I then said it was no use to sit there, they must go into the next room - I never left my chair till I heard our door bang; I went out - the prosecutor was coming out of the room, and said he had lost his watch - I said, \Good God! which way is the woman gone?\" I ran out, but could not see her."
I took it by mistake - I am a native of Liverpool, and have no friends in town.
I lived with her a fornight, and she came home drunk every night, with a mob about her; she sent me to a woman to tell her fortune - these things were not taken with a design to rob her, but to return them to her before a witness.
It was given me outside the door.
I met the prosecutor at half-past nine o'clock, and he gave me the watch; he was very drunk - I never looked into the box at all; I only went to the next door, and he called the officer.
It is quite false.
I met him; he asked me to have something to drink - we then came out, and he wanted to know if he could go home with me; I said No, not to where I lived - he then asked me to go some where else; I said I did not mind - we went; he told me to go into the house first, and gave me this money.
I waited on the nurse, morning and evening, and she gave me a small portion of tea and sugar, which I put into my bonnet-box; there was a lady who had her breakfast carried up to her - I put the napkin into my box, to use in mixing the tea, the black and green together; I had bought a great part of the tea to send to my mother, and the sugar also - the silver spoons are my own- my master knows that the lady was in No. 17 room, who had her breakfast in bed.
Do you mean to say I am the person who was with you?
It is quite false  as I was coming from Knights-bridge, I saw something lying in Park-lane  I kicked it with my foot, and picked it up  it was a black silk bag, and the watch was in it  the policeman came up to me in Piccadilly, and said I had robbed a man of some money  I said, \What money I have got belongs to myself  coming down Piccadilly, through their dragging me about, I dropped the watch from my bosom  I asked him where the man was, which he said I had robbed of money  he said he did not know what he had lost  I never was in the prosecutor's company."
My husband occupied the room  I did not intend to rob the man.
I found the purse and a parcel, which he left on the round table; and when he came back, I said, \I suppose you have come for what you left on the table.\""
I met a young girl who said she would lodge with me, and pay half my rent  I was taken ill, and went to the hospital, but I left a young girl in the room.
He left me the watch for half-a-crown.
I brought the man before your bar that I had them of.
You are aware that I pointed out the man, and said, \I insist on that man being taken if I am\"  he received them of a man, and he came into the passage and said, \"Lay hold,\" which I did, and the man walked up the court  I was coming back from the yard, and the dog barked  the servant said the dog would not hurt me  I then walked to the bar, and the landlord asked what I had got  I said, nothing of his  the man was pointed out, and taken to Worship-street."
I met a man and woman whom I had some slight knowledge of  I spoke to them  the woman went away, and said she would be back in a few minutes if I would wait  the man and I then walked, and when we came to the court that runs through the Bedford Head, he said, \Lay hold,\" and I took these irons  he went up the court, and I went through into the yard  when I got there a dog barked, and I beckoned for them to take the dog away  I stepped into the kitchen, and the girl came and told me to go on  I walked on to the bar, and the landlord said, \"What have you got there?\"  I said, nothing of his, as the things were given me by the man that stood there  I said, \"If I am taken to the office, he shall\"  he stood opposite me at the office  he was acquitted."
I know nothing of these people  I never was in the work-house till I was taken into custody  they said before the magistrate that they could swear to me by my eyes.
My father lives at No. 6, Ann-street, Bethnal-green  he can prove where I have lived for seven years  his name is Benjamin Holburt.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court  I was very much distressed.
It is the first time  I hope you will forgive me.
I gave it him for a good one  he took it to the other counter, jinked it, and put it into the till  he then took two half-crowns out of the till, and was going to put them in his pocket, but put them into the till again.
I had not two men with me.
What time was it when I came to the link?
You said at the office it was at ten minutes after five o'clock.
I never had but one half-crown, and did not know it to be bad  I did not go to the sink at all.
I never was in the shop before, I can take my oath of it  I did not know the sixpence was bad.
My mother is living with another man  I was distressed to know where to go.
I did it from distress.
The man I was living with, took the things, and I pawned them, because he ill-used me and made me  I was not married to him.
I own the things were pawned by me, but the man was with me  he left me on the Friday, and I went on Monday to look for him.
My brother and two more shipmates were with me in her house.
Did not you put your husband in gaol, charging him with stealing this money?
Did you not leave Mr. Taylor and Quin, in charge of the house? your son and I were sitting by the fire  when they came in I was ashamed to be seen such a dirty figure.
She knows that the washer women were in the house at the time  I was in the house her friends came in, and they began quarrelling  I staid in that house the whole blessed evening  it was late next morning when I got up and got my breakfast  I said to her on Saturday morning before this happened, \Another night I will never sleep in Mrs. Moriarty's house, for her abuse of me was shameful  Quin said, \"No, and if I could get another place, I would never stop in her house.\""
There was a man and women in bed in the very room where the box was.
I gave every thing up that I had taken from my master.
I have nothing more to say than that the young man is innocent.
I went in and asked for a yard and a half of drab sarsnet ribbon  he asked me why a pink would not do  I saw a drab, and told him to serve me with that, but I still had the pink in my hand  the other shopman asked what I was going to do with that  I said, \Nothing\"  he took it out of my hand, and said 1 was drunk  I did not know the officer was gone for, the shopman took the ribbon to the gas, looked at it, and then brought it back, and put it under my shawl."
This young man did not come from behind the counter at all  there was a tall young man took it from me, and looked at it at the gas-light, and then he came and put it under my arm.
I bought the shawls and ribbons of Mr. Thomas, who is here.
I bought them of that gentleman in Mr. Rogers's shop in Pitfield-street.
It was a short, dark-complexioned gentleman who served me  he was a great deal like this gentleman  it was a tall gentleman served me with the handkerchief.
You said, \Give me a sovereign, and I will let you go free\"  I said I had no sovereign, and you called me a d  d Irish b  h."
When I came home, there was a padlock on the door  I told her, what there was deficient I would replace, and she said she would willingly take them  she let me go that night, and when I returned, she said it was too late, and gave me in charge.
I am quite innocent.
Do not you know me by buying new articles at your shop?
I was very unfortunate in my marriage, my husband deserted me  I had a little bag in which I kept some duplicates of my own, and when Mr. Dew came to me, I said I had no objection to his seeing my duplicates  I took them out of the bag, and this duplicate of my master's property came out first  it had been put in by some one unknown to me.
We came out to have something to drink.
I had pawned my things that night to get a frock out to wear the next day  when the prosecutor came in with me, I called the landlady into the room  he gave me 1s. 6d., and said he would stop with me all night  I said that was not sufficient  he said, \I cannot give you any more, for I have no more, but if you will come to me to-morrow I will give you another shilling\"  he took his coat and waistcoat off  I then told him to go and have something to drink, and we went down  this is all out of spite because I would not stop with him."
Did you not give me the ring to pawn?
He gave me the ring to pawn, and when he got sober he asked me for it  I said it had been pawned, and the money spent in treating him  he had breakfast and some liquor.
When she came to me I was in Christopher-street  it was not me  there was a man and woman rushed by me.
A man and woman rushed past me and almost knocked me down, and this lady came up and charged me with having taken these things  I could not have been in her yard, for I was in Christopher-street  all I had was this handkerchief and a bit of meat, and they were knocked out of my hand.
What the prosecutor says is false  there were ten sovereigns and a half, instead of nine sovereigns and a half  when he arrived at the station-house there were ten sovereigns and a half  on the Monday morning it was reduced to nine sovereigns and a half  they were given to me to take care of, and I never had any idea of wronging him.
I had put a sovereign on the counter, and he detained my change  the man said, \I suspect she has taken something, look under her cloak\"  he tore open my cloak  I then said it was on the floor, and then the man took a print off the line, and said that was the piece that was taken from the floor  I said it was not that piece  he said, \"It is of no consequence, it is the same pattern\"  he then said if I did not go, it should be the worse for me, but it was not likely I should go without my dress, which cost 15s."
The first thing she set me to do was, to go for a quartern of gin  she then went out with a friend who had recommended her to me, and did not return for two hours  she then came home, and as she had been drinking, I did not tell her about the knife which I had broken  she appeared pleased with what I had done, and sent me for another quartern of gin  I told her a gentleman had called to look at the apartments, and I told him I believed they were let  she said, why did not I have him in, and get 5s. of him; and when she wanted some tea, she sent me to get some from the lodger's room.
Did not I give you the shilling, and say I did not know whether it was bad?
I did not know it was a bad shilling, if I did give it to him; I worked hard for it at the wash  I knew I had one bad one, but never intended to offer it.
They were all under the bed when I went, for what I know  when I had been there two or three days, she asked me for money  I had not got any, and I pawned some things of hers, and told her I should get some money of my father, and would get them out again  she wanted me to take an old gentleman into my room.
It is my first offence  I hope you will be at merciful as you can.
I did not take them both at one time.
I leave it to my counsel.
I am not guilty.
My master gave me a piece to pawn first  I pawned it for 7s.  he then gave me this, and I pawned it for 6s. at Mr. Board's  I met a couple of shopmates, and spent 5s., and then, the next morning, I spent the other  I was then reluctant to go to the shop till the Thursday morning, when I threw myself in my master's way in the coffee-shop, thinking I should go to work and pay the money.
He had two women in company with him when he met me  he gave me four sovereigns to take care of till the morning, and 8s. for myself.
He said he would drink some half-and-half  I went for it  I met some persons who treated me, and got quite stupid  he gave me the money to take care of.
I took them up, scarcely knowing what I was about.
I did not steal them  a woman asked me to pawn them, and gave me twopence for it.
I sent the duplicate to my husband, and desired him to assist me to take the blanket out and give it her.
Did I not tell you my husband was out of work, and sell you a great many tickets?
I had a nurse child, at 3s. 6d. per week, and I let the money run till I received 3l. or 4l.  I then bought this table-cloth, a gown, and some other things  the prosecutor's house underwent a thorough repair, and that drinking-horn was thrown out  I said to one of the labour era, \Do not throw it away; it will do for my child to play with?  the witness was not at home  she was at Mr. Gurney'g other house."
Mrs. Smith has had that cloth in pawn several times.
I am innocent; he did not find the shawl on me.
The prosecutor's wife sent me to pawn the shoes in my own name, while he was gone for the candle.
I certainly did not steal them, nor know that they were stolen; I bought them of a Jew woman.
He gave me the waistcoat to pawn  he spent the money in a public-house, and then he gave me the jacket to stop with him  I gave him the duplicate of the waistcoat.
I wish her to say what company she was in.
I certainly pawned the cloak, but she told me I might.
I do not know how the things came into my box.
He gave me the money on the Saturday.
I do not recollect meeting him at the Queen's Head at all  I saw him at the Hog in the Pound  my bundle was in my hand, he has it now  he told me, he would bring me to an honest place, and he took me to that house  I went into the parlour, and said to the woman, \Will you put me into some place, and put some of your children with me?\"  she took me to that room, and the man was in bed  I said I would not go into the room for I did not know what he wanted, without it was to kill me  he told me he was a distressed man and out of employ, he had not a farthing  he had my bundle in his room, and gave me this watch to take care of for him."
She was in the habit of going out; and a man, named Downes, used to come and fetch her  her husband took very unbecoming liberties with me  I never had her things  the cap found on me was my own.
I said I had paid him half-a-crown, but there being so many people in the shop, I thought he had put it into his pocket and forgotten it.
I was coming along Shoreditch, and two women were offering the gown to sell  they asked half-a-crown for it  I said I had but 1s. 6d., but if they would go to a pawnbroker's, I would pawn my own gown and have it  the prosecutor came while I was there, and took my gown, which he said was his, but it was not  he then came and took me with this gown on.
I never had a fresh colour  I never saw this man till he took me  it is not likely I should have robbed him, and come back immediately.
I went to work  master came down stairs shortly after  the fire was out  he caught me round the neck and said, \Mary, here is something for you,\" and he put this money into my bosom  I said, \"I do not want it\"  he said, \"Never mind, Mary, when you go home to-night, I shall follow you\"  mistress went and fetched a policemen when it was missed, but he did not wish to have it known  my mistress would not let it drop  she said I took it out of her drawer  I had no keys or any thing about me, but threepence  he only did it because I would not comply with his wishes  he several times offered me money, and gave me money."
I never did any such thing  I never saw him till I saw him at Hatton-garden  the handkerchief was not produced the first day.
When I took the half-crown, he sounded it several times, and said he was no judge of money, for he had taken a bad crown that day fortnight  I said it was a bad job  he then said, \I really believe you are the girl  you gave me the bad crown;\" and he called his wife, who said, I was not the person  he then called his servant, who said I was the person, for she knew me by my cloak."
I am an unfortunate girl  I was sitting by the fire; Oliver came in, and put these shillings on the chair, and told me to take care of them  he said, \If the officers come, put them into your mouth\"  the moment he was gone, the officers came in  they said, \"Where is Tom?\"  I said I did not know  Goose then said, \"What have you got in your hand?\"  I refused to tell him  he was coming to me, and I put them into his hand."
There are no railings facing the house.
Different people come out of the house at all hours of the night  it is a very bad house  the street door was open until three o'clock in the morning.
I went to my mother's about seven o'clock on Saturday evening  I left her house to go down the town  as I went out at the street door Treasure called to me, \Where are you going? stop a bit\"  I waited for her while she put on her bonnet and shawl  she came out, and we went to High-street  we met a woman whom she knew, and we went into a public-house, and had a quartern of gin  we went into four or five different houses, and had gin and ale  I was in liquor, and so was she  that man used me dreadfully  but I do not believe I am guilty  I cannot remember any thing about it  when I found myself in the cage, I asked as watchman what I was there for; he said, Treasure had given me into custody  I am told Jacob Earney had brutally ill-used me."
I throw myself on the mercy of the Jury.
M'Kenzie gave me the things  I did not know they were stolen.
I have no father. I ran away from my place that morning, as I had but 6d. a week.
I did not go out of the shop.
His wife often went to that cellar for wine.
There were some clothes of mine in the box; the things I took by mistake, as I left in a hurry  the glasses I know nothing about.
He lived with me seven years; and when he came home from sea, I had moved  lie came to me, and staid from the Wednesday till Friday, and he said he would make me a present of this watch for old acquaintance sake  he was then going to Staines, and I said I would give him these two seals  he said what was the use of the seals without the watch?\  I then gave him the watch, and he went to Staines  he returned in a fortnight  I saw him in the highway with two women and a shipmate  he said, he hoped I would not be offended, but he had given the two seals away  I said, very likely he had the watch too  he said, \"No, I have not, and if you do not believe it, here it is\"  he bit the ribbon of it that was round his neck, and gave it me  the officer then came and said, \"What have you got about you?\"  I said, \"Nothing particular; I have his watch, which he gave me\"  he said, \"Give it me;\" and he took it  we went to the King David station-house, and they would not take the charge  the prosecutor said, any thing he had I was welcome to, as he had lived at my house, and I had had a great deal to take care of for him  he gave me a silver-mounted card case on the day he gave me the watch, and this discharge from the ship, to take care of  I never snatched his watch from him."
She keeps a bad house in Lisle-street, she asked me to come and live at her house, and she would furnish me with clothes.
She lent me the shawl, I did not steal it  it is a common house in Lisle-street  this man lives there with a poor unfortunate girl,
I said she had lent me the shawl; and because I had kept it so long, she, said she would have me transported, and so did the policeman.
I get my living by selling fruit  I sell some to the unfortunate girls, who live in her house  she dresses them up, and sends them out  she was in bed herself with a gentleman, in the back parlour, when I went in  I have no friends, and wish to be sent out of the country.
The witness has been in custody herself two or three times  she robbed her mistress in Blenheim-steps, of two sovereigns  she used to come and ask me to go out with her  I went to the play with her  she once asked me what we should do for money to go to the play  she told me to come down the court with her  she went into the prosecutrix's house, and got two quilts, she brought them along to Harris, the pawnbroker's, and put them on the counter  she then said to me, \You put them in your name,\" and when the man asked the name, I said, \"Flynn,\" and she took the money."
My father was out of work, and I wag distressed.
I took it to fringe it, as I had done the others before. Does she say that I put it under my stays in the presence of sixty people?
I said, if she had any thing to send, I would take it to her daughter  the girl who was with me made her escape with the things.
I took the flute, and pawned it by the wish of his wife.
A boy gave me the things to pawn, and said, he would give me 1s.  I did not know that they were master's, or I should not have taken them  I saw the boy with them when I went out to get the child an apple  I have not been in the streets at all  the boy is called Don Pedro; I think he lodges in West-street.
I was persuaded to do it.
About twenty minutes before nine o'clock, a lad came and brought the blanket, and said his mother was very ill, and she would be much obliged to me to go and pawn it, as they would not take it in of him.
I was in great distress  I have nine in family  I had bought this glass a week before, and I thought I would go and sell it.
A person gave it me on the Monday.
I never had the shirt  you said you could prove me a smasher.
I never was in your shop
I never was in your shop.
I have witnesses to prove that I was in-doon from half-past eleven till half-past five o'clock in the evening, and never went out.
I had my friends here this morning; but I did not think I should have my hearing till next Sessions, or I could prove I was in-doors washing for a person till half-past five o'clock.
I tried on three or four pairs, which he gave me to try, and I said to my sister, \I have a pair; pay for them.\""
I did not ask her to pawn them, but another person did  I was in distress, and pawned them thinking they were my husband's, and that he would get them out again.
You never gave me a farthing.
Did not the parcel contain a tea-caddy and a cotton-box?
Did you see the two sovereigns?
When you came to me did I deny any thing?
The prosecutor bought these things for me at a hardware-shop  he told me to choose what I liked  he gave me no money  I did not ask for any, as he had bought me the things  the witness got up, and went out for some beer  she did not return, and we went to look for her  the marine went with me  the officer came into the public-house which we went into, and took me.
He gave me half-a-crown, and I went with him  I was there an hour, and then I left and went home  it was half-past two o'clock before I went, away  about four o'clock in the morning the officer came and took me  the prosecutor said he had lost his watch and 15s.  the room door was left open when I went down stairs  he was not sober.
I said I had the watch, and put it under the pillow.
I brought no box into the house.
My mistress found me lying in the kitchen in a fit, and took me up and put me on two chairs.
I did not know I had any money in my pocket  one of the shopmen, who spited me, was close to me, pulling me about, and he put the money into my pocket, and said he would do for me  I told mistress he would be the death of me  It was only about a mutton chop the piece of work began  mistress sent me out to get mutton chops for supper, and the man said to me, \Master will let me have this mutton chop, if you will\"  I said, \"I will\"  he was called to account about it; and the man, out of spite, said I was going to leave the house; and he gave me warning to leave the service  the shopman followed me down stairs, and said, if I did not leave he would do for me."
Did you meet me at half-past eleven o'clock, and take me into public-houses, when I had had sufficient?
He did not halloo at all.
Did not you give me a bad half-crown?
I showed the bad half-crown to the policeman  he gave it to me back  you came and said \You have robbed me\"  I said \"I have not got any thing but five shillings of my own."
In going to the station-house, there were a lot of persons who told me if I did not give the five shillings to my friend they would take it from me  I told the man that I had five shillings; not this man, but the other man that went up stairs with me  I took the five shillings out of my pocket and put it with my bonnet  I said the bad half-crown was what he gave me  I am not guilty of taking a farthing from him.
I was tipsy  I do not know how they came into my pocket.
They are hers; but I intended to get them out again.
I only came out of trouble on the Thursday, from having fourteen days  I had no lodging, and I went where this woman, who he calls his wife, lives, with him  I had become acquainted with her in prison  I lodged with her that night  I then went and pledged a shawl for half-a-crown, and got some tea  I left the ticket there, and the next morning it was gone  I met a woman who gave me a sovereign  I went to the Crown and changed it  I spent 4s. on her and her companion  I then tied 18s. 6d. in the corner of a handkerchief  I had some brandy and ale, and this fellow came and tried to get me away, but I would not go  I then went to this girl's lodging, and laid down, not knowing that this man was coming in  she said had quarrelled with him  when I awoke in the morning, I found the 18s. 6d. tied in a corner of his handkerchief, instead of my own  I took it, and went to the liquor shop  when I came back, he said I had robbed him  I said I had not  he and she both said they would give me a good hiding  they struck me, loosened all my teeth, and knocked me on the floor  I screamed, \Police\"  I was taken  I sent to the liquor-shop for 11s. 6d. which I had left there  this woman's name is Phbe Topling."
He struck me  I came in here with a black eye.
Did you see no blood on me?
I leave myself to your mercy  I do not much care what becomes of me.
I do not know any thing about the gloves  Grant came to tea with me, and put the handkerchief into her pocket by mistake  we afterwards quarrelled, because I wanted to take the baby away, as she did not keep it clean  she told me she would do me all the injury she could, and get me in prison  I bought the plates in Whitechapel, and I gave her the dripping because she said her mother wanted to make a gooseberrypie  I put it on the plate, and told her to bring it back.
I am not guilty of the charge  my lady is naturally of a violent temper, so much so, that my life was truly miserable: but I determined in my own mind to endure it continually, in hopes, if I survived her, I should go and live with the remainder of the family, where I knew I should be truly happy  during her mother's time she was so violent, but her mother being an amiable disposition, I could always fly to her for succour; but since her death my life has been miserable  I am not guilty of the charge  I only acted in my own defence  when I was going to lay the cloth for supper, my lady knocked me down, with a candle in my hand, and the knife also, and we were both in the dark  she called \Murder\"  I held her because I thought she would lay murder to my charge, thought I knew I was innocent  I was taken to the station-house, and what has happened since I cannot tell."
I never went out of the shop at all  I did not know it was bad.
I was willing to replace the things.
I picked up this bit of meat, and kept still walking on  the gentleman came and asked if I had not got a bit of meat  I said, \Yes  If it is your's you may have it.\""
I left his house through the ill-treatment I received from Miss Catherick  she used me very ill that morning, and accused me of having concerns with her brother more than she was aware of  she said he was very partial to me, more than he ought to be.
I was very much distressed through my husband's leaving me, and going to live with a common prostitute  I was obliged to do what I did  my intention was not to leave the house  when I came home, he called me into his own room, and said he knew there were things gone  I said I had not left the lodgings; but when I did, I should leave every things as I found it  when I was at work, my husband used to annoy me  I could not get in which I got works.
I went into the shop, on Monday night, to buy half-a-pound of soap  a woman came up to me and asked me to hold that in my apron, and while I paid him for what I had, bought I turned round, and she was gone  I said a woman had given it me to hold.
I did not deny having a cloak, but I said it was not hers.
I went on the Saturday week to the lady's house to work, and she sent me to a lodger of hers, in the two-pair front  on going up, Birch was there, screwing down the window, to prevent the girls looking out after the gentleman  the lodger asked Sarah to lend her 6d., to send for some gin, which she would not give her  after they were gone, she said, \Mrs. Russel, I want you to pawn an article for me, can you go now?\"  I said, \"No ma'am, I cannot go now\"  the prosecutor keeps another house in the street, which is a bad house  Mrs. Russell, the lodger, afterwards passed me on the stairs, and gave me the cloak to pledge  she said, \"Do not let Mrs. Haring see it, for I owe her money\"  I did not know it was Mrs. Harding's clock  I pledged it in the neighbourhood."
Is your name Ryves or Jones?
Did you not come to me on Monday, and send me to pawn your cloak?
I am aware they are hers, but she gave them to me  I waited on her two days and three nights, and never received a sixpence from her  she was in such a drunk state all the time.
You did not buy it of me  you bought it of my husband at seven o'clock in the evening  I was out of the room at the time it was bought.
You know you come three times during the evening to see him  you waited till half-past seven, and saw him, and the landlady known that she saw my husband  It was No. 27, Ropemakers'-street, near the City-road.
it now about it.
I beg for pardon  I am not an old offender.
I was not running  I was walking along the street.
I was going along the Borough, and met a girl  she asked me if I would carry this for her  I said, \Yes\"  she went away directly she saw the prosecutor coming."
I went to her lodger, as she had duplicate of mine  she laid hold of me coming down stairs I went into this woman's yard  she laid hold of me, pulled me out of the place, and struck me two or three item  the policeman and he went into the yard to fetch the things  I did not take them and had no intention of taking them  I had not them at all.
I found it in Newgate street a and took it to the pawnbroker he asked where I got it  I told him I found it  he said, \I shall keep it and have it advertised  he neither asked my name nor address  he told me to look for the inspector of the police  I went out, but saw none  I had looked to see if there was any any advertisement, and saw none; and when callled about it he said was owned  I asked him who the owner was  he hold me to go the police station and I went there  they told me to stop till the inspector came in which Id did and in a few minutes the came tom house and said a man I my house had lost his watch  I did not know it  his clothes were nearly at the bottom of the stair and my girl went to pick them up  I said to the child, \"Do not touch it, for I belive he has money  she said, \"There is money in the pocket\"  I said, \"Do not touch it\"  I took the clothes up-stairs, and put them in the room, and shut the door  I saw him about two o'clock  he said he had lost his watch  I said I had seen nothing of any watch  he said he was much obliged to me for paling his clothes in the room  he was no insensibly drunk when he came in he could not answer a question."
. Mr. Robbins, the prosecutor, saw me  he said, me  he said, \If you will own to it, I will no hurt you as I have children of my own;\" and I said, \"I will not, as I am innocent of what I am charged with\"  I would not own that I did it  when the prosecutrix came up to me she was quite intoxicated, and asked me to have something to drink, which refused as I said, \"I I am no tin the habit of drinking.\""
My mistress did not give me clean sheets on my bed when I entered her service, and, at the first opportunity, I took a pair to air them, and put them on my bed  the knives and forks I was cleaning up that day, as she was going to part with her lodgers  the candlestick and bottle-stopper were in the coal-scuttle, not in my pocket.
She gave me the key to go for a bottle of gin, and I took the sheets to put them on my bed  she so hurried me away that morning that I did not know what I did  I took one with me, and I left some of my own things behind. Witness. She left some of her own things on the kitchen table.
. I can assure you I never had the handkerchiefs in my hand  I was looking at some red ones, and the young woman bought one, which he said was half-a-crown  I then asked for a bit of edging  he pushed the handkerchiefs along, and they fell near the feet for another lady.
I did not, I can assure you  the handkerchief was full two yards from me, and was pushed along past Davies's elbow  the box the edging was in was pushed by  he would not show the edging to me  the gentleman said, \If you have got them give them up, I will let you go\" I said, \"I have not got them?\"  he then said to the young gentleman, \"Are you sure you saw her take them\"  he said, \"Yes\"  I said, \"Why did you not come and take them from me?\" I held my shawl quite open, and said I had not got any thing of the kind-the handkerchief he cut off was half-a-crown, which she had in her hand, and the policeman would not let her pay for it."
. I did not take the calico; but the other linen and the bread I did  the calico was on the kitchen table.
. I have lived twenty-six years in gentleman's families, and never had anything against me before.
On the Sunday before, I had lent her 5s. 2d. in money  I said, \Give me my money, and I will go\"  she got up, and threw me down stairs  I returned back, and said, \"Give me my money and shawl;\" and she said, \"When it suits me I shall pay\"  I went away, and went to a relation's in Rosemary-lane; and she came there on the Tuesday night  she said I had robbed her  I thought she was joking then  afterwards I was in the Borough, and she gave charge of me.   Witness. I did not find the prisoner at the place where I went to  I did not see her for three weeks, when I gave her in charge."
Did you not see me in O'Neil's?
She came in the house, and spoke to me after dinner  she walked out, and bid the man of the house good evening  she spoke to him as good as a dozen words  she cannot deny that with a clear conscience.
My husband deserted me, and I was very much distressed.
. I don't know any thing about it  Smith gave me the petticoat  I did not know but it was her own  she gave it to me, and told me to put it on, as it was cleaner than my own was, and I did so  we both went out to get some things for tea  I left her talking to some persons in Whitecross-street  I came back after going for the things for tea, and I could not find Smith again  I went home and went up stairs, and asked if she had been  they said nobody had been at all  I sat down to my tea, and two policemen came in and said I had robbed Mrs. Sweet  Mrs. Sweet found the key of my door would open her's  she said she knew it would open her door, bur she had not time to get another  she keeps a house for girls like myself, and takes in things of all descriptions, and pledges  she has taken things from me  she charges 3d., for 1s.  if I go the same day to get things she charges 15d.  girls have pawned pattens and different things of hers  if you pawn any thing at her place for 1d., she charges you for it  if the house was searched, there are tickets and parcels folded up, and how much people have written on them  and when they fetch them away they have to pay so much interest.
I never pawned any thing but my husband's clothes  I pawned every thing in my husband's name. Witness. She always pawned in Messenger's name  she did not pawn with me very often  not for a long time before.
I borrowed the money of my brother for the duplicate of the shirt  I pawned it myself, but I bought the duplicate afterwards of him  I did it out of a friendly act  Ballard and Stuckey told me it was their own  they stopped at my house ten minutes  as I could not buy it, they asked me to pawn it for them, which I did, and gave the money to him, and the ticket; and two or three days afterwards, Ballard came and asked me to buy the ticket  he said, \Your husband wanted a shirt\"  I went to my brother, and borrowed the money, and gave him 1s. 6d. for it."
I was very much distressed.
They gave me the cloak  he had been in another room with me for twenty minutes, and followed me into the room where the girl was in bed  he was intoxicated. Witness. I was perfectly sober  I never gave it to her  I was not in the room ten minutes.
I asked her to take the cloak upstairs  he had no money about him  he made me a present of the cloak till he should call for it in morning, and said he would give me 10s.
He told me he lodged down Eyre-street-hill.
He met me in Barbican, and forced me into a room, and then the landlady asked him to pay her, he said he would when he came down stairs, and she said he should find some other lodging  he paid her 1s., and the he was an hour and a half in the room with me.
You came into my place when I was not present  a person in the next room has a key that fifty my door. Witness. There is a person in the room on the same floor, but no one entered her room.
I did not pawn these things.
I did it out distress.
. I was in distress  I saw the door open, and went in and took it.
I did through distress  I have three children.
. I did not take the coat.
. He gave me the money to take care off till the morning  it was not my intention to rob him, but so many persons coming in, I thought it was the best way to take it down with me  he had asked me to get something for supper, and to take the handkerchief to put it in  I delivered him (the landlord) all the silver and the handkerchief  I said, \I shall not let you have the two sovereigns\"  I put them in my month."
Where did you find all these different things?
. Her son-in-law gave me the stockings when we lived in York-terrace  the prosecutrix removed three times  she always allowed me to put the things into my box when we moved, as she had not many boxes  when we moved once the plate was put into the plate-box, and the china was put into my box, as the crate would not hold it  she told me whatever I might not be able to put into the crate, to put into my box, as we could get them out when wanted  she left the care of the linen to me  on Saturday I had a letter from my brother, saying my sister was ill, and wanting me to leave  on Tuesday, master was shaving, and said, \Bring me a clean shirt before you go,\" and mistress said, \"Put out a clean pair of sheets\"  I took them out, ready for the bed  my mistress said, \"Do not stop longer\"  I put the clean shirt in my pocket, and forgot to give it to master, as his door was locked; and as I was going out, she said, \"Let me see what you have in your pocket?\"  I had swept the ring off the carpet just before we moved  she allowed me to go my sister's funeral  she was angry at my leaving, and said before my face that she would prosecute me, if possible, having told the Magistrate, on Tuesday, she would not."
I had a very sick house  I took them myself, and pledged them myself, because I could not support my family.
They shut her in a room two policeman  she was so frightened, she confessed it, but it was me that took them.
I never touched the ham  it fell down, as it was placed in the window on the top of a heap.
. I went into get a quarter of a pound of butter.
Yes, we had three quarterns of rum  we went down this turning, and he gave me a half-crown piece.
The policeman knows that I was crossing the road, and he can prove I never saw the watch.
This man said, \Come back\"  I came back, and he said, \"If you got the man's money, give it him back.\""
I pulled out my pocket, and said, \You are quite welcome to see what I have got\"  he said, \"No; I don't want to see it here,\" and took me to the station-house  I went down the turning with this man for nearly half an hour  the policeman came past  i said, \"I shall not say with you here any longer\"  he said, \"I shall have my money back,\" and I said, \"No you will not\"  I went away from him  was crossing the road, and he said, \"Stop I shall give charge of you for robbing me\"  his watch I never had at all."
I am innocent  I have worn these stays several time  I cannot account for what my husband buys and sells.
. He went home with me, and because I would not let him do as he liked with me he said he would go and get another bed  I never saw the watch till he gave me in charge of the policeman  I did not know what he gave me in charge for.
When I gave Mrs. Bonner the half-crown, she gave it to another young woman to give me change, for she compared it with another she took the night before, and showed it to some omnibus and cabman in the place some said it was good, and some had  the lady said nothing to me about\\ send\\ ing for a policeman till her policeman came in  I think it impossible she can which is the half-crown I gave her.
. I know nothing about it  it being wet that day, I had been drinking a drop, and did not know the half-pence were in my pocket. I do not know who I look the sixpence of  my sight is very bad  I took them in the street for thing which I sell.
It was part of my husband's wages  I never was in the shop till that day.
. I was never in her shop before that day  the girl saw a woman give me a few half-pence after I left the shop.
You recollect you put your hand into your pocket, and pulled out your handkerchief, and three sovereigns fell on the ground, and then you knocked me down, and gave me the black eye I have now.
. The money came from his pocket, and he dropped them on the ground, and then he struck me  he was very much in liquor.
he was rather tipsy  he put his hand into his pocket and took something out  and he gave me in charge.
I told him I brought out 5s. and spent 1s.  I never saw a farthing of the man's money at all.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I met this young man and another, and the other one palled my shawl off my shoulders  I was much in liquor  I asked the prosecutor where his friend was  he said, \Round the corner, in George-street\"  he pulled out his handkerchief and put it round my neck, and then he asked me to go home with him  I said I could not take him, and then he said, if I did not give him the handkerchief, he would say I had robbed him."
I lived fellow-servant with Mrs. Clark at an hotel  she knows I never tool a farthing  I lived at the Thatched House in St. James's street, and never had my name brought in question  the spoon was all over mildew  I took it down among the dust, and put it into my pocket, as it was old  that is a year and a half ago.
I know nothing of the cheque  I have been in the habit of receiving money from friends, transmitted to me, but I know nothing of this cheque.
I left her because she had a broker came to a seize all her goods  I know nothing of the duplicates.
You asked me to come with you  I asked you,\ What for\"  you said you did not know  you immediately went to the mantel-piece and laid hold of a decanter, and asked me to give you some gin  I said I had no money, and you told me to come with you."
I was taken for the same case, a week before, and discharged. I am innocent.
I am not guilty of this offence.
I am very sorry for it.
A person who was in the family-way asked me if I had ever seen any baby-linen about  I saw these things lying up-stairs, and took them to take home to her.
I had asked her to let me pledge them  she said did not mind, if I would take them out on Saturday night.
The woman told me to pawn any thing to the\\ amountof 10s.  I went to the pawnbroker's, she stopped outside, the door  we went to a public-house and had a quartern of rum and a pint of ale, and spent it between us, and drank together from Monday night to Wednesday night.
I am innocent  the pawnbroker said he could not swear to me.
. These glasses were my husband's before he died, which is more than five years ago  I never took one of Mr. Wood's glasses  I was obliged to make money for my children by pawning them.
I saw this sovereign lying on the carpet, and the door wide open  I put it in my mouth, and came down to this gentleman, and asked whether he was going to give me what he promised  he asked what I had in my mouth, and I gave it him  there were two girls in the house besides me.
He speaks quiet false  there was an omnibus going by  I was standing by the window  I had some halfpence in my hand, and dropped some  he came to me an said, \What have you got there?\"  I said, \"Nothing\"  I went two or three steps away, and then he came and brought me back  if I knocked them down I did not know it  but I had not got them."
, You did not take them from under my arm, but from my hand  I was showing them to my mother.
I came from the country, and was to take a few handkerchiefs down  I was looking at these, and had a little drop in my head  the man came and took me by the shoulder  I threw them back, and said I was no thief.
. I did not take the watch  my brother threw a stone, and broke the window  he brought the watch in, and asked me to go and pledge it  he went with me, and stood outside the pawnbroker's shop.
It is false, he treated us with gin, at a public-house in Whitechapel.
Did not you meet me in Aldgate?
He came into the wine-vaults where I was sitting down, and sat down by the side of us  he called for a pint of porter, and asked us to have something to drink, and we refused, saying we had quite plenty, and were intoxicated  he called for half a quartern of gin, and I said it was quite plenty among us three.
Did you see me at a coffee-shop at half after five o'clock?
. I am quite innocent.
You said you saw me put it on the bench?
. I met with this man  I did not want to keep his company  when I came to the toll-gate I spoke to the toll-man to try and get rid of him, but he still followed me  I said, \Keep away from me, I am in a hurry to get home\"  he still followed me  he said, I should have something to drink  I said, I had something to drink before  he urged me, and I said, I would take a little beer  he brought ale  and then he said to a man and woman, \"What are you going to have to drink?\"  they insisted on my drinking with them  I drank one glass of gin and peppermint, and I do not know what became of me from that hour to this."
You cannot say that you saw the money in my hand.
They all say falsely  I was led into it by their own behaviour.
I was very much intoxicated at the time.
I had been to the Maid and Magpie with some friends, and they had made me tipsy  I know nothing farther  I have five children of my own.
The things were lent me.
His daughter said there was a pair of old stockings and a handkerchief I might have  the shawl belongs to myself  I took the handkerchief to wrap it in  his eldest daughter gave me the two handkerchiefs that were in my box.
I was very much distressed.
I handed her the shoes out of my hand  I bought them for 4s., at another shop.
I was not mad  I was taking care of the mad people in the asylum  I did not kill any of them  when I am working for you, you say I am mad, and you changed my bed for me with witchcraft, and gave it to the son-in-law and daughter  you say I was jealous of you.
Did you ever see me strike her before in my life?
It is no use to ask him any question  he would say anything  he was not there till I was in the hands of a policeman, and I gave him a locker in the jaw.
He is right in what he says.
You got all my things in pawn, and two handkerchiefs which I brought out of the asylum clean  a stinking little Irish blackguard, the country was better before you came there  I was doing better you came there  I am in heaven as long as I am away from you  I do not care if I go to the gallows or be transported for life  I hope I shall see some of them before long in a strait-waistcoat.
The lady said if I would give her the beads she would let me go.
I told you that Mrs. Hurley had come to me, and I lent her the petticoat till Monday, when I was going to get it. Witness. I never authorized her to lend or sell, or part with any thing.
Did not I say, \Be sure and get it out when Mr. Hurley gets any money?\""
This is all spite, because she lives with one of her lodgers, and she struck me on Friday night and gave me this black-eye.
. I was going home and the gentlemen shoved against me, and asked if I was a policeman  I said, no  he had not got far before he fell down with his face on the ground  I went away from him five or ten yards  he overtook me again, got hold of me and dragged me by the ribs, and said, \Go home and sup with me, old boy\"  I went with him as far as I could  he had several falls, and put his hand to his pocket three or four times and asked what it was o'clock  the policeman came up and led him a little way and then left him  we both fell down  I took him to the bottom of the street and said, \"I wish to go home with you if I can\"  he said, \"Very well\"  I did him good night, and on my return I found the watch in the road  he got a violent scratch in the face by falling down."
I had no box, and never told him to take one  he left it at the public-house where he put me down.
I never told the man to carry the box, as I had no such thing  I went to Mr. Nicholson's to know which was the best was to find the owner.
He was with his mother in the morning, drinking at the Duke of York, about one o'clock.
He will deny it  this is a spite they have owed me about five years  I have been totally ruined by them  my things broken and smashed in the street by him and his sister.
He is sure to deny it, and is capable of swearing to it  his oath is not to be taken, he would swear any thing it is well known  he lives in so many places, where he lives to-day he will not live to-morrow  a young woman was tried last night, in the New Court, through his sister  they make a practice of bringing people here.
She was not there at the time at all  she is evidence against me because he could not get any body else  she lives with him.
She has lived with him for twelve months off and on, and it can be proved  all the neighbourhood know it.
Were you there at the time he came out and struck me?
Did he not strike me, and say, by the b----y H  y G  t, he would punch my face for me?
Last Tuesday, at half-past twelve o'clock, I came from market with a peck of oysters and some herrings, and I sat at the corner of the Duke of York  this chap has got a wheelbarrow, and sits out in the street  his mother came up to me about half-past one o'clock in the day, and began to blackguard me  (I happened to be in a little trouble by the family about five months ago, and then she was constantly blaming me about my poor old soul of a mother who is dead)  I made her no answer, and put up with a great deal from her  her expressions were unbearable  the son came there at a little after one o'clock and the sister, and began to abuse me  I made them no answer, but moved my things from them for quietness  there were some stones in the way, and I was obliged to move back again, and I put the things on the pitch  he came there about four o'clock with the witness, with a peck of oysters, and he put them down on the pitch  there was no porter at all  I was sitting down mending my apron  his mother came and struck me across the face  I said nothing, but he got up and walked away, as I did not wish to be injured by him  I have been hurt by them for the last five years, and constantly abused  a woman came up and asked me to open pennyworth of oysters, which I did  my back was turned to him as he came out at the door of the Duke of York  it is not my knife which has been produced  he came out and made a blow across my face  I put my hand up with the knife in it to save my face, and whether the knife cut him or not I did not know at the time  it was not with the intention of cutting him on injuring him  it never entered my head  I should be very sorry to do it  the person standing by was a stranger, and I cannot find her out, or she could prove it  I have no witness  nobody knows what has become of me  these people have such sly arts, they have let nobody know what has become of me.
It was not me picked his pocket  I was going to pick it up to give it him  there were two more boys there.
A person named Eliza, was in the family-way at the same time I was  I had a child to nurse in the same way, and when I went from nursing Mrs. Castor's child, my mother would not let me in without I brought a child, as she knew I had one; and Eliza told me she would get me a child  I knew that she and a young man lived near Black-heath  this is the child that Eliza gave me  I know she had another one a little boy exactly like it.
I was very much in distress, and took the table-cloth, which I left for 2s.  I took a frock and got the table-cloth out, and had it in my apron, to leave at home.
My lodger sent me for 2d. worth of pig's cheek, and said he would make me go  he then sent me for some more, and I asked him for the halfpence, he said he would not give them to me, but gave me another shilling.
I never took any shillings out of my pocket till I got to the station-house.
I went the night before to get something for supper, and met some people  I got drinking, and gave my money to a person to hold  after I went out on Saturday morning, I left 7s. at home  I took the other money with me  when the prosecutrix gave me the half-crown, I went to get change  they could not give it  I brought it out, and she said it was bad.
The other girl was with him first.
I was coming from St. Albans to Barnet, and met the old gentleman  he stopped talking to the young woman  I happened to be talking to him also  he said he only wanted one of us, and said he would give me sixpence  I said an old man like him ought to be ashamed of himself  he asked me to put my hand to his small clothes, and I did  I refused to go to the field with him, and, as I left him afterwards I saw the bag and watch  I said,  \What is this?\"  the woman said it was a purse and watch  I said, it must be his  I went after him, and asked if he had not lost one  he said no, and I left  he afterwards called after me, and said he had lost his watch  I took it out of my bosom and said \"If this is yours you shall have it\"  the constable came and asked him what was the matter  he said he had lost his watch, but he could not say whether I took it out of his fob, or whether he had dropped it  the constable asked him to give it to him and he would make a job of it  I did not deny having it."
He told me to meet him next day at twelve o'clock, and I was to receive 2s. from him.
He gave me the handkerchief, and told me to meet him next day at twelve o'clock  we went into a passage together.
He gave me the handkerchief instead of money.
You said you had no money  you gave me the pin, and we went up the court together, and were there above ten minutes.
He gave me the pin  I would not allow him what he wished, and he swore he would give me in charge.
She knows I intended to redeem them  I had 1l. coming to me that day  I told her I would go and redeem them immediately.
The property was my own which was found in the box  the key belongs to a box I had, which I gave away, and I did not know it fitted master's box till he tried it.
The duplicate was found on the other girl.
Was it not another girl offered them in pledge
Nothing was found on me but the spoons  all the things were in the other girl's pocket, and the gentleman at the station-house took them out of the woman's hand who searched her  a woman searched me and found nothing on me.
I do not recollect ever seeing the man.
I met this woman  she asked me to go with her  I called for a pot of beer and a quartern of rum, and gave her a glass  I had been a little tipsy the night before  she followed me to this gentleman's house, and as soon as we got inside she began quarrelling and jawing me  this man said, \Is she your wife?  I said, \"No\"  she began quarrrelling and jawing me, and she took hold of my breast and put the quart-pot in my shirt  I put it under my arm  she took another pot, and said she would knock my brains out  I took that and put it under my other arm  she then took up a pint-pot, and threw it at me, it hit the wall, and bounded back again into my hat, and then that boy took hold of me."
I was going home with some things that I had been up all night to finish  then this man spoke to me on the bridge  he behaved very rude  I met a man who said he knew my husband when he was a superintendent of police, he gave me a bundle to hold, and then there was a cry of \Stop thief\"  he said, \"Give me the bundle\"  this man says that the door was open; is it consistent that three or four persons would go to bed and leave their door open?  the policeman saw a man take the bundle from me."
My husband was out of work  I had neither money nor victuals  the prosecutrix said she would give me food if I would come and do needle-work for her, which I did for two or three days  where she went to take her husband's dinner I went with her, to see if I could find my husband.
If he had given me time, I would have got them out.
The young man took hold of me as I passed him, but I do not recollect any thing of the ring.
The night she came home, I was told I could not sleep there  I bought the apron of Mrs. Richardson, the landlady  the woman who was in charge of the house brought a man to sleep there, and the landlady would not let him come again.
The Prayer-book belonged to Ellen Moran, who came out of the hospital, and the prosecutrix said she lost a Prayer-book with the names of her children in it  she left her own husband, to go to Gravesend with another man  she has not a blanket to cover her  they are all in pawn  these bits of things are my own  there is a collar sixteen years old, I brought it from Wales  she has done this out of spite  her sister robbed me of 5s., and gave me a black eye.
I told the Magistrate I bought the apron of a woman who came before the Justice.
That was the woman she left minding the house  I wore it the night the prosecutrix came home  all the things are my own  she has done this for the sake of the money.
This piece of bacon my daughter bought, and gave it to me in my apron.
I got drunk  I lost my own money and my shoes  I know nothing about the bag.
Mrs. Kagan's daughter pawned the shirt.
He is taking me for another female  the officer knows the same.
The prosecutor was in liquor.
There was another female taken with me, he did not know which it was.
I was in distress through my husband's leaving me destitute at home  it was my full intention to have restored every thing.
He said he thought I was enough to pay for all, or he could have taken the man and the other woman.
I had not had them five minutes, when he came and took me with them  I said I had just picked them up, which I had  he called me a thieving wretch.
I picked them up  I did not steal them  his things lay about  I bought the shawl for 1s.
She came down to my place on the Friday, and asked me if she could wash the things in my place  on Saturday night, because we had no rent, she locked my husband up  I went down to my place, and was so vexed that I took all the things off my line in the kitchen, and said, \They sha'nt be there,\" and I hung them in my yard, and this girl came down and said I wanted to steal the petticoat  Donovan and her man knocked me down, and gave me two black eyes."
She says I was drunk when I took the bellow to pawn, and I was not  I told her I could take them out, and was willing to do &c.
I leave myself to the mercy of the Court.
I did not do it  if I was short of money, I could borrow a sovereign or two.
The prosecutor is a common brothel-keeper  I never saw the counterpane  I was not asking for charity when the officer took me, but they give women a few half-pence when they are going out  on the day the counterpane is said to be lost, I was drinking in a public-house I heard two girls talking about a counterpane they had pawned, and they said they could stand a glass of gin out of the money.
Why did you not give me in charge?
I missed them myself, but I know nothing about them  the spoons I took out at Mr. Mulcaster's I paid for myself out of my wages, and bought two caps and a pair of shoes, and then I lost the remainder of my wages.
I am not guilty of all they bring against me  there was only one spoon missing.
I met a friend or two, and got intoxicated  I don't know what I had.
Did you not give me the paint?
It was done in November last, and we have been threw ever since  we were waiting for our friends remitting us money  my husband did it expressly to pay our rent, and I am willing to suffer for him.
I am innocent.
I asked to borrow a gown and handkerchief  I was going to see a friend  we were always in the habit of lending to each other any thing we had.
He wanted me to go home with him, and I told him I would have nothing to say to him.
Was I ever near enough to take the watch?
. He must have done it on purpose to give me is charge  I never knew he had a watch.
. I did not take the money  the money she took out of my mouth was my own  her husband was not present.
I told him it was from extreme distress  I had been very ill  my gown was in pawn that I have on now  1 got it out.
. What I did was through distress  I meant to redeem these articles  I was robbed by three young women, who were tried here last August, and I never recovered my property, nor have 1 beet well since.
I picked them up as I passed by this lady's door.
. He did not give me the opportunity to give him the sovereign out of my mouth, or I should have given it to him  my sister had given it to me early in the evening to get change.
The money is my own  I had been to the theatre, and hid changed a sovereign  I went into a public-house  the prosecutor was there, he insisted on my having a glass of something at his expense, I refused, and said I had money, and showed him the change  he would make me take a glass  I then went out to look for my friends  I was going home, when the policeman and the prosecutor came and took me  he was so much in liquor as to be hardly able to stand.
He followed me, and said he would give me 1s.  I said I did not want him  he said he had a girl of the town that he lived with
There was no one with the prosecutor  you were not there
I told the Magistrate that the prosecutor gave me into custody as he had given me a sovereign for a shilling, and the policeman said he could not take me for that  the prosecutor then said, \Well, she took it from me,\" and then the Magistrate asked him if that was the case, and be said, \"I don't recollect.\""
When he came the second time to me he said he would take what I had got; I said I had but half-a-crown and one shilling; and I said to the policeman, \Take notice of what this man says\"  the prosecutor came and said to the policeman, \"Do not mention the first charge; it will be something in your way.\""
She owed me 3*., and she gave me two shirts, one to take to be washed, and the other I might pledge for 2s.  the carpet had been left in her wash-house  I washed it and took it home, she knew it  the cups I had taken home with some victuals which the lodgers had left; and a basin she gave me to take something home in  I did not intend to keep them.
When I came on shore at Execution Dock, did you not come to me and ask me to have something to drink?
Did I not give it out of my hand?
. I know Captain Smith, and had been in lodgings with him  he took me down to Limehouse  I stopped there a week, till he went down to the ship  he came to me last Sunday, and went the next morn-ing to the ship  he said to me, \Come down to Black wall, and I will give you some money\"  I went, and he gave me six half-crowns and four shilHogs, I bad spent sixpence out of it  I had two pints of beer, and a penny-worth of bread and cheese  I left him about half past three o'clock, and the ship has sailed  I came on shore at Execution Dock, and met this man  he treated me with a glass of gin  I gave him a drop of rum, and then we had a quartern of gin  I paid for it  I then called for a pot of half-and-half  It came away, and had not got ten yards before he came and said, \"I am going with you\"  I said, \"No, you are not\"  he said, \"I have but 2s.  he was then pulling at my handkerchief, where my money was, and I took the money in my hand."
Was there any body else in the tap-room?
They said the goose laid before the fire till one party could win it, and if I took it to the public-house, one party would fetch it back and give roe a pint of gin.
You did not find any thing in my box but a cap and one stocking, which my mistress gave me to wash  the money I had given me for Christmas-boxes, and some my father had given me  my mistress told me to put the washing by  I had no where to put them, and I pot these in my box.
. My father gave me a 5s. paper of halfpence last Sunday night  I have got witnesses to prove it, I put all the things into my box, and told my mistress they were there.
I took it through hunger and distress.
It is false; I have been in custody of the policemen, but I do not know that he was at my trial.
. I throw myself on the mercy of the Court I deserted my poor afflicted parents five years ago, and have been living with a worthless fellow, William King, No. 8, Edward-street, Bethnal-green  he forced me to pass bad money by his ill usage  I left him for eight or nine months, and he came to me again, and said he had got work  I returned to him, and he again told me to go and pass bad money, and when I refused, he beat me and knocked me about  1 am not the only one he has led into this.
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I went out for some tea for my breakfast, and I put my foot on the till of the door to go for a bundle of wood  she came and said, \I have got you now\"  she pushed me into the parlour  I never saw this soap till I saw it on the floor."
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
My sister gave me some money to buy a bit. of ribbon  I went, and met the other girl, who went with me  she was not ten minutes in the shop before she ran out  I did not know she had taken any ribbon till the lady said she had.
I told her I would get them back.
She did not pay me for half what I did for her.
I bought it of a woman that goes about selling things  it did not suit me, and I sold it.
I never sold them to her  I was at home at seven o'clock in the evening.
. The Magistrate said he could not commit me, be-cause I did not take the lodgings, but it has been laid to me.
She changed the notes herself, and bought the clothes herself  she had all equally with me.
The young woman who gave her information, sold me the shawl  she cried out in the road, and got a parcel of boys to come round me, and I said, \That is the woman I bought the shawl of  I gave her 1s. 9d. for it."
A woman came into the shop and bought some rolls, and she asked to look at it  it was given to her, and she had several other shillings in her hand.
The woman had a black bonnet on, trimmed with crape; she had a good deal of silver in her hand  she bought four rolls, and said, \I have paid for these.\""
Did not you know me by being acquainted with your cousin, and your cousin's brother was convicted with me before  did not You say to me, it is a very wet night, old girl  but never mind you cannot be hurt, for Powell does not know you, does he?
I am quite innocent of the first shilling, but I did pass the last.
I know nothing about the two half-crowns  they held both my hands in going to the station  I could not possibly put them into my bosom.
I did not know the first was bad.
I took the piece of beef through want  my master did not give me any dinner  I was cleaning the yard, and found the other things among the dust, and put them into my box.
He said at first that, I. took 10s. from him, out of his pocket.
The shilling I had for making a frock, and a woman lent me the two half-crowns  the prosecutor's questions did not suit my ways, and he said he would make me smart for it.
The table-cloth is my own.
I did not have it at all, but I saw the policeman with it in is hand as soon as he took me  the lady said, I had it on my arms.
It was impossible for me to carry these two large cloaks, for I had a child in my arms.
The prosecutrix agreed for me to lodge with her and pay her 6s. a week  and when I paid her, she wished me to go away  I said I should not as she had made that agreement with me  on the Sunday morning she told me to leave, because I had got no money to pay three weeks rent  in the morning she took me to the public-house, and gave me something to drink, and then told me to go away.
I met two girls, who asked me to go down Holborn  they went to this shop, and one got on the door, and took the shawl, and chucked it on me  I knew nothing about it.
I expected some money, and it was my intention to redeem them, but I did not receive it till I was in custody.
You did not find them in my box, but in the sacking of the bed.
Mistress gave me the scissors, and you were in the parlour when she gave me the gloves.
The prosecutor my husband and I were drinking all day long  he told me to pledge them, and I have often pledged them for him before.
I did not fling the pot out of my hand  I was going to the pomp with it.
A person gave it me, and said she would return  I do not know who she is.
On Monday, after going before the Magistrate, he came to me, and said, \If you will give me half a sovereign, I will be content with it\"  I told him I did not have the sovereign  he said, had I any friend who would make up half-a-sovereign for him  he has had 7s. 6d. in part payment of it."
Did I take it out of his hand?
I have known him for three years  we were drinking the whole of that evening  between twelve and one o'clock he agreed to go home with me, and gave me the half-crown  between two and three o'clock in the morning I was thirsty, and asked him to let me go down  he said I should not, unless I gave him the half-crown  I would not, and he took my hand and bit it  he called the policeman.
He asked if he might go home with me  I said, if be liked  we stood talking, and he wanted to take liberties with me, which I would not allow, and then he struck me, and called the police, and said I had taken his watch  the policeman came and said he meant to take me  I aid,\What for?\"  he said, \"For taking this man's watch\"  I said I had seen no watch, and he gave it to him out of his pocket  he took me to the station-house  three of the policemen tried to put it into their mouths, and could not."
She knows I was very much in liquor.
I met this man at half-past eleven o'clock with two more girls  he was in liquor, and said he had been robbed  I said, \Call the policeman\"  this money was my own."
Being in the deepest distress I pawned some of the things  my husband had left me for eight months destitute of every thing.
I met a drunken man  he told me he was other there, and said be would treat me to something to drink, but he wanted to go down the yard first  I went down with him  he took down a bridle and gave it me, and began to pull me about  I slapped his face and ran away  an officer saw him  he heard me scream and then came down.
I did not deny having the sheet  I said, \What sheet?\"  I took it out of my right-hand pocket, and put it on a chair  I was in distress, and was going to pledge it for 6d.  I meant to get it out again in the evening."
I have six children and my husband has been out of work a long time  I did it through want.
My father is a sergeant in the artillery, he is in America, and allovi my mother 35s. a month to support her  she drew 5l. 5s. four months ago, and went away, and left me at Mr. Richardson's, No. 69, New-road, Woolwich, a grocer, with nothing to support me  I was informed she was in London, and I came to London in search of her, in a place called Pye-street, where there is a lodging-house  I went there  she had not been there  I went to White chapel, and, not finding her there, I was crying in the street  I came to this young girl's mother's  she asked what I was crying for  she took me in and gave me a night's lodging  the next morning I got up and took this bonnet, on purpose that I might get into some place for relief  it was not a lodging-house where I lived  it was a grocer's shop  my mother lodged in the house for two years  I used to go about to the neighbours, and they used to give me a little victuals  my father will be home again in the Spring.
I had been four days without food  I have no home.
. I was in the greatest distress  my husband has been dead these three years, and my friends are all dead. I know not what to do if you discharge me from this bar; I am in the greatest distress, and all my friends and relations are dead, or I would not be a criminal at the bar. I have a brother, but he never relieves me  he lives at Bethnal-green, but does not notice me. GUILTY . Aged 40.  Recommended to mercy.  Confined Six Months .
. I had about 6l., and was in that place about a month  when I was there a week he asked me if I wanted my wages  I said no  he then said he suspected me  he used to go to my bed to lie down in the afternoon, and he must have put this into my pocket, and marked it  when he brought the policeman I said I had 6l.  they thought I said 1l.  he wanted to take liberties with me, but I would not let him, and he said he would serve me out in this manner.
I did it through distress.
When you told me to come back, I came directly.
We were not two doors from your master's shop, and you told me to come back, which I did immediately.
I went into the shop to get an article that I pledged a fortnight before  I lost the ticket  I went and asked another young man to allow me to have it without an affidavit, as I was going to a situation at Portland-town  he said he could not, and then I said I must leave it  I came out, and a person came out behind me, and directly this boy called out,\ Come back,\" I came back, and this bundle was thrown down, but I did not touch it myself  I had not been in the front shop  I had been in the box."
I never was in the front shop till he took me back.
. My mistress was not up  I was going to get a petticoat out of pawn  I had three shillings in my pocket, and wanted another shilling  the till was open, and I took the shilling, meaning to tell mistress of it when she came down, hut before she came down my master called in a policeman, and took me  mistress owed me a little money  I meant to have told her of it  I never intended to steal it, GUILTY . Aged 37.  Confined One Month .
I met him  he asked me where I was going  I said I did not know, I had no lodgings to go to  he got into conversation, and said, \Will you take a walk as far as my house?\"  I said, \"I have no home nor lodgings\"  he said, \"If you will walk with me up here,\" which I did, and we got half a dozen doors up Berners-street  he stood and talked to me  he said, \"I have but 4s. or 5s., whatever I have I will give you\"  we staid there a few minutes  he gave me 4s. or 5s.  I put the money into my pocket, and while we were there the policeman came by, and saw us there  he passed by, and the prosecutor said, \"You need not mind the policeman, he will not know but that I live here\"  I then consented to what the prosecutor wished, and staid there ten minutes  he said, \"What money have you got in your pocket?\"  I said, \"What makes you want to know?\"  he said, \"You have robbed me?\"  I said, \"If I have robbed you, give me in charge\"  he said \"Stop till the policeman comes, and I will\"  I stopped, I suppose ten minutes, and then the policeman came  he said, \"You are not going to run away\"  I said, \"No, and I will go to the policeman\"  I did so, and said, \"This gentleman accuses me of robbing him\"  he wanted to know what money I had  I said, \"You are welcome to see, I don't know whether it is 4s. or 5s.,\" and I gave it to the policeman  he said, \"It is five sovereigns\"-if he had said he had made a mistake I would have given it him back again  he said he had given me nothing."
As true as there is a Judge over your head and mine, may I never move from this place if he did not do what I have stated.
Mr. Lucas had given me the money when the policeman first passed, then he went his round and came up Berners-street again, and I said \Here is the policeman, if you wish to give me in charge.\""
Did I not go to meet the policeman?
Did not I run to meet you?
You said you saw me pull it down.
There were two girls pulled it down, and threw it down at my feet  I told my mother who the two girls were, and they are gone into the country  my mother is now ill in bed, or I should have had characters  there was no gentleman there at all; if there was, why don't he come  this is the first time I have ever been in such a situation, if you will look over it this time.
I was in very great distress when I did it  it was my first offence.
I never had them in my possession at all  they only stood in the passage.
. I was going along Chancery lane alone  a gentleman came and asked what I had under my shawl  I said I had nothing  he was coming up the street  a man with some linen came, and the policeman asked where he got it  he said he picked it up  the policeman asked if he saw me drop it  he made no answer  he came back to the shop, and then said it was me that dropped it.
I did not say such a word.
I begged his pardon, and asked him to let me go  I picked it from under the window, and when I came back to his door it was not open.
I was tipsy at the time, and had no cloak on.
I put them down before you, when you abused me, and said you knew I had been at the shop before, which I had not.
He is lying ill of a fever  I have five children, but am not married.
I beg for mercy.
It is my first offence  I leave it to the mercy of the Jury.
I found it in the passage  I do not know anything of it.
She allowed me to wear the things.
She did so to all the lodgers  before she was indicted she used to go out and pick up dirty girls and dress them, and she was sent to Brixton.
. She gave me leave to pledge the things, and allowed me to wear things  she keeps a house of the same description at No. 3, Market-street  she did not tell me exactly to go out for her  I helped her move, for one thing.
I was in distress when I did it.
I came a stranger to England, and I had no one to do anything for me  I got a place to be more respectable  I had nothing to keep me  I took these with the intention to pawn them, and when I got my wages to take them out  I took them to the pawnbrokers they would not lend me much, and I took them back  the washer woman, who wanted my place, told my master of it, and I was taken by the officer  I lived a quarter of a year at Mr. Berry's, a cook's shop in the Minories.
These things are mine  I bought them of a woman that was going to Scotland.
Did you put the sixpence into the till?
What did you do with the shilling I offered to you?
You called in two of the butcher's men.
This is not the shilling  his friend in the parlour put it into his mouth, and bent it almost double.
Did you ever see me in your shop before?
I am totally innocent.
Did you put it into the till?
I had not been in the shop before.
Did you not put it by on the corner of the shelf?
He had other money in his till, and shook it, and swore it was the one I gave him  he told a different story at the office, he said he put it in where there was other silver.
Did you not fall against the table, and put the light out.
You asked where I had been, I said I had a man in bed at a house, and you said no, he was at the White Horse.
It was another woman gave him the shilling  his wife cane and threw it on the counter, and the other woman snatched it up.
It was handed round to four or five persons.
You took some more money off a shelf, and mixed them together in your band, and your son had it in his hand  he handed it to another young man, and it fell on the floor  another young man took it up and gave it back to you  you sent for a policeman, but did not give me in charge  another policeman followed me outside the door, and gave me in charge  I did give you a bad shilling  I do not deny it, but which of the two I gave you cannot swear to.
Did not you mix that with another bad shilling which Mrs. Vandersteen gave you, and did not you pull it out at Worship-street among a parcel of other money?
It is hot the shilling I gave Mrs. Vandersteen  I am innocent of the charge.
I was very much distressed  I meant to have replaced them  I took them to pay my rent.
I never saw the jacket.
I met Mrs. Murphy, whom I know, and she said, \Will you let your little girl go and pawn these shawls?\"  I allowed her to go, and sent my little girl  she then said she had got two more  I said I was sorry for it  my little girl came back to me, and this young man came and called me  I went, and he said, \"Do you know anything of these?\"  I said they had come from Mrs. Murphy  they sent my little girl for her, but she could not be found  I was not near the prosecutor's house at all  the woman gave them to me."
We were very short of cloths  I thought it no harm to look for the worst I could find to cut up to make cloths with, which I intended to do  I had torn it in two, but had not time to tear it up fit for cloths.
Myself and three orphans were in a state of starvation.
I was going to return the things to her when I returned the aprons and caps.
Did not you give them to me to pawn?
She gave me part of them to pawn, and the sheets I took of my own accord.
I own I have done wrong in pledging the things  I did it through distress, and, had Mr. Greenleafe given me the time be promised, which was two hours from the time he took the door off the hinges and knocked the windows down, I would have got them  when he followed me, and took me in Park-lane, I was taken before the Magistrate, and it was all done in the given time, but I think it was all to distress me more than I was, as he will not let my sister have the frames which I work in, nor anything to enable me to get my living.
I was in heavy distress, and could not get anything  I had not had a bit of victuals for two days  I turned out to go to Red Lion-square, to get some tickets for food there, and I took this through distress  the man followed and took me  I am sorry for it  I have got a large family of children.
This witness never found the property on me.
I met the prosecutor  he said, \My dear, where are you going?\"  I said, \"Home\"  he said, \"Will you come with me?\"  I said, \"Where?\"  he said, \"I am going to turn round here, come round here\"  we went down several turnings together, and then he said a word to me that I do not wish to speak  I said, \"If you wish any thing, I should like to go to a house\"  he said, \"I will go to your house\"  I said, \"You can't, I live with my mother\"  he said, \"Come down here, and come up this alley\" and I said, \"I don't much like to go,\" but we went up the alley, and he began to pull me about  I said, \"I shall go home,\" and then he said, \"You have got my watch\"  I said I had not  I was going home, and he kept following me, and said I had  I called the policeman, and told him of it, and the prosecutor gave charge of me  he was very drunk."
I came the same afternoon and told you not to let anybody have them till my brother came, between eight and nine o'clock at night.
This is the person who said he would go with me between seven and eight o'clock to get them.
Curtis came to me one morning, and said, \Will you take these trowsers to pawn for me?\"  I went to the pawnbroker and he stopped them  I did not know what to say, and I said they were my brother's  I went to my brother (the witness) and told him to go with me  he said, \"Go, tell them not to let anybody have them till your brother comes between seven and eight o'clock\"  I then went home and told Curtis, and he said I had kept them, and not taken them to pawn, and then he made off."
I went up stairs, and went to bed with him  he gave me the coat to pledge  he told me to pledge it, for what money he had about him was not his own.
You did not  it was your master.
He gave me the coat to pledge.
Was not I very drunk?
I picked up the shawl, and did not know it was hers  I put it on my shoulder, and was sitting by the fire in the lodging house when the officer took me.
I had been above an hour out of the wash-house when he found it.
I know no more of it than a baby unborn.
You had bold of both my hands in going down, and how could I drop any money?
I had no more than the shilling, and did not know it was bad, that was taken from my mouth by the officer.
I gathered them up in a hurry.
I was going to leave  the things were in the kitchen drawer  I was very much confused with the charwoman  I had no box at all there  I took my things out from my drawer in a hurry  I had a little to drink that day  these were not pinned up in my bundle  my petticoat was taken off to wash, and I put the cloths round my person  these things were all open for any one to see  I never took a thing out of the house but the two towels that were round me  my mistress would do anything to transport me, if she could  she had been having words with me that she might not give me a character  the soap is my own  they have paid me no wages.
I found the duplicate  I did not steal the other things  I put them on my neck, as I had nothing else to go home in  I was not well next morning, and did not return..
The scarf was delivered to him at the office by another woman.
Did I attempt to touch your child's clothes?
I went out for a walk on Sunday afternoon, and saw this child  she said she had been in church sitting opposite the fire, and was so faint that she came out, and had missed her road  I asked where she lived  she said, in Glass-house-street, and if she could get to Aldgate church she should know her way home  I said I would take her there, and was going to do to  they have put her up to say what they please.
Did you take it of me?
I had been to Mr. Trail's that day  as to Church-street I never went near it.
I had some gin and beer with my fellow-servant on leaving, and did not know what I put up  I had thrown my gowndown on the carpet the night before, and tool: that up with the gown  if I had been in my senses I should not have done it.
My mistress gave me these things when she was in liquor, and when I went home that night they abused me.
When I went into their service I had a looking-glass, an ironing blanket, and some tea of my own  the articles in the bag my mistress gave me in the club-room.
I was not out of the house that day.
I left Mr. Cory's on the 4th of March, another servant came that night  the sheets were not pawned till the 9th.
How can you say it was me?
I never saw the prosecutor till I was before the Magistrate  he confessed he was so much in liquor he could not swear what was done  Cole is a boy of bad chraracter, and his mother owes me ill will, because I owe her some money  I could not have taken the prosecutor's coat of, if he was in a fit.
I met a friend who gave me some ale, and I lost all recollection till I found myself in the station-house the next morning.
I gave her a sixpence  she put it into her pocket, and took another out  I uttered the half-crown, but the sixpence 1 deny.
I never saw that lady in my life.
I have known the prosecutrix for years as a fellow. pauper, but am innocent.
I had been drinking a good deal that evening  I met the gentleman, and was with him a long time  he said he had lost his money  I said I had not got it, not knowing that I had  but when the policeman was there I found I had something in my hand  I said, \I have got something,\" and gave it up  how I came By it I do not know."
I was in distress, and was induced to pledge it, with the intention of redeeming it when I got money.
You said, \When you go towards your friend's again take my shawl,\" and you knew I was going for money  I was disappointed, and pledged it coming home."
I met a woman who asked me to take it to a house in York-square  I took it to Mrs. Haywood's.
I lost the ticket, and gave the landlady the declaration.
We were in great distress  my husband had no work for a long time  Mrs. Glanvill knew I took the saucepan and sheet to pawn, because she asked me to get them out two or three times  she called in a policeman, and would not wait till my husband came home at night, or he would have got them out.
It is all spite  they want to transport me  I was out nine or ten days, and drank at Banks's house, and got tipsy there  he has given me 6d. to drink since in his own house  I have been opposite his door several times  he has had several people transported from his house  he keeps the worst house in St. Giles's, and buys stolen goods  there are four doors to his house  there are nothing but coiners and thieves there, and they were much more likely to take the sovereign than me.
That man made me drunk yesterday..
I am very sorry for what I have done  I will not do so any more  it is through my sister, who turned me out of doors  my father has more need to correct his other children than me  he has said he wished to transport me  I want to go home to work to earn money.
A person with me took them, and gave them to me.
I did not pledge all the handkerchiefs  I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
The two-penny piece was my own, and the money too.
I did not pledge the gown  it was the prosecntrix's son, because his mother had locked up the tea and sugar, and he could not get any breakfast  he pledged it for 8d., and I went and got 10d. more on it afterwards  I pledged the blanket myself, and the boy was with me at the time.
Was not I cutting some wood for the fire at the time of the quarrel?
Did not I come out and say, \I am here, if I have done any thing wrong, I am ready to go with you?\""
After I went home, he began to ill-use me, and caught hold of me by the hair of my head, and tore all my hair out on one side  I had the knife in my hand, having been cutting some wood with it to lay for fire in the morning  he chucked me on the bed, and got his two hands round my neck, trying to choke me  as I was trying to get up again in the struggle, I cut him about the face with the knife, but did nut intend to do so.
I pawned it, not with an intention to Keep it, but to get it out the same night  the policeman came to me and said, \You tell me, and I will get you clear.\""
You asked me to go down the lane.
I was walking down the lane  he fell down, and was very tipsy  he had this purse in his hand  I helped him up, and he dropped it into my hand.
The drawer was not locked.
I was forty-three miles down in Kent, and my daughter and John Hubbard, and this girl, kept company for two years, and they had the house to do as they pleased.
You know you said you would come to my place when you liked  you knew John Hubbard before you knew me  he said he thought more of my daughter than of you, and then you stated this about the sovereign, and said any thing was your property.
If you lost money, where are Mary Sampson's fine dresses which the girl confessed she bought?
I never bought a saucepan of you in my life  it was my husband who was after the table a long while  I said it was not worth the money.
I pawned the chairs, the cups and saucers, and dishes  my daughter said they were bought with my husband's club-money.
I am quite falsely sworn against  it is all jealousy  I told this girl's grandmother that she was seen with a deal of money.
I acknowledge the sixpence was bad; but I was driven to it by distress asked a young man to lend me a shilling, and he gave me the sixpence to pass  I had not been there before.
All she has said is false  I gave my pocket up to the policeman, and there was a sovereign and the key of my box in it.
It was a box I had at another place  the sovereign was my own, and also another which I gave a man to redeem a dress with  as to the four, I know nothing of them  they keep a bagatelle table, and various people come there.
I saw the shawl partly laying on the ground, and being in the greatest distress through illness, I was tempted to take it up.
I did not have it  the prosecutor picked it off the floor.
I beg for mercy.
It was another girl took it  I had it to carry.
As I was going along I kicked my foot against the pot, but never had it in my possession.
The other woman took them, and gave them to me when she came out.
Did not you serve a little girl thirteen or fourteen years old that evening with a pennyworth of laudanum in that very cup?
He might probably have given me the money, for he gave me silver seven or eight times, and he might hate given me gold instead  I was intoxicated, and he was not much better.
I bought the boots, and the shoes of a woman I Used to buy slippers of when I was in service.
I tried on several pairs, and after I had been some time, he said he missed a pair  I sat down, and this boy said he saw me drop two pairs from under my arm, hut I never thought of such a thing.
The captain gave me some things, and I put the sheets round them to keep them dry, because it rained  I should have taken them back again.
I have six children, and a husband out of employment.
I was going home about two o'clock in the morning, and met the prosecutor  he kept shoving up against me, and said, \Will you shake hands?\"  I said, \"Yes\"  he said, \"Will you go and have something to drink?\"  I said, I did not mind  he then said, \"Will you go home with me?\"  I said, \"Where?\"  he came to the place, and then he went away, and said, \"Will you come back with me?\"  I said, \"No\"  then he pulled all the clothes off my back  I called the police, and he called, and said he had been robbed of two half-crowns; and then he said he bad been robbed of 1s. 6d. more."
I had the halfpence before I went to the place; the paper I picked up in the parlour, and tied them up in it.
I never touched the cupboard.
It is false  I never set eyes on you till you came to the station, and I heard the woman say to you, \Say that is her.\""
I met him in Long-acre, instead of Drury-lane  he stabbed himself, in felling on it as he got out of bed  he refused to give me any money, and broke several things in my place; and said, if I did not let him out, he would break every thing  I never had the knife at all. Wit-ness. On my oath she had  I never got into the bed, nor yet on it.
I did not touch him with the knife; he struck and kicked me several times in the bed, and said he would choak me if * * *  he then said he would see me d  d before he would give me any money.
I first proposed to send for my master, and he said yes I had better.
I said William had taken a sovereign of the money; 33s. was owing to me by my master, and I did not require any of that back.
William Collins seduced me away from my situation, and also induced me to tike my master's property; he took my clothes to his sister's before I left my place  the day I took the property I went to his sister's, and she forced the box open herself; her husband had about 8s. of the money, and William Collins had a sovereign.
I was coming up York-street, and met a very respectable young woman, and two men; the woman looked in my face two or three times; she was looking at a cap-shop window  she said, \Little girl I want to speak to you; will you carry this bundle to the railway, as far as the new public-house?\" I said I would go and ask my mother; she said, \"Never mind asking your mother, it will be in your road home;\" I objected  she said if I would carry it, she would give me something handsome; and if I met any body, to tell them it was my clothes, as somebody might stop me, and want to take them from me; and the young man said, \"It will look rather odd. if you are stopped, without you say it is your own things.\""
I was going to work with my aunt, and she put the things on the drawers for me to take and pawn, which I did.
I met a person I had known two or three years ago  I asked him to lend me two or three halfpence  he said he had not got them, he would lend me sixpence, and there was a young man coming across, who was tipsy  he had a row with him  he asked me to hold this paper, and I was not aware what was in it.
I was waiting At We corner of Bride's-passage with a friend; an old woman came, who bad got something in her hand looking at it; she asked me if it was a bad sixpence; I had it in my hand I was in no public-house that day.
Did I not tell you on the Saturday, that your drawer was opened by your son?
The drawer was opened on Saturday, between two and three o'clock  my fellow-servant came and told me of it  I went and had it locked, and gave the keys to my mistress  I saw no more of them till night, when I went out on an errand, and when I came back, a little girl had got the keys, and said she picked them up on the floor.
It is false  I did not have them.
The child was at the corner of White's-alley, crying very much  I asked what was the matter  he said he had lost his way  he had the pinafore in his hand  I took him in my arms, took the pinafore in my hand, and asked where he lived  the man came up and said I wanted to steal the child  the boot fell off itself  I gave the pint-fore and child out of my hand  I had no pocket on at all.
I never saw the child, and never touched the bonnet.
He bought some pies for supper when I went home; we went to several public-houses, and at each house be tried to leave the money with the landlord, and went to a gambling-house; I asked him what be wanted to get rid of; and he said, a sovereign, which he wished to deposit in the landlord's hands; we went to several public-houses; I went upstairs to make the bed; and while I was up stairs, I think he must have hid it in the coal-cellar; he gave me 4s. 6d. before he went to bed; he said \I will give you 4s. in the morning;\" in the morning I got up, and got breakfast ready; he said, \"Do you know where my money is?\" I said \"No, unless you have left it with some of your friends, as you wished to do;\" I went round with him to all the public-houses he had been to, but could not find  it; he then gave me into custody; they went to search my place, and he found the sovereigns himself in the coal-cellar; I never took the money, nor saw it till it was found."
I raked the coals about; but as to knowing the money was there, I did not.
Mrs. Cooper gave it me to pledge.
She gave it to me at half-past eight o'clock; I did not know whose watch it was; she deceived me when she engaged me; it is a brothel.
It is false; they searched me, and found nothing on me,
I was taken to the station; I had 3s. 6d. in my mouth; it was my husband's market-money; I know nothing about the bag and keys; I have been in a place as laundress.
I am very sorry; I hope you will be merciful to me.
I did not take the shawl, it is not their property.
I took it with me to pledge, thinking I should not get sufficient on the article I took; and had I not, I should have pledged the shawl.
You gave me these stockings.
He would not pay me my wages; I summoned him to the Court of Request, and he did not appear.
She lent me the cloak.
you went out on the Sunday night to sleep with your husband, who had left you; you was not there on that Monday.
I never saw the petticoat  it was never in my possession  there were other persons in the shop.
I said I should be happy for her to look into my box  she said, \No, I shan't.\""
These boots belonged to a brother of mine, that died at sea  Mrs. Childs was routing the old ones out of the cup-board, and said, \If there is any you wish you may have them\"  I took the other pair, and wore them there  I left the key in my box, and when I returned next day there was no key in it  these things were not in my box  I broke a glass, and she threatened to kick me out of doors."
He beat me this day three weeks, and called me a b  y b  h  I had been three years with his father before he took the business.
You received money of me morning and evening.
I was in Holborn  Mrs. Elliott came and asked me to go of the errand for her  she would give me 6d.  she said, \Say you work for me, if I go myself they will ask me to take work, which I do not want\"  she stood at the corner, and I gave her the 8s. directly I came from the door  she gave me 6d., and put the rest in her bag  they said there was a waistcoat or two they wished her to make."
Did I take off your things?
The child had the things in her pinafore. Did I have any thing in my possession?
I was coming home, and saw the child crying against the Royal Standard; she said a girl had brought her away, and she did not know her way home; I said I would show her, and I was going to the station.
She said at Guildhall that she put the shilling on the shelf which 1 gave her.
I was very much intoxicated, and did not know what I was doing.
I never saw the man at all  he was not with me.
I met the other girl, and she asked me to go home with her; I thought it was her mother's place; she went up, and unlocked the door, and went in; this little boy came, and she went down; she put the keys into my hand.
If you did not give me the clothes or money, what did you intend giving me?
My fellow-servant was ill, and I lost the key of my drawer down stairs  I had a sovereign from my master every morning, I used to put my money in there, and my fellow-servant said, \Take the key of my drawer, and keep the money in that.\""
Why did you not give me into custody the second time?
I was never in the shop before.
This shirt belongs to my eldest boy; they are not his.
Part of this is my property, and part he gave me to dispose of in the best way I could; I beg mercy for the sake of my children.
He gave them to me at a distance from the house, and told me to take care of them  I have known him eight or nine years  he came to me again and said, \Give me the things I gave you\"  I returned them the same as he gave them to me."
. The two articles found on me I was going to put back again  I had a nephew killed, and I wanted to get a few things to attend the funeral  I came home, and my husband had stripped me of every thing  he told me to ask Mrs. Garden for a few shillings which she owed me  I did not like to ask her, and I took the two articles  I did not pawn the articles  the pawnbroker has sworn falsely.
. This shawl was lying on the ground; 1 picked it up, threw it on the table, and Eady said I stole it.
You never saw me; you said you saw a woman, and you gave a description of me by being without a bonnet.
. I am quite innocent.
. Mrs. Smith told me on Sunday she wanted some money, as she had kept back part of the cab money from Mr. Hills, and she would make it up again before mistress came home.
She gave me leave to redeem them the latter end of the week; I could not get the money on Thursday night, and wanted her to wait till Friday.
Did you not say, \One of you women gave me a shilling, but I don't know which?\""
You said you were not certain about me; and if it was me, I had not the same dress on.
She gave it to several persons, to a butcher and others.
My little girl was sent for some beer in the pot  your wife sold the beer.
I sold the melted pot that morning to get a breakfast  Mr. Hanson saw this pot as soon as he opened the door.
She knew I was going to work  she lent me the shift for ten days.
She told the policeman there was a calico shift, and if it was hers it was marked \B. S.\""
I never locked my boxes; my mistress discharged a thief out of her house while I was there; she had a good character with me.
The man gave me the glass when I took him the stick, and told me to take it if I liked, as very likely he might break it; he was a stranger.
I did not take it.
I pledged these articles, having a payment to make, knowing I should be able to return them. I told the prosecutor they should be replaced on Saturday evening. The Magistrate would have taken bail for me to replace them, but the prosecutor would not let me.
Did you not accuse a young woman of it in the mob?
Did you not ask what money she lost, and did she not say she did not know till she went back, and you told her what was picked up?
I did not pawn it  I got up to go to work  I never saw the shawl.
I met some friends, who gave me some ale and spirits, and it got into my head.
I did it from want, not with a view to rob her.
Did you not try to get in doors when half the door was broken in  there were six persons took you up stairs?
Did you not come in with Butler and Joe!
When I went into the watch-house Butler said, \I am robbed\"  I said, \"Search him,\" and they found two sovereigns and a half, and 8s. in another pocket."
I did not intend to steal it; I had money in my hand.
He said at the Magistrate's that he had beeji accosted by five or six women in Old-street, and treated them with gin.
I picked them up at the corner of Type-street  two or three of them asked me what I picked up, and said, \Give it to me,\" but I would not, as if I had, they would have kept it."
I was tipsy.
I had 4s. 6d. in my hand  I thought I had paid for it, and the policeman had my money.
It was in my hand.
I was tipsy.
I was very tipsy.
I never laid my hand on any thing on the counter except the shawl  I offered 1s. 6d.  he refused, and I went out  when I came back, I shuffled my clothes, because my petticoat was coming off, but I never had it  he said, \You must have had it about you;\" but I had never seen it."
You did not follow me.
I never had the dress in my possession  my own clothes were falling off, and I put my hand down to hold them on.
Mary Ann, their niece, asked me to pawn these things  I did not refuse it, but I gave all the money I received for them to Mary Ann, and she gave it to her sister, who was discharged. On Saturday night, the 14th, my mistress accused me of taking these things, and turned me out of doors at twelve o'clock at night  I told her her niece gave me them, but she would not hear what I had to say, because they were in my name. She owes me a quarter's wages, which is 2l. 1s.
I had some gin and beer; I was very much overcome; I said I was going to bring it back again.
You gave me 1s. 9d., and said you bad no more money  I told you I was not going to stay with you for that, and then we came down stairs.
I said, if he would give me the rest of the 4s. that he said he would give me, I would get it him; he took me to a house, and sent for a pot of porter, and sent the boy for a policeman.
I did not pawn them, nor take them; it was another person; the duplicate was not found on me.
The prosecutor's wife gave me time to get some things out, which I pawned; I had forgotten this; if they had given me longer time I should have thought of this.
I bought the two shifts myself, the silk to make myself a bonnet, and I bought the apron  I had no handkerchief in my box  my sister Kit has done it out of spite  she broke my box and pawned my gowns, and then she brought the policeman to search my box.
The pillow-case ticket was the only thing found in my box.
She asked me if I would go up stairs and make the press-bed for a woman who was going to sleep in the house, as she was going to make away with herself; I said, \How can you think of doing so?\" I made the bed, and this bag and money dropped out; I said to the little girl, \"Take this purse down to your mother,\" and she took it down to her mother; I picked the sock up on the landing, and was going to throw it in the dust-hole."
. I was the worse for liquor, and did not know that I had this.
I am not guilty of all the things.
I took them, but did not intend to rob my master; when he settled with me I meant to redeem them.
I went there, she said her mistress was at dinner, and could not be seen for half-an-hour, and I did not wait; I never had the parasol.
I was coming down the street; there were two women; one of them dropped the bundle; I called her to take the things. Connor came and accused me of taking them. When I came back the child was dressed in its things. I did not know whose they were.
I took the gentleman home; he gave me no money; the landlady told me to search his pockets, and see what I could find; I found a half-sovereign, which I gave the landlady; she said, \Take that, and plant it under the bed; take his watch, and plant that too;\" I said I would have nothing to do with that; I saw his purse and took it; I did not know what was in it, I thought it was four shillings; these girls then came and wanted me to get some things with it; I said no, I would give it to the man in the morning; they then called the police."
I had been out selling some things, and I bought the boots of a young man who lives in Chelsea; I gave him 2s. for them.
You asked me for Oxford-street; I took you down Angel-court; When I passed my door I wished the female good night. I said, \Go down to the bottom, and cross over;\" there are two lamps in the court; he followed me, and said, \"Do you live up that court?\" and asked if he could go up stairs with me; he went up into my room, and said, \"What am I to give you? I am very short of money;\" he gave me a shilling and a fourpenny piece, having said he would give me 4s. I said, \"That is not the money you promised me;\" he locked the door, and put the key in his pocket. I said I would not stop for that money; he up with his fist, and knocked me down."
Did not I say there was a shilling he gave me in my I room?
I would have opened the door, but the people down stairs said they would not have any body come in. He struck me in my own room. I gave the inspector 1s. 4d. which he had given me, and said I had 1s. 4d. more of my own; he knocked me down against the window, and then opened the door and ran down. The inspector was an hour before he took the charge.
I pawned them in hopes I should be able to redeem them.
I was very much in liquor, and fell through the window; I picked one up in my hand; the chain was attached to the watch.
I had been drinking all the afternoon; I left my friends at the comer of Hoi born; I was going by Mr. Jones's window, and fell against it; I picked the watch up by the chain, and held it in my hand, when the gentleman came up.
It is false what the pawnbroker says, and the child too. On the 3rd of September I went to pledge my little boy's, boots, and was detained at the pawnbroker's.
I met him; he said, would I go with him across the square, which I did, and he pulled me about, and wished to take liberties with me; I would not allow it in the street; he said he would charge me with taking 5s. from him; and when he saw what was found on me, he said it was his; he is wronging me.
He pulled me about and tore my frock, and told me he would make me a handsome present to buy me a dress.
When the prosecutor left the house, Conner came down stairs  she called me out of the parlour  she had this watch in her hand, and said, \That gentleman has no money worth giving me to night, he has left this watch till to-morrow morning, he is to come and redeem it\"  she came the next morning, and I gave her nearly all the money I got for it  I gave it to Bartholomew to pawn."
Did you see me take it?
I went out to provide for Sunday. My husband was not at home when I came back; I knocked at the door, and said, \Mr. Southam, will you he so kind as to give me a lucifer match?\" he never spoke. I had some things in my apron, and Gibbons gave me five lucifers. Mr. Southam sat up in his bed, and said, \"What woman have you got here?\" Gibbons put his arm round my neck, and tried to kiss me. I went up stairs, and Mr. Southam hallooed out, \"Here is the quilt.\" I had taken off my apron and laid it down, with the beans and bacon and bread in it that I had bought My window does not open, it slides."
It was given me by a lad, who said, \Mistress, will you have this brush?\"  I said, \"Yes\"  I took it and put it into my apron."
You knew these things were gone.
I have been reduced, and pawned them all at one pawnbroker's, knowing the month was coming round, intending taking them out; on Thursday my sister came and paid the rent; she said, \I won't pay you all, but I will send it you next week;\" she said, \"What is to be done about the things?\" we had a few words on the morning stated; Mr. Kent came up and said, \"What is all this?\" I said, \"Give me time till four o'clock, I will get these things out,\" but they sent me off to the station."
You are aware I left three months before the other woman?
You said you had only 1s.?
I took my purse from my bosom and said, \Is this your money?\"  he said, \"No you could not have put my money into your purse\"  I put it in my bosom again  I had a hole in my frock and I lost it  I am innocent."
I was in great distress  I offered the prosecutor to go to a lady who would have given me 10s. from a benevolent society.
I was sitting at the door with three women; the prosecutor came down the street with two fourpenny pieces between his fingers; he said he was going to spend them; the women asked him to treat them; he said he would; we went to the Red Lion public-house, and had a pot of sixpenny ale, and two pots of half-and-half, which he brought to my place; I left them, while 1 went to get a candle; when I came back the women were gone, arid the prosecutor was sitting in a chair asleep, and was awoke by the noise he made about his money; he found the money he said he had lost at his feet.
You never spoke to me till you asked what I had got under my cloak.
This gentleman came by and asked the prosecutor what I had taken  he said he did not know, and then this man picked up the cloth which laid down by me  he did not see me drop it.
A man ran quickly past me, and I heard something drop at my feet  I looked, and there rested this piece of cloth  the officer came up and the other man, and as I moved away the cloth fell from my leg on the ground.
I know nothing of it.
. I went to the prosecutor's shop to pawn an article, and when I came out I had this frock before me; I was not aware it belonged to the prosecutor. I pawned it, being very much in want.
I did not say that; I did not take more than what you see; my husband said he would redeem them when he got work.
They were not taken with the intention of defrauding the prosecutor  I left on the Sunday, and they were to have been redeemed on the Tuesday, but I was taken before I could get them.
. I had some conversation with the prosecutrix, and she sent me to a public-house, to have a pint of beer  then she said I might have them for 10d.
She showed it to some young gentlemen at the bar.
. I never  took the room, and never went into it at all, and know nothing about it; the bed is mine, and has been so for six years; I had witnesses to prove it, but my time is too short: as to the other articles, I bought them of a woman in the street, and paid for them.
. I had just come out of the hospital. I was ill while I was there. I did it for distress. When I pawned the spoon I bought a pair of boots. I left my clothes with the intent of coming back to bring these back.
. I found the purse in front of the bar when those men she was treating came out; I picked it up, not thinking it belonged to her. There were several persons in and out. I said I had nothing of the prosecutor's about me.
. I did not know they were bad.
She says I struck her child; I am too fond of children to do so, and I have endeavoured to teach hers in the way it should go  she is a fortune-teller, and she teaches the child to sneak up stairs, and insult me because I am an aged woman, and a Christian  she struck me, and knocked me down.
She has threatened me these four months  she ran down two pairs of stairs to beat me, and struck me several times  she snatched the old tin thing out of my hand, and, being drunk, she pitched on it, and cot her eye.
Her name is not Webb, it is Friend.
She told me her name was Friend at the time she was confined with a second child, and several neighbours assisted her, to see that she should not make away with the child  she swore at Greenwich she was a married woman  if you knew as much as I did, the house would be indicted  they have owed me a prejudice some time  I think she says the blood spirted out  if it did it must have sprinkled over me, and I have the same cap on now  they were all tipsy  I was beaten down to the ground.
This poor young woman was up in a front-room, so that she saw nothing of it
You asked me for the shovel, and I showed you the shovel  this is called a pan.
. The prosecutrix ran violently down two pairs of stairs, and without any provocation beat me several times against a wall in the back-yard  I held up the dust-pan as a shield  she, being in liquor, snatched it from me, fell on it, and cut her head  they were all drunk, and always have in a large quantity of gin every day  I never struck her  her boy is four years old, but he is more artful than a man.
I paid all the money I received from all the ladies  there were books came from the ladies, and my mistress has put them away  I always paid my mistress.
I always had the money from Mrs. Wardle, and always paid my mistress  I never said that Mr. Wardle had had a loss.
When I first came, you missed a pair of trowsers and a gown, and said the other servant must have taken them?
I gave 2s. for the petticoat; Mrs. Bristoll hat often had it in her hands in the wash.
I picked it up on the pavement; several females were at the door, and saw me find it; I took it up, being is distress, and without victuals. GUILTY . Aged 21.  Confined Four Months .
I sold her my hammer; I went and said my husband would miss it, and asked for it; she said her husband had mine, but I could have this, and if I came again when he came home, I could have my own by paying 1d. more.
You told me to be sure and bring it back, as it was a better one than mine.
I took it to sell with the tray, thinking it was my own.
Did I not come back, and ask you if you had sold it, as I heard there was a bonnet lost?
The person I sold it for was an acquaintance of Mrs. Harding, she had sprained her uncle; she said she had taken this bonnet in lieu of 1s. which was due to her.
The bed-room next to mine was used for all sorts of rubbish  one morning I went in for some waste paper, and among it was this piece of net, very dirty  I considered that my mistress had thrown it away.
I received 8s. at a ball, and 5s. at a party which they gave.
What I said was, a shilling would be of consequence to me; I expected half-a-crown from him.
The money was missed more than a week before Christmas; every body in the house was sorry; I received 30s. from my husband, but thought I bad better not tell my mistress.
I never saw the watch; nobody in the room saw me with it; she has done this through spite.
I do not recollect having the pork; I was rather drunk.
She left the needles and tape in my house herself.
Mrs. Bugden was living with me for a fortnight or three weeks; she used to bring her work there, and she left the needles and tapes there.
I did it through distress.
It was my own; I got it at Christmas; I once picked up 3l. 10s., and gave it to the prosecutor.
I met a few friends, they gave me a drop of drink; I missed the duplicate of a handkerchief, and went to get a declaration of it; I never saw the gown.
I do not know how the bottle came there.
Were there not two females in company with you that night?
Was there no other person in your shop?
I was coming down'Cower Sloane-street between twelve and one o'clock in the morning; I kicked a handkerchief on before me; I picked up a piece of paper; I can neither read nor write; I showed it to a friend in the morning; she said it was a 30s. note; she took it out; I have never seen her or the note since; I never saw the prosecutor; he had two females taken up before me, and would have sworn to them; he said if I would open my shawl and show him the bosom of my gown he would swear to me; I never was inside the pawnbroker's, and dp not know how he came by the note.
She gave me the satin; it was a bonnet, which had been given to her.
I left it at her house, and she pawned it without my knowledge.
On the 28th of June, Mrs. Tucker had words with me, and I left her on the 29th; I staid at Mr. Cole's till the 1st of July; I never was in her house again till October; the towels are my own, and so is the thimble.
They belong to Mrs. Hollis.
A man who was living with me pawned the counterpane  I did not go in with him.
The blanket she gave me leave to pledge; she went by the name of Mrs. Collier.
I am very sorry for what I have done. I had but 2s. for it
I am very sorry; I did it through distress.
Did you touch me on the back?
He touched me on the back, and said, \I saw you take something, and give it to that woman, who is gone across the road;\" I said, \"If you saw a woman go across the road, why did you not stop her?\""
I met the prosecutor; he asked me to go with him; when we got to the Jolly Gardeners I stopped some time, and then left him.
I had 10s. in my pocket, and I got some liquor  I went to see a person I knew, and she was out  I went in, and saw this bacon on the table; this woman came down, I begged her pardon  I had 8s. in my hand  I dropped it, and she picked it up, and gave me 2s. 8d. only  I saw this bacon on the table, and I said if she did not give me my money, I would have the value of it  I took it in my hand  she went for the officer  I dropped a five-shilling piece, and that she took up.
I do not know where the shop is  I found them.
You was not near my place, you could not find the trowsers.
I was\\ light\\ ing a candle when he burst open the door  I had no trowsers.
I know nothing about the trousers  he took me down two pair of stairs, another man and an officer met him, and said, \Here are the trowsers; we have got them\"  I was in the coffee-shop, but I had no communication with any of them."
It was hung outside the door.
I was by the shop, and two girls took it off and gave it to me  I was going away  the gentleman took and brought me back to the shop  he said, \If you have got any money by you that you were going to purchase it with, I will let you go\"  they wanted to search me, but I said no, I had no money."
Did you not lend me the first sheet to pledge?
This woman persuaded me to leave my friends, and go to live with her; she is only a brother keeper.
She said I was to have the bonnet till I paid for it; she bought it for me, and lent me the shawl.
I was distressed  I took the first articles to get some breakfast, and the second to get them some dinner  I told the landlady I would get them out again  I told Mrs. Dunn I did not sell them  I left one for 7d., the other for 6d., and the other for 9d.  I said I must have them at night.
Was it not in the middle of the shop? I told you to weigh it and I would pay you.
I asked him to weigh it, and he gave me into custody; I am as innocent as a baby.
I had no victuals to eat, that caused me to do it.
I was passing the door, a woman came out, and put it under my arm.
You gave me 6d.
I said all I had belonging to him; I had money that was not his.
There was a child died, and the landlady told me to go to the public-house; I met the prosecutor, two men, and a girl; the prosecutor said she had robbed him of 1s.; I came back; I met the prosecutor; he said, \I have 6d. \"  I said, \"What if you have?\" he said, \"Julia robbed me of 1s.\"  I said, \"Very well;\" he gave me the sixpence, and I took it; he said, \"Give me the sixpence;\" I said, \"No, I will give it to your wife in the morning;\" he then said I had robbed him of 4s. 6d."
When you first took me, did you mention about any Orleans?
Some of the coins are mine  my mistress gave me leave to go to her cupboard, and said I might read her books  my master turned me out.
I have not stolen the things  my boxes were not locked, and I gave my mistress leave to look into them.
I bought these old things for 2s. to make up into boy's caps and sell them; I do not know where they came from; I had never been in that house; I was lost to what I was doing.
I implore your forgiveness; it is the first time; I promise it shall be the last.
Two persons asked me to go and pawn these shoes, which I did  they gave me 6d. and the ticket.
I did not know they were there  the key was by the side of the carpet when the policeman came up  I went into the City on the Wednesday after the Saturday, and left my box unlocked, and when I came back it was locked  I never saw the handkerchief before  the lace was in the box on Monday morning, because I served from it.
She came to my door, and called me infamous names, and tore my bonnet.
You broke my door in, and broke my clock? A. I did not break your daughter's window, or threaten to pull her out of bed  she was only confined that morning  I did not know my arm was broken till it fell at my side  there was a chair standing by the door  you were coming to hit me a third time, and I took it up and threw it in the middle of the room, but I was never inside your door at all.
Did I not call you to my assistance when she was ill-using me?
I did not cut the woman, unless it was in my own defence; she destroyed my property; I could not put her out, and called the policeman; he would not take her; she threw me on the bed, and ill-used me; she is a prostitute, and so are the two witnesses, and I know she robbed a man of 7l. 15s.; she destroyed my bonnet, and I did not like it.
I was not near the place, and never had the frock  she said at first she could not swear to me.
I was never in the house; I was running after my little brother, who was coming from work.
A young woman who was with me took one pair.
We had been drinking together in the afternoon; she came down and took my candle and candlestick off, and went out; when she came down she was calling me very bad names, and put her hand through the pane of glass and broke it.
I went into the shop to look at the blouses, and rolled my little girl's shawl up in my apron; I put it on the counter, and said I would call again in a few minutes.; when I got about fifty yards from the door he came, took me back, searched me, and found no waistcoat; I had been in the shop half an hour when the servant found the waistcoat.
Harris took it  she was in the prosecutrix's room that evening.
I saw a boy running, and the beef was chucked at me; I told him so; I did not have it.
The prosecutor gave me a sixpence, and then a shilling  I suppose he gave me the half-sovereign instead of a sixpence  he left me, and came back and said, he had lost a half-sovereign  I said, \You have not lost it with me, I have only the 1s. 6d., and three penny pieces\"  he said, \"If you have the half-sovereign give it me, and I will say no more\"  I gave off my pocket at the station, and said, \"There it is.\""
After I left Mrs. Mitchinson, a man came up to me with the spoon; I would not buy it; he came after me, and said he would take 6s. for it; I refused; he came again and offered it for 5s., and at last offered it 4s., and I bought it.
The prosecutor had no money; he gave me the watch; I pledged it for 3s., and he gave me the ticket, and then he came down stairs, and gave me in charge.
I never saw the jacket, and the pawnbroker said, three or four times, I was not the person.
I observed to him that the waistcoat was very much motheaten and I pledged them in the name of Wright.
I used to pledge them every week for him. He said, \I have no money, take these white trowsers, and get a shilling on them\"  I could get but ninepence. I bought tea, sugar, and other things."
You said, while you was at breakfast, \Take my waistcoat, and get 3s. for it.\""
Your children are running about without shoes or stockings, or a bed to lie on; and he sent me to pledge these things; I bought a breast of mutton; I made things, and went to the hospital to his wife; he was out drinking night after night; he came home at twelve or one o'clock, tipsy; his wife was coming home, and he gave me in charge.
You had no such things when I went into the house.
She sent round to my lodging to say she had met with an accident, and she was tipsy.
I had got a ruined boy who ran away from his apprenticeship; I went about all day to look after him. I went to the public-house, and had a pint of beer; my boy ran down the court where this woman was; I ran after him with the pot in my hand, and some beer in it; Dunt came after me, and said I had got his pot; I said, \Yes, and here it is;\" he knocked it out of my hand; I picked it up, and gave it to him; I intended to take it back."
Did not you see me lying down after he had ill-used me?
I have lived with the prosecutor three months; on the 22nd of June he left me without food or firing; I said, \What shall I do for victuals to-day?\"  he said, \"Come to me about two o'clock, and I will give you half of what I earn;\" I went; instead of giving me money, he abused me, knocked me down, and kicked me; I tried to get away; he knocked me down again, and jumped on me; and I have been very bad with my side; I caught hold of something on the board, I do not know what, and struck him with it; I did not know what it was till I saw it in the policeman's hands."
He struck me violently on the head twice.
It is a piece of spite because I would not go and live with him; he is married; I was drinking with the three sailors when he came and abused me, and hit me twice on the head; I threw the beer and glass and all at him; I was not exactly sober, and am sorry for it, but I did it in a passion; I had no thought of taking the handkerchief; I knew one of the sailors well.
I am very sorry for what I have done.
He said he had been with several girls during the week  I was not away from the town.
The gooseberries were outside  I asked the price  a man outside said they were 1s. 9d., but I should have them for 1s. 6d.  he said, \You can take them, and if there is not six quarts in it you shall have them for nothing\"  I went on with them, and the man stopped me."
I never saw it till it was in the policeman's hand.
The man came and asked if I had stolen a bit of print from his master; I said, \No;\" he searched me and found nothing; he then picked up the plaid, and said I must have dropped it; I know nothing about it."
She lent me the ring; she was very much in liquor that day. She had 2l. or 3l. of mine in her possession; she said it was not the value of the money, but the manner in which 1 left her house.
Were not you in a public-house having a pint of beer when I saw you first?
I met him; he said would I walk with him; I went down the yard with him, and asked him what he was going to give me; he said he had 2 1/2 d.; I said, \Good night,\" and was going; he called me back, and said he had a 1s. he would give me; I went with him; he gave me a 1s., and wanted 6d. out, and I would not give it him."
I said, \Let us go and see if we can find the ticket,\" and we found it in the room."
I am not the person who pawned it; it was a person taller and darker than I am.
The prosecutor and a female came to my house, and asked me to let them have a lodging till eight o'clock; there was a lock and key to the door; I gave the key to the prosecutor; I had occasion to go out before eight o'clock, and while I was gone the female absconded; he asked me where the girl was; I said I did not know; he then asked about his watch; I went into the room with him, and there laid the ticket on the top of the drawers; the woman who was with him was not unlike me, only she is a little taller.
These shoes were lying on the pavement; I took them up, and in going by the prosecutor's shop, a lad came and said I had stolen a pair of shoes; I said J had not stolen them.
He gave me a shilling, and if he saw the purse in my hand, why did be not take it out?  I never saw it.
I took the cullender, but not the cups and saucers.
I will take my oath I never pledged them.
The prosecutrix said she had lost her gown, and no one took it but me; I said, if she had any suspicion, to take me; she did not till next morning. I am quite innocent of it.
I was charged with stealing a brush; it was found on the ground; there were a number of persons there to shelter from the rain.
I took up a dress thinking that I should like it better than the one I bought  the prosecutor said should he put it in paper  I said, \No,\" and put it down on the counter."
Why should you iwcar to me when there were, other girls round?
Did not I say I did not know wheie it was.
It is my first offence.
I never saw the shawl.
I gave the duplicates of all these things to Mr. Dryden  he said if I did so he would get the things out.
I have had them these four years.
I did it through distress.
I was in Lamb's Conduit-street  some boys were tormenting me  I met a woman and asked where she was going to  she said to No. 5  I took the child to Museum-street.
I had but one sovereign in my hand.
I got four sovereigns at a raffle, and the rest I worked hard for; on the Tuesday morning the prosecutrix sent me to the butcher's, to see if she had left her purse there.
The young woman asked me to carry it, and she would give me a trifle.
I broke off the ears  I did not know the rules of the field  I never had been gleaning before in my life, and I am afraid they told me wrong  I neither took an ear of corn from the shocks, nor yet touched the shocks, only what was between the shocks.
He said he took a great deal of bad money, and he would make me suffer for all.
They took out what they liked, and claimed it; they took my mother's Bible.
These were my own things, which I have had for years; Mr. M'Intyre was tearing up these books; I said, \What a pity, I should like to read them;\" I own I took them to read."
I was clearing away the supper things, and on coming out of the bar, I saw 3s. 6d. on the floor; I took it up, and coming in again, I dropped the money; my mistress called me, and said I had been to the till, which I had not; she took up the 3s. 6d., and put it into the till, and took 4s. 6d. out.
He said at the office that I said, \Oh don't take me, I will never do it any more!\" and that is what I said; I never said a word about any money."
I throw myself on the mercy of the Court.
I first told the cabman to stop, and when you asked me to deliver up what I had got, I said I had nothing but what you gave me.
He gave me the purse as I got out of the cab; I met a policeman, and was asking him the way home; I did not know where I was; if I had had an intention of going away, I could have done it before.
I bought a lot of goods, and took these up by mistake.
Can you swear to me?
Did I have it concealed?
I was in Whitechapel, and this man was very tipsy; he asked me where I was going; I said, \After some gin;\" he said, \"I want some beer, not gin; I have been drinking gin all the night;\" he allowed me to take his arm, and we walked some distance, but could not get any beer; I then turned back, and had not gone far when I picked up the purse; the policeman came and said, \"What have you got in your hand?\" I said, \"That is what I have got,\" and I gave it to him; in going along to the station, the prosecutor fell down, and the policeman picked him up; he did not want to go to the station; he only wanted his money."
There was another girl with me; she took them; I did not.
I pawned two of them, but he says there were three.
Do you mean to say that I put my hand into my bosom?
The statement of Smith is false; he asked what I was taken for, and then, two hours afterwards, they brought him up, and he said this.
The shoes are mine, and the other things I was ordered to pledge by his wife.
When she laid ill she had not necessaries, and wished me to pawn her things; I did, and gave her the money and tickets; two days before she died, she called her husband to her and gave him the duplicates; the shoes are mine.
I acknowledged receiving 3s., and 1s. 9d.; I lost it, and offered to pay him; but he said he would sooner lock me up.
You gave me 1s. 9d. on the Monday?
Did not you give me four pairs of trowsers that day to pledge?
She had somebody taken up before me, and said she could swear to the shawl they had.
I never named Jacobson; I was in the habit of coming for work.
I said nothing about Jacobson; I said I had come for some more work.
I did not pledge any; I said I heard some were pledged.
I did not pawn it; I met a friend at the door, and asked her to pawn it.
I did not pawn either of them.
I lived with Mr. Hider six months ago; I left and came back again; I am guilty of the riug and waistcoat, the others I know nothing about.
I have a lump; but I never saw that child in my life before.
He said he could not swear to the bacon?
You said you could not swear to it, but you believed it to be yours?
I bought it for 1s. 6 1/2d.; he said he cut some off and sold it to a woman, and he did not know who it was.
It is false; I had been drinking all the morning.
It was done while under the influence of liquor.
They used me shockingly; they both took liberties with me; one used me very bad indeed; I had a knife in my hand cutting an apple for my little girl; I do not know how it happened; I said I would pay the doctor.
I went into the George with my little girl, it being a wet day, to have a pint of beer; these men sat at the table, and asked me whether I would have a glass of gin; I said, \No, thank you, I am going home.\" I had an apple in my hand for my little girl; the eldest man put his hand down on the ground to pick something up, and took very indecent liberties with me; and his comrade hugged me round the neck; my little girl hallooed; they immediately got up, and their hands were both cut and bleeding; I followed them outside the door, and said I would pay the doctor for dressing their hands; they made use of some very bad expression to me."
I have witnesses; he told a gentleman if he could not make away with me, he would either hang or transport me.
I solemnly swear I never said such a thing; I said it was what the gentleman gave me, and it was a hard thing to be locked up for nothing; she knows it is false, neither did she mention it to the inspector, or say a word of what she states now till she went before the Magistrate in the morning; the gentleman gave me the money, and he wanted it back again, after he had taken indecent liberties with me; I was with him from eleven o'clock; I met him against St. Thomas's-street, as the clock facing the hospital was striking eleven.
When he came to take me we were both on the ground; the gentleman had me by the throat  he accused me of robbing him of 5s.; I said, \No, it is false;\" the policeman asked what I had in my hand; I said that was nothing to him, what I had I should give up to his betters; I am quite innocent; the prosecutor told me to follow him; I asked him to treat me to something to drink; he said he could not, for he was too near his home, and did not wish to be seen."
I was very much in liquor at the time, and did not remember the shawl till I was at the station.
I declare I never saw him; I had been washing all day; I was never out of the house all day; I never had such a shawl in my life.
As to your seeing me that evening, you might have seen me at eight o'clock; not afterwards.
The duplicates under the bed were of my own property.
The two shifts belong tome.
The prosecutrix was moving, to deprive the landlord of his rent; the shifts belong to me; the knives are mine, and one table-cloth; she allowed me to pawn some things.
I went to buy a pair, and tried them on; I had one shoe on my foot when the policeman came and took me away; the young man who was going to have the money for them did not come to the Magistrate's on the following Monday; I did not see the prosecutor at the shop.
I had the money in my hand to pay for them; I was trying them on, when the policeman came and took me, before I knew the price; the policeman said I was two yards from the door, which, is false; I was holding my foot up for the young man to put the shoe on.
He knows I am not the person; the superintendent would not take the charge till he went for the other constable; how could I knock his hat off, and take his watch and chain? I saw him the next night at this public-house, and is it likely I should go there?  he was drinking with me and some other women on Monday night; he left the others, and came out and walked with me; the policeman told him he would be robbed, and he said he knew me better than the officer did; I went home and went to bed, and I told him to go to bed.
Yes, and he said he knew me perfectly well; he said he would treat me; I went to the public-house; there were othet females and males that he treated as well as me; we then walked up Webber-street, and the officer said to him, \Do you know who you are with? she is a common prostitute;\" he said he did not thank him for his information. I went home and went to bed. I live at No. 25, Gloucester-street. The prosecutor came to me the next night, and said, \"Where is my watch?\" I said, \"I know nothing about it;\" he said, \"Will you come to the station?\" I said, \"By all means;\" he has known me two or three years."
It is quite false; I tried them on, and put them on a chair; when I came back they were lying on the floor, at my feet; they did not drop from me.
The young woman with me was going to pay 6d. on the booti till we came home from work  I was selling things in a basket.
I was coming up Thames-street, and met this chap; he said, \Come down a turning;\"he gave me some halfpence; I put them into my pocket; he said, \"I have got no more, here is my handkerchief;\" I put it into my bosom, and walked up, and he said, \"She has got my handkerchief;\" I put my hand into my bosom, and was going to throw it over to him."
Was I intoxicated when you took me?
I went to Mr. Wall's, and he wished me to go as his wife; I took the articles, but 1 intended to redeem them in a few days; the first time I ever was in a pawn shop I went, by Mr. Wall's desire, to pawn his watch, and got a sovereign for it; I hud every thing under my care ever since I was there, and all the privileges of a wife.
I had no intention to make away with them.
I solemnly declare I am innocent.
I have nothing to say; my friends live in Wales; Miss Russell brought me from Wales.
I am not guilty of it; he had the money in his hand, and he dropped a shilling, which remained on the ground till the policeman came up; I had it not in my hand; he gave me part of the money first, and said he would give me the rest; he would not give it to me, and it fell out of his hand.
He knew me before.
I was not there; I was having my dinner.
They half starved me, and gave me no clothes.
The woman told me whatever I brought her she would buy of me.
Your father was in the room first.
The prosecutor's father came into my room, and asked me for the rent; he went away; I drank a pint of brandy, and was insensible; I went to a public-house, and treated him to a glass of rum; I went home, and the young woman, seeing I was in liquor, locked my door; about two o'clock the father came to my door to break in; I resisted his proposals; the wife, and Welch, his son, and four others, came into the room; I had a knife, which I took up to defend myself from the father, and, in my fright, stabbed his son, but not with intent to injure anybody; I am truly sorry for it.
I was there all the afternoon, and was very tipsy.
I went to the Carlisle public-house, and a man asked me to have a biscuit and cheese; I paid with a fourpenny-piece which I had from him; when the bar-maid said it was bad, I returned it to the man; we then went to the Hen and Chickens, and he gave the man two fourpenny pieces; he then gave me four shillings, and I disputed about it, knowing he had bad money; he said if I did not go home with him, he would charge me with robbing him, and he charged me with robbing him of 10s.; I know I put the two fourpenny-pieces into my mouth; I did not know that the other was bad; they had me up next morning, and sent for the waiter at the Carlisle, and from the Hen and Chickens, and he stated that the man gave him a bad fourpenny-piece the night before; I was remanded till Wednesday; the man was not up against me; he had given two false addresses, and the Magistrate said I must be acquitted of that, but he should send for Mr. Powell to know if the fourpenny-pieces were bad, and I was committed for that; I told them the man gave me the fourpenny-pieces.
How was I dressed?
I am unfortunate; I met with a man, who asked me; to go home with him; we walked on, and he told me to go into that house for a pint of beer; I did so, and had down a 5s.-piece that he gave me; I did not know it was bad; I asked him to go with me; he said if he did I should run away, as he had been tricked before, and he gave me in charge.
I must have taken the lace in mistake, and put it there; I did not know it was there.
He took me into the public-house, gave me a handkerchief, and said, \put that round your neck;\" as I was very cold  I was shaking him to rouse him up  I picked up the knife by the door."
I fetched it and gave it to Mrs. Elliott; the dish does not belong to Downing.
The door is open from half-past five o'clock in the morning till eleven or twelve at night?
I was not present when they were taken away; I own I pawned them; I gave the name I was told to give; I was at my lodging and she came to me and took me in a cab and asked me to go and pawn it; I was not aware that it was stolen.
I met a man, who gave me two glasses of gin, and took me to the house, and the bundles were there; he said the boy left the house-door open for him to go in, on condition that he should give him half what he took; he told me to put the key in my pocket.
, A man I was living with gave me the money; I was not aware it was bad.
The baker is mistaken in my identity; through unforseen circumstances I was in possession of two bad pieces of money, but when I uttered them I was not aware that they were bad; when I was first taken I was bailed out.
I went there at five o'clock for a night's lodging; I had some bread, and opened my knife to cut it; the policeman then came up, and told me to move out, and threw me out; he then came up again, and said, \You shall not be here\"; I said, \"I am not doing anything wrong; there was a large number of persons there; they told the policeman I had a knife in my hand; he came up to me in a passion to take it from me; the sergeant also came up, kicked me in the chest, and knocked me down, and they took the knife from me."
You knew that 1 was in difficulties, and was in the habit of pawning things.
I acknowledge pawning these, but intended to take them out again; I asked my master to pay for them out of my wages; my own things were in pawn to support my children.
For what purpose did you keep my half-crown?
. Mrs. Smith gave me two shillings, I gave her them back.
When I went to Mrs. Hunter's, my two sisters were with me; I never went into the room she speaks of, except when I went to take the lodging; I was to pay her weekly, and she was to provide, and when I went she would not provide, and there was nothing ready, so I went back to my old apartments. Witness. Two persons came with her  the room was ready for her  the servant let her in, and immediately went out  she asked for some cold meat, which I took up to her, and sent out the servant for tea  the prisoner knocked at my door as she went out, and said she was going for her baby's night clothes, and asked me to have tea ready by the time she came back, but she never came back  she said she took the lodging for herself till the following week, and then for her brother.
. The charge is made against me purely from motives of malice; I engaged this person's room, and no doubt she felt annoyed; I was there upwards of an hour, and could get nothing, and then went back to my own apartments, which I found I could still occupy, and as she objected to provide, I did not think it necessary to return.
When I went to the shop, I asked to look at some dresses, and said if they fitted I would keep one, and if not I would give an order for one; she never named payment to me, nothing was said about payment.
Why did not you wait for the money?
It was a credit account; the young woman said she should be happy to take my order: I did not see Mrs. Noel; it is only a debt; I had a Chancery suit in hand, and was obliged to take a little credit.
Is there any lock to the door?
I have never been away from the premises till I was taken; Schwank had given another young person in charge that night, for robbing him of a half-sovereign, and who is to know whether he had a watch and guard after that? I never saw him before I was at the station.
You dragged me on the floor, and somebody came and said they would put me on the fire.
Did you not tell me I was a d  d fool if I did not go in?
Rhodes pulled me into the house, and I stood by the fire; Mr. Morrice caught hold of me in a very violent manner; I said, \No; tell me to go out quietly, and I will go out;\" a man said, \"I will put her on the fire; \"Morrice pulled me down, and was going to drag me on the floor; I had nothing to defend myself with but what was in the fireplace."
I had no other view but of returning the property; I did not take them with the intention of stealing them.
I found it in the yard; there were a great many workmen in the house; I picked it up on the Saturday; I went to my father and asked him to take care of it.
My husband was very much in the habit of ill-using me, and was very much addicted to drinking, and seldom or ever sober; he would rise from his bed and leave me and my poor children at home, and would not earn a penny, and when he came home I used to get the worst of language and illusage from him which aggravated me very much; he has not earned 10s. for his family for these six months; I pawned the things to support my poor children; he aggravated me very much; I was not in liquor; I had nothing to drink.
Mrs. Curry allowed me to make use of the tray; the yards are all one, and the tub was placed under the butt for me to make use of.
Did you not give them to me?
She gave me the things for the work I had done.
A boy gave them to me in Orchard-street.
I lent one to Mrs. Woodcock, she pawned one, and I pawned the other; he knows that Mrs. Woodcock pawned it.
Mr. Horspool owed me more than the\\ amountof the blanket; I had to lay out money for him.
.I had a knife open in my hand, peeling an apple.
I picked the umbrella up at the door; I beg for mercy.
Can you take your oath that it was I that did it?
You have known me down the Kent-road for several years?
You did not take me into custody.
I am a poor unfortunate girl; I have walked down that road three years, and have never been in custody, and never done anything that I was ashamed of; on Easter Monday I had on this very light shawl that I have now, and a new straw bonnet, which I had put on for Easter; it was not me; I was certainly down there about a quarter-past eight o'clock, and left in company with a young woman and two young men  I mentioned the public-house I was in that night if they had liked to have got evidence  it was not me; there is not a shopkeeper about there who can say I ever did wrong, though I am unfortunate; I never did, such a thing in my life, and never had two men follow me.
He took the prosecutor to see the shawl, and he could not identify it; I pledged it because I had no money and nothing to eat.
I did take the gown; I was under the influence of drink.
I never was in the shop before; I gave her that shilling; I did not know it was bad.
He came down with me to where my friends lived; the man and his wife were at supper; the man asked him to have a glass of ale, and he sent out for a pot of beer, and gave me a sixpence to get it; when I went out it wanted a quarter to twelve o'clock; the woman said to me, \Don't you go away to-night;\" I bid him good night, and he went away."
Did I come out to you when you inquired for me?
I told my mistress I wanted to leave her service; I went to the persons I had lodged with; I told them how I was treated, and they said I had better not stop, and I should not want for a night's lodging or food; they made me take something, through which I did not return that night; I did not ask for the key.
I was never in his shop till I went back with the policeman.
Did you ever see me before?
I am innocent of it, and never was in the shop.
I did not take the shirt; it was a young girl, and I went with her to pawn it.
You had been drinking gin; you fetched three sixpenny-worths; you have been tried here.
If she had given me the money, there would have been no words; my face was scratched to pieces.
Did not you ill use and rob the man?
It was done in the scuffle, in ray endeavouring the get the poker from my sister; she had got it ill using a man; I have got a witness, Ann Wilson, but she will not come forward.
I was going to work, and met a young man, whom I know by sight, but do not know his name; he asked me to take the bundle in-doors; I did not know what the things were; I was undressed; the officer made me dress myself.
I did not cross the road at all; I was going to show it to a person with me.
It is a bit of spite the policeman has against me.
I told you I would show you where I got the sixpences.
I went to a person to carry some clothes, and she gave me the sixpences.
Did you find the carpet in my possession?
My mistress kept me so short of victuals I was obliged to borrow some money of my sister to buy bread.
He had no money, and gave me the watch to pledge, and I was to meet him at a quarter to nine, in the Edgware-road and return it him; I went, and waited for him: he never came; when I heard I was going to be taken, I tore up the ticket; he has done this to get the watch back for nothing.
You called me out of the public-house; I did not come, and you called me a second time.
The money fell upon my frock, and I placed it under the straw.
I beg for mercy.
An old woman slept with her that night.
I was in very great distress; I have a very bad husband.
I do not recollect ever touching it; I was very much in liquor.
Did I not give up a gold ring to my mistress which I found?
Did I not say the cook gave it me?
The cook gave them me, and told me to pawn them.
I only asked him for 6d., and he would not give it to me, and then I took the handkerchief; he would not take it back, and then I took his watch.
I was charged with stealing 7d. out of a pint pot; I was given into custody and discharged; I was then charged with stealing these things; I took the liberty of using the handkerchief on Sunday afternoon, with the intention of returning it; when I was given into custody I went up-stairs to return it, and my mistress said I had no business there.
My husband has been a dreadful bad husband to me; his father was drawing-master in Haileybury College, and by that means he got acquainted with some of the nobility, and made me write to them; he has turned me out of doors at midnight, with my child at my breast.
I had not the least intention of keeping these rules  I found them lying about, and thought they were of no use.
I picked it up about half a yard from the door; if I had stolen it, I should not have gone into the shop.
Banton said he would not prosecute if the money was given up to him, and when the money was given him, he said he would prosecute to the utmost of the law.
A young man gave me the watch to pawn; I gave him the money, and never saw him again; I did not know it was my master's till I came back.
On Tuesday afternoon I was in Billingsgate-market, and did not leave till about half-past 5 o'clock; when I got to this place, I saw the man lying on the pavement, but did not touch him.
I never was in his shop before; I gave him the half-crown, which was given to me.
I worked for my mistress for seven months; I never was in prison before, and it was distress led me to it, having a family of three children.
When you came up, did I not say you might search my box?
I said I would go and show you, if the Magistrate would allow me?
The sovereigns I know nothing of; the piece of coin I picked up, about seven months ago, in my mistress's bedroom under the carpet; when my master missed the sovereign, my mistress came to my bedroom, room, and said, \Mary, your master has missed a sovereign out of his pocket; have you got it?\" I said, \"No; I have no money belonging to my master;\" she then said, \"Have you got any money in your boxes?\" she searched them, and found no money; I was half undressed, and was going out for a holiday; she saw my pocket on my side, and took bold of it, and said, \"What money have you got there?\" I said, \"What money I have is my own; my sister gave it me to go home and see my mother;\" I had told my mistress, months back, that I was going home in June to see my mother; I had in my pocket two sovereigns and 10s. 11d.; the two sovereigns were what my sister gave me to go home; the prosecutrix then went down-stairs, and showed my master my purse with the money in it, and my master gave me in charge; my mistress was not so friendly with me as usual, having had a quarrel with her nephew, and tearing the coat off his back; he summoned her, and she had no witnesses; she came to me, and asked me to be a witness against her nephew by saying that I saw the quarrel between them, when I had not, and I said I would not; and when I would not go, she promised her shop-boy a shilling if he would go with her; and when he would not go, she discharged him the next day, and after that she never liked me, and she used to leave money about in the chair-covers, and all parts of the house, and in the parlour, where she says she missed the sovereign; I found a half-sovereign about a fortnight before be missed the sovereign, and I gave it up directly I found it; I found sixpences and shillings also in the chair-covers, and always gave them up; I humbly beg to throw myself on the mercy of the Court."
I am as innocent as can be; I never saw the man; I never robbed a man of anything.
I did not go up stairs the second time; I called from the bottom of the stairs.
You told me you would not pay me my wages, and I told you I would not go without.
Did not Mrs. Cowling say to me, going out of the hall,\ He has got you now safe away?\""
The mark on the tablecloth is where a shade candlestick stood. and Mrs. Dickenson said to me when she first came down, she thought it was her sister, in putting the candle out; Mrs. Dickenson told her of it, and she said directly, I had done it.
Were you in the shop when I first came in?
I agreed to give you 3d. for the tea pot?
You said you had taken a bad shilling before, and you would pay yourself.
, I gave half-a-crown for the teapot, and this woman came in and accused me of the first shilling; I never put my hand near the counter; I had not time to do it.
I never saw anything of the cloth till he came and caught hold of me.
I sell things in the street; I went to buy a reel of cotton, and offered the shilling to the shopman; he asked if I knew it was bad; the other I knew nothing of.
I never saw your face before you came up to the court, on Thursday morning  I will take my oath I never was in your shop.
The shopman said that was not the first bad money you brought, you brought a bad half-sovereign.
Was I in Ash's company?
I did not say anything of the kind.
I am an unfortunate girl; I lodged with Mrs. Ash; I went out with her and she asked me to have some brandy; I went into the house with her, and she asked me to hold her basket for her.
I never was in the woman's house; as for a white shawl, I have never worn one since I have been in London; I was in bed that afternoon; I begged my landlady Mrs. Gray to come here to speak to my innocence; I hope you will give me time to send for her.
I am unfortunate; the two shillings were given me the overnight.
I had just taken the money  I was not aware it was bad.
I took two shillings from a young man; I never knew that they were bad.
I asked you to detect it, and you refused; I offered you another half crown.
I had the three half crowns given to me to take a lodging, and buy myself a pair of boots; I never saw the man that was taken into custody in my life.
I gave her a good shilling; I had no bad money.
Mrs. Flynn threw me down, and the prosecutrix heat me while I was down.
Did not you follow me, knock me down, and give me two thumps on the stomach?
I had no clothes to get a situation with, and they called me all manner of names; Mrs. Flynn nut her hand on my neck, and pulled me down; I had a knife in my hand' at the time, but I cannot say whether I hit her or not.
Was I not coming out of Harris's public-house?
He dragged me on the bed, and asked me if I was not coming to bed; I said I should not go to bed to him, and I got some bread and meat; he asked me if I had not got any money for him; I said I had none for him, if I had any I had sense with it, he got out of bed and began striking me, and I struck him, and the knife struck in his cheek, and he called, \Police!\""
Have you sworn to that?
Where did I tell you to sell it?
Can you swear to me?
I left him on the 30th of April, because bit wife wished me to sleep in a pair of damp sheets; I went and asked my master to pay me, and he would not; I went on Friday after my box, and my mistress would not let me have it; on the Saturday my mother and I went for my box, and they searched it and found nothing.
I am an unfortunate woman; a young man gave me these shillings  I had no idea they were bad.
I was not in the shop.
When I went in the shop I bought bread, butter, and tea; I gave her a shilling; she said it was bad; I bad another which I gave her; she gave me change out of the good one, and kept the bad one; I walked out, she followed me and gave me in charge, and said that I gave a bad sixpence, which I did not.
I own I changed the checks; they were given me by the charwoman, Mrs. Tenpenny.
Mrs. Tenpenny tore them out, and told me to change them, and I gave her the money.
I lived with you seven years, and considered I was as good as your wife; I have only been away from you three weeks; I pawned my shawl to get the coat out which you have on now.
I lived with him seven years, and he has asked me in marriage; the only thing I have of his is the wedding ring; he was out of work, and I made away with everything to keep him; on the Wednesday he brought another girl before my face, and took half a crown away from me; I took it very much to heart; he beat me about the body, so that I was obliged to keep my bed three days.
I am quite innocent of using the knife; I had my scissors in my hand when she struck me, but I never saw the knife till it was brought up before me on the Thursday following.
You bent the sixpence before you threw it into the till?
I never went into the first man's shop; I went into this lady's, and gave her a sixpence, she tried to bend it; she took another from the till and bent it; it was bad; I said that was not the one that I gave her; she had me taken up because I would not go without my change or the sixpence.
He did not ask where I got it, but he snatched it from me.
As to the trowsers I have no knowledge of having taken them; I had been drinking very heavily on the Saturday.
These napkins, and the other things, were all in a sheet of brown paper tied round with a string, and four directions on it as it was brought to me on the Friday evening.
The person that brought the things to me told me this was a tablecloth, and asked me to hem it, and mark it; I had not opened it at all  I was not aware that it was anything but a tablecloth, and the policeman himself said before the Magistrate that it was a tablecloth.
I gave him a shilling; he put it into the till, and took another one out, and said, \This is a bad one;\" be took it in to his master, and his master came out, and said, \"I am going to lock you up;\" I said, \"What for?\"  he said, \"For offering a bad shilling;\" I did not know it was bad; he gave me a little piece of a shilling; I dropped it in the shop."
Did you not say that your drawer was not locked, any one might have changed it?
The woman ran away?
I heard a cry of \Police!\" I went up to see what was the matter; the prosecutor had hold of a woman; when he saw the policeman, he let her go, and came to me."
Did you not state that I came with another woman?
Did not she say that the woman said to me, \You pay for them,\" before that woman ran away?"
I went with this woman; she selected one pair of stockings, and told me to pay for them; I had four shillings in my hand, and two duplicates; when the witness sent for the policeman, the woman ran away; my husband has been dead four years.
I am an unfortunate girl; I had it given me, and did not know it was bad.
I came at half past 4, and asked for a pint of porter; I gave you a sixpence; you gave me a 4d. piece and a halfpenny, and I never entered your door again from half past 4 o'clock till half past 8.
I stood by the bar, and took a 4d. piece from my bosom; I never went from the bar, and you went and picked up a sixpence.
I had never been inside her door from half past 4 till half past 8 o'clock; I never had a bad shilling or bad sixpence, nor gave her any.
I know nothing of the watch  I am quite innocent of it  I had no home to go to  they behaved very ill to me  I left the house at ten minutes to 12 o'clock.
He has not been living with me these four months; he has been living with another woman.
On the Friday morning he came to me, and told me he had been walking all night, and I got him some dinner; he said he wanted some money, and he must have some, and I gave him 5s. 9d.
He was struggling with me at the time I used the knife; he tried to take two shillings from my pocket.
I said he was living with another woman.
Why did not you give me into custody the first time?
I went to get half a pint of beer, and a young woman said she was to take this young man's coat, and get some money; she asked me to go with her; when we got out she asked me if I would pawn it; I said I did not know where it was; she asked me again, and I took it, and as I was going along a woman ran against me, and took the coat; I went after her, but could not find her; I went and inquired; I went the next day to the Crooked Billet, and was taken.
I found this kettle some distance from the woman's house; I went to the shop, I did not see any one there; then I went to the station house; I had got my hand on the door when she came.
I was in a state of intoxication, and lost my bonnet and scarf; I have no recollection whatever till I was at the station next morning; I suppose, being tipsy, I thought it was my home.
Did not I come up to you on the Tuesday, though you did not see me, and ask you how it was you did not call for the purse?
I went with the man to a public-house in George-street; we remained there till they were about to close, and then he paid, for a pint of brandy at the bar, and took it away in a bottle; we went to a public-house in Northumberland-alley, and drank wine, rum, and brandy; he then paid for half a pint of rum in a bottle, and we came out with it, and went to a house of accommodation in Northumberland-alley, for which he promised me 5s., but only gave me 3s.; he said that was all the money he had; I was very tipsy, and he was extremely so; I took him to my house, and asked him to make me a present; he took out his purse and the duplicate, and said he would bring me 2s. to-morrow, and befriend me; he threw a newspaper on the table, and pulled his pockets out, to show me that he had no more money; I think the pint of brandy must have been drunk, for I was in a dreadful state on the Tuesday, and could scarcely get out of bed; about 2 o'clock, as he did not come according to promise, I went to the Minories, and saw him, but I do not think he saw me; I ran up to him, and said, \You did not perform your promise in bringing me the 2s.;\" he said, \"I did not know what I was doing on Sunday night; I was in a dreadful state of drink;\" he pointed to the side of his head, and showed me a scratch; he proposed going to have something to drink; we went to a public-house, and had two quarterns of rum and a pint of ale, and talked matters over there; this pocketbook was left in my-bed by a friend; this watch belonged to my deceased parent, and the other watch I redeemed at the corner of Turner-street, Commercial-road; the handkerchiefs are mine; I have two children to support, and work at dressmaking and millinery; I never was in prison before; I thought the prosecutor was my friend, and did not think he would turn upon me in this cruel manner; he was pulling me about and kissing me in the street, and because I would not let him do so, he said, \"You shall go with nobody else to-night; I will have my revenge;\" I said, \"If I see a policeman I shall get some protection,\" and walked up a dark turning; he said, \"Give me what I have expended;\" a policeman came up, and I was given into custody, to my great surprise."
When I first met him in Old-street, there was another gentleman with him  he asked me three times to go in the cab before I consented, and he said he would make me a handsome present.
The prosecutor made me a present of this money; he took liberties with me, and after he had done as he liked, he said if I did not give him the money he would give me in charge; I did not think proper to give it him hack after his using me as he had; he asked me two or three times to go in the cab before I would consent; the other man knows that he asked me, and he told the Alderman that he did; he was very drunk; the 2l. was my own.
I never moved off the seat where I was sitting.
That is the person who was with the man, and that is the person who had the money; she never moved off her seat to fetch any beer.
The handkerchief I picked up against the linendraper's shop; there was nothing in it.
I do not remember a word of it; I hope you will have mercy upon me.
I did not know the money was bad, or I should not have given it; I showed him all the money I had, and if I had known it was bad I should not have done it; I hope you will be merciful, and I shall be very cautious the remaining part of my life.
I am not the person who went on the two former occasions.
I never was in that house but once; I uttered the shilling, I know; it was a very cold day, and I went and had the rum; when the man came after me and took me back, the woman said, \This is a bad shilling;\" I said I was not aware of it; she said, \"If I am not mistaken, you are the person who uttered more bad money;\" she went to a till, and she said, \"I have no doubt you are the woman that gave me this other money;\" I never was in the house before; she says she gave me change three times, and she sent the potman after me the third time; I asked for a small glass of rum."
I did not steal them; a woman put them into my hand, and the gentleman came and took me in charge.
I hope you will have mercy on me, as I have four fatherless children.
Was I doing anything for you?
I did not.
I never was before a Magistrate in my life before.
You told me to go out.
It was the other woman who gave them; I never had a bad shilling about me.
You struck me first under the breast?
He struck me first, and knocked me over against the table.
She said she had the handkerchief, which she lent mo as I had a sore throat.
The prosecutrix said that she lent me the money.
I said \You lent me the money,\" and she said \"I own I lent you the money, but you stole the handkerchief;\" she is a great drinker; the handkerchief was not worth 2d."
You dropped a shilling, and five or ten minutes afterwards you said you dropped a half sovereign; there were other persons nearer to you than I was; it was my wish to have a policeman.
I was going to pawn the ring, and at the pawnbroker's I took a pin to pin my shawl, and put the ring in my mouth; I never saw the half sovereign.
This woman was in the shop, and she staid there till the officer brought me back.
I am innocent; I had my ring in my mouth, nothing else.
I did not say I had never been there before; I said I had not been there on Wednesday.
I was not aware that it was bad.
I had never been in the shop before.
I am perfectly innocent of the first charge; I never was in the shop.
You never returned me the sixpence back again.
I was very much intoxicated; I gave her the sixpence for the brandy, but did not know it was bad; I had not been in the shop before.
I never was inside the shop; I have not been down Chelsea for a length of time.
Why did not you give me into custody?
There was another woman apprehended who offered her a shilling in bad money, and she said I had passed bad money, and very likely I passed the florin; the other woman was discharged and I was kept.
I am quite innocent; I never had the shilling nor the 2s.-piece; on the night I was taken I went to have a glass of gin, and paid for it in copper; the other woman was in the bar; I had known her, but had not seen her for some time; the officer was sent for, and we were both given in charge.
I had been at work all day, and was at the Crown public house; this woman and her son came in; she was very drunk indeed; she went to the fireplace to light her pipe, and went to sit on the fender; she fell twice on the floor; the boy persuaded her to get up and go home; I never opened my lips to them; they went out, and I remained behind, to speak to an ostler there; when I went out they were having some dispute; the basket lay on the pavement; I said to the son, \Why don't you persuade your mother to get home, you see she has had something to drink?\"  he said, \"What has that to do with you, you   ------b   ?\" and he struck me till I was black and blue; I crossed the road, and she was not content with her son ill-using me, but she followed me, and laid me in the road, tore off my bonnet, and cap, and shawl, and kicked me with her heavy boots till my hips were as black as my boots."
It could not have been very bad, for she was out with her trotters every day afterwards  I had no knife in my possession  I hope you will have mercy upon me.
The sixpence was given to several other persons, besides Mr. Ellis.
Were there not three or four other men who looked at it?
I am an unfortunate girl; I took the two sixpences that night; I went to the first house; they said the sixpence was bad; I did not think it was; I went to the other house, and was taken; the first sixpence was given me by a woman, whom I tried to find but could not.
What did Johnny bring in his hand?
There were some duplicates taken from me, which have not been given back to me.
I was not aware that they were bad.
I went on the Tuesday for some milk, and gave a shilling; I went again in the afternoon, and she said I had been in the shop before, and I said, \Give me in charge;\" I waited till the policeman came."
I came three times to your shop.
He promised my husband to take the things back again  this saucepan I took over that morning, and got a shilling  the other things my husband promised to get out, and Mr. Hope agreed to take them back.
Did I not say I did not wish to sell them?
My husband gave you the duplicates?
My husband gave Mr. Hope the duplicates of some things, and he told him he would take the things back; on the day I got this shilling, I told Mr. Crane I would go in the evening and get the things, but I could not; I had lost two duplicates out of my pocket, and my husband said I had better go and get the declaration of them, and I did get them; I did it in consequence of my husband leaving me in distress with my children.
You did not give mo into custody then?
Did I not go out the second time?
I took the shilling for a bit of lace, not being aware that it was a bad one; I went and asked for a 1d. worth of cheese, and gave it her, and she said I had been there before; I said I had not; I went away and missed the baby's sock; I went back for it, and came away; I walked to the top of the turning, before the policeman came and took me; I had a person to prove I was not there on Friday.
It is false about my striking her; I never did, and never used bad language.
He never mentioned the poker to me, nor me to him.
I sincerely deplore that this did occur; I was having my tea, and heard that a man was ill using my brother; I had a knife in my hand, cutting some bread; I went out, and the man made use of bad language to me, and was about to strike me; I put up my arm to prevent his hitting me in the face; he seized my arm, and twisted it; the young woman interfered, and I hit the blow in the heat of passion, which I much regret; I had no idea of doing any harm.
I am not guilty of anything but the old bit of a counterpane and the cloak; I found them in the dust hole, and thought they were of no use; the stockings are my own; there were lots of silks and satins in the house, which I might have taken if I had had a mind to steal.
I have been to your shop the last fourteen months, did you ever know me bring bad money before?
Four years ago you had me in custody, and you have owed me a grudge ever since, and when you saw me this time you said \Now I will do for you.\""
I offered you two sixpences.
You said what had I got, I said money, and opened my hand, and you took the money.
I had the money to get the porter for a man; I did not know it was bad.
When I went to your shop I wanted a bit of pork; I went away, and came back to have a piece of beef, and your son wanted me to give him a good half crown for a bad one; I said I would not, and you said if I would not give him a good half crown for it, you would lock me up.
I was not the person who gave the half-crown; my husband gave me a half sovereign, I changed it, and got a 5s. piece and four shillings; I went to the shop and they had not a bit of pork; I went again, and had a piece of beef; I gave the 5s. piece, they said it was bad, and that I had given a bad half crown, and if I would give them a good one they would not lock me up; I said I would not, I would send to my husband, but they locked me up; I know nothing whatever of the half crown.
I was not there, what do you know me by?
I met a gentleman who gave me the half crown, the shilling I know nothing about; the people I work for will give me a character.
Young Mr. Smith had one key that opened the drawer that the key of the bed room was in, for he had some friends in his father's absence, and the bed-room door was open on the Sunday week after he went away.
I had no intention of leaving my master's service at all; when he came home I meant to tell him what I had done, and what I did it for, but he gave me into custody at the very moment; I never wished to leave the house at all, and as for the fire, I know nothing about it, not a thing about it; I am perfectly innocent of the charge laid against me; as to the taking of the things, I took everything that was pawned; if I had wished to have left the place, I could have done it the night before, but I would not until I saw Mr. Smith, to tell him what I had done.
I met the prosecutrix, and asked her for 8d. she owed me; she paid me 4d., and said she would not pay me any more; I saw a half crown in her hand; I took it, and said I would keep the other 4d. out of it; she called a policeman, and took me into custody; I said I would not give it up till I got to the station; I am a poor widow woman, and get my living by selling fruit; I throw myself entirely on the Court.
I picked up the half sovereign just by the stall and took it home; the policeman kept it, and I never saw any more of it.
Did you see any man with me?
I was by myself that evening.
You gave the shilling to a little boy, and he went out of the shop?
I am married, and have four children; my husband is a bricklayer, I had been on the drink, away from him; I was not aware that the sixpence was bad; I was in liquor, I had been drinking all the afternoon.
I am innocent.
Was not a letter addressed to Mr. Simmonds enclosed to me in a letter addressed to Emily Taylor?
I do not recollect you; what was your name then?
On what occasion did you see me write?
I said the bill was my writing certainly, but not the letter.
On what occasion have you seen me write?
I wish the two letters addressed to Emily Taylor to be read.
I can only say that these letters have been going on for the last five years; they commenced by threatening that I should not remain in the stock business; for a long time they sent letters to the house where I was living; then they commenced at the warehouses where I used to work, till they got me out of the work, and when I got into another warehouse the letters began again; then they took to writing to my work people, similar to that of Emily Taylor, asking them to say I was the party that sent these letters; I was at last driven out of the stock business; I took to the mantle business, and the same thing commenced again while I was working for Welch and Margetson; I had not been at work there a month when a letter was sent to the warehouse boy, asking him to cut my work with a penknife, and then go to Mr. Margetson, and say I had sent in my work imperfect; Thain has that letter, and also another that was sent to a young person that was working for me, offering her a sovereign if she would, when she went out to her dinner, take two or three of the stocks with her, and also an apron, or anything of mine, and carry them to Mr. Welch, and swear that I had sent her to pledge them, and to tell Mr. Welch that she had seen me write letters.
Did I ever send you to post any letters to any persons?
The Magistrate told you to look round, and you said, \Yes, that is the woman, she has got a cut on her face; if you allow me to speak to her, I shall know better;\" I was willing to speak, but the Magistrate would not allow it.\""
Did not I take the flour?
On Saturday, 2nd May, and on the Thursday before, my husband and I had a quarrel; I locked him up in Smithfield station, and he would have been committed, but I asked for mercy, as he had a job of work, and he was bound over to keep the peace; I and my mother had to appear on the 2nd, and at 2 o'clock I was at Guildhall, as the policeman can state, and the books too; I did not leave there till 3 o'clock; I have a bad leg, and it took me some time to get home; I got home about 4 o'clock; I stopped at the door for an hour with a child, which was there belonging to a person who is a lunatic; my mother, who is an aged woman of seventy-four, went to Leather Lane to sell wash leather, and I was there with her at 6 o'clock; I remained at the door at 8 o'clock, and have witnesses to prove that I was at home at 9 o'clock, and one witness, who was in bed with me, at 9 o'clock; Mr. Beck came to the station, and begged me to take off my shawl; he was some time considering, and said, \Take it off further;\" I did so, and he said, \"Yes, that is the woman;\" and I was locked up again; I met my mother about 7 o'clock, and we slept together, and had our breakfast in the morning; and when she went out she said that she was going to London; and Mr. Beck, finding that I had slept with her, sent after her by the string that they have on the railroad, by which they took her quicker; they gave her a glass of gin, and after that 7s. 8d. was found on her, but the Magistrate discharged her, and she is in Court."
I did not go to the shop before.
I did not know they were bad.
I had it in my hand looking at it.
I was not in the shop on 8th Jane.
I am quite innocent of passing the shilling; I had the 5s. piece given to me, not knowing it was bad.
I was never in your shop.
I went into her shop, and gave her a half crown; she gave me two shillings, two pence, one halfpenny, and two farthings.
I am not the person, and the landlady says so.
I did not say anything about buying the ticket nine months before.
I bought the ticket of a woman in the street  I gave her 9d. for two tickets.
You said before that you could not say I was the person?
Do you know the girl?
Did Mr. Rice take it up, and look and say it was a bad shilling?
I said Ann Flaharty?
I know nothing at all about the girl; I never saw her in my life. I was down at the station-house, and the child said it was me, but it was a mistake. Mr. Rice took up the shilling and looked at it; he knows more about bad money than I do.
You said it was another woman who gave you the shilling?
Will you state what brought me to the police-office when you made a prisoner of me?
Did you see me take the woman's money, or see my hand in her pocket?
I was never in the shop, and never took her money. I had been at home all the evening. My husband and I quarrelled, and he struck me, and gave me the black eye, and I went to give charge of him when they arrested me for this.
What time was it when your father and me first went out?
Did you see me lying down on the ground?
I deny striking him at all  I shoved him away.
Did you attend him six months ago, when he fell off the omnibus opposite the Thatched House; I fetched you to him?
How many more were in the house?
I have no child, and I had not been in the place on the Friday; she said before the magistrate that she could not swear whether it was me or not.
Did you see me sell anything?
I am innocent of it.
What I said was, \I work very hard for my living,\""
I never said such a word.
. I never saw the parcel till the policeman opened it; it was brought into my place by the young man I was riving with, who told me not to open it I work very hard to support myself and child.
Did I not come on Monday morning and say, \Take the child to Gray's Inn Hospital\"?"
Did not you and I go out in the morning and have two pots of beer together?
Did you not see the child about 8 o'clock, when I brought in a bottle of gin?
What day in the week did she bring the child?
. She neglected the child in filth and dirt to go after charity, that is her character. I did not take the poker in my hand to injure any child, for I am a mother myself; they stood godmother and godfather to my second child. I have been a good friend to her in every way; my husband was fifteen or sixteen weeks out of work; we were obliged to sell our home, and I went to her for shelter. I did not do it with any bad feeling, it was dirt and neglect, and the place being so narrow, and I poking the fire with the poker. I did not mean to do it.
I know nothing about the first one.
Did not you give it to the Magistrate yourself down at the police-station?
Did not old Mr. Child give the two-shilling piece to the-Magistrate, at the police-station?
You put the sixpence in the till?
I did not know that they were bad.
How can you say that you had taken it on 23d march, when you told the policeman you took it two or three weeks ago; and then the policeman told you to try and remember?
Had not you the half-crown in your hand in front of the bar?
I asked him what charge he had against me; I went to the station-house with him; as they were going along the road, he and the prosecutor were stopping in different parts of the road, settling how they would make the statement up.
I have never been in the house in my life. I called for a glass of ale, and she said, \you are very much like the woman that was here two or three weeks ago, and passed a bad two-shilling piece;\" and she said that if I did not give her back the change she would give me in custody. I went to the station with the policeman. I told the inspector I was not aware that she had taken a bad two-shilling piece, and that I would not give her change for what I knew nothing about. I told him I was living with my friends, who kept a coffee-house in Lambeth."
Did not you come up to me and ask me to go with you and have a glass of wine?
This gentleman caught hold of me in St. Paul's Church-yard, pulled me into an entry, and put his hand where I did not want to have it.
Did not you come out of a house in Thrall-street about half-past 12.
I am quite innocent of it. I never saw the man before.
I did not go to the shop on 12th November, and I did not know it was bad.
When I first came into your shop, on the Saturday afternoon, was not the policeman in your shop?
The policeman said he had had many cases like that, and that I had made a bolt of it.
When I went in and asked for a pennyworth of biscuits it was the first time I was in the shop; and she stated that she thought I was the woman that gave her the shilling last night I have been very much distressed, but have never gone about with bad money.
The address that I gave was right.
Did not you say when you saw the blood, \Tom; she has struck you with the key?\""
Were you not playing at dominoes when I came in?
All he states is false, he was not there at all.
I and two other girls were in the public-house all the evening, and we had two quarterns of gin and two half-quarterns of rum; I went and got some bread and bacon at the chandler's shop, and when I went into the taproom with it, this man took me by the throat to put me out. It is my first offence. I did not intend stabbing him; I did not think about it.
I am an unfortunate girl; I met with this gentleman a fortnight ago last Saturday, and he gave me the money; I did not know it was bad; I should not have offered the shilling had I known it was bad. I was never in trouble before.
I hare never been in the man's shop before, nor have I ever been here before.
At the police-court you said you did not know me by my features or my dress.
I am innocent; I did not know it was a bad one. I went in for the two mutton chops; when I gave the half-crown to her she said it was bad, and accused me of having given her one on the Wednesday before, which I am innocent of.
I never took them to the shop; I was not these.
If I took their handkerchiefs, they nave got mine.
I hope you will have mercy on me, it it my first time.
I never was convicted before.
When I went into the shop I spoke to a young woman first
I did not know it was a bad shilling.
The gloves were given to me.
Did I not do it, as you had got a baby's frock to make, did not you say you had some clothes of your own to make, and you gave me a magenta and black petticoat, and did not I sit up till 3 o'clook on Sunday night to make it for you?
When I first gave you the half-crown did you put it into your money detector?
She gave them to a man outside the door that she called over, and told him not to give them out of his hand till she gave them to the policeman.
I am an unfortunate girl, and took the half-crown from a gentleman that I was with from the Sunday till the Tuesday, and likewise the two half sovereigns. I went in to purchase some bread, not knowing it was bad. I am innocent of the other half-crown, I assure you.
When you came down you saw me with the police?
You told the Magistrate you saw me take out the box?
You never saw me before that morning?
I have never been accused in any situation before; I deny that I ever brought any articles out; the woman was coming along the Blackfriars-road with another woman, and she had the chair, the box, and the plate; she said that she was coming to my place, and that these were some things that she had, got from where her husband was with another woman; I went with her to this house; she went in and brought out the clock and two pictures; I came as far as the middle of the next street, and then said, \I don't like having anything to do with it, I shall get into trouble;\" she said, \"You will get into no trouble; they are my own;\" she took the clock, and left me with the two pictures in my hand; the boy came up and said, \"You have two pictures;\" I said, \"Yes; they do not belong to you;\" he said, \"Yes; they belong to the woman where I am living; bring them back; there is a clock, is there not?\" I said, \"Yes, and several other things;\" he said, \"You had better bring her back;\" a man at the corner said, \"The woman has turned up this turning;\" I ran to overtake her, and then the policeman came up; I told where the things were, and gave them up; I need not have told where they were; the woman said she would have got rid of the things, and I was a fool to tell where they were; she was in the yard at the time the policeman brought the things out;\" had I known it at the time I would have had her taken: I wish to get my living in an honest way; I have two children totally unprovided for; the woman has got out of the way."
He would not go to the butter shop with me.
When I came for the oatmeal I said, \I am very sorry it is bad, but I will tell you where I am living."
I had been out purchasing a few things, and took two sixpences in change; I took one to the grocers, and the other to the corn-chandler's, but did not know they were bad; my daughter had only been confined a few days, and, of course, I ran home; I went to get the oatmeal on the Monday, and they said that it was bad, and that I was there on Saturday night; I said, \Yes,\" and that I lived in Brook-street; I went home, and about ten minutes afterwards the inspector came and charged me."
When did you enter the report?
Did it hit you?
If I had aimed at you I could have hit you, but I did not aim at you or at any one; I threw it anywhere.
I did not threaten her life, did I, or say I would do for her yet, or anything of that sort?
It is false, I never said so, but I need not be surprised at his telling a falsehood considering the language he used to me in taking me to the refractory ward; I know he would not be particular about telling a lie.
Was Miss Moseley gone when you took the part of the bottle from me?
I acknowledge my fault as far as regards striking Miss Moseley, but I did not threaten her life or any one's else; what I did I did in a passion, and I am truly sorry for it, and I ask your mercy.
Mrs. Brown has no beer; she never takes it.
I never changed a two-shilling piece in your house  I saw you take one from another woman; I changed a shilling.
I did not know the half-crown was bad. I never changed a 2s.. piece that day. The money found on me was what my husband gave me on Saturday night. He said that he would be here.
I was not aware of the nature of the offence.
I was not in the shop on the Thursday.
I was not aware that the half-crown was bad.
Did not we go out together?
You did not find the knife on me?
He has been living with me for the last two years and more, and he promised to marry me as soon as he could get money enough to make it convenient  he brought me from a good home  I have had one child by him  I kept him all the summer while he was out of work.
I hope you will have mercy on me. It was my first offence, and will be my last This will teach me a lesson I shall never forget.
What he says is false, I was not intoxicated; the child had been ill ever since its birth.
Do you know that the child was teething at the time?
There were no sores about the baby, were there?
I believe it was your assistant who attended to my baby for a fortnight)
How many times did I see you while I lived there?
Have you ever seen the baby dirty?
You did  I have seen your baby so dirty that I could not touch it.
I never neglected my baby; it was a poor little thing, and was ill from its birth. I could get nothing to eat myself. I drank no liquor, but if I took a glass of beer it overcame me; I never expected that I should bring the child out of the lying-in hospital alive.
I never was locked up in my life before, and defy any one to say so.
Thomas is entirely innocent of all knowledge of the transaction. I got these in paying my week's rent.
I was not aware that it was bad  I had the 6s. which I borrowed of a friend to keep us all the week, as my husband was out of work. I have borne a good character hitherto, and I should not forfeit if for the sake of a shilling. I am very sorry that it happened. I shall be more particular another time.
I did not know it was a bad one.
I did not know it was bad.
All he states is false; he saw me that morning, I went to his shop where he was at work, and he would not allow me one penny  he said if I came to his place again he would blind me  he has been twelve months living with a common prostitute at a brothel in Holywell-lane  he spent his money in nothing but gambling and keeping prostitutes  it was him that threw the vitriol over me, and I dashed it at him to save myself I have been three weeks in the hospital.
I told you that my husband threw it at me.
My mother can prove the state I was in that night. He has vitriol to use in his business. I was taken to the hospital, and was there three weeks; I have a certificate from the hospital. I have had dreadful illusage from him these three years, and have been in two different hospitals through him. He is living with a common prostitute now, that is the third woman he has lived with in the last twelve months  he never took out a summons till I went to the workhouse, and said he should keep me if be could keep another woman; when I have asked him for anything he bus kicked me double. Five nights out of seven he is at a house which nobody uses but thieves and gamblers.
I was never in the shop at all.
I had no idea it was bad  it was the only bad coin I ever had in my possession  I bear a good character.
I am innocent, and do not know where your shop is.
I did not know it was bad.
Did he not run away from me?
Did not I tell you I was a married woman when I knew you first?
Did I not come to your house several times and ask you if you had heard of my husband?
He was intoxicated, and fell on the fender.
. It is the first time I have been in trouble.
I was not there that night, and did not see this woman.
It is all false; I was not there at all.
I told you that I heard of it on Saturday night. I was taken down to Tower-street station at 12 o'clock. Inspector Edwards took my address, and said, \When we want you we will send for you."
My mother can prove that I was at home and in bed with her at the time this happened, and so can my sister and two more witnesses.
He has not spoken the truth  I never tied him down, at all.
He used to ill-use me  I got my own living, for he hardly ever gave me any money  he is a very great drunkard, always in public-houses.
Did not I assist you to the station with my husband.
Did my husband make any remark when you were dressing his wounds?
My husband has brought it all on himself; he was so unkind to me  I am very sorry to think I have done any such thing  what he has said respecting the knife two years and a half ago is quite false  it was himself that took it to bed with him, and took it to the shop  next morning he got a summons out against me, and said that I had done it  I have had great provocation in many ways  he said he would never be contented until he had put me into prison, because he had got twenty-eight days for cutting my head; and his own daughter can prove that he did so  I was very jealous of my husband  I did not like his going away from me  I found I could not bear it.
Who was in the shop?
Did your master turn me out of the shop?
I went in nearly every day for beer.
I can assure you I know nothing about it. I never was at the haberdasher's shop: the lady makes a very great mistake. The others are shops that I am in the habit of going to.
I never was in the shop but that once in my life  the man was asked what he had done with the first shilling  he said he had it at home, he believed, and if he had he would bring it, and next day he said his wife put it in the fire.
Yes, you did; when you came again you said you had burnt it.
I am innocent of the first shilling, and I did not know the second was bad. I did not know I had a penny till I put my hand in my pocket.
I did not ask you to give it to me back, that I might pass it again; I said, \I know where I got it, and can get it changed.\""
I deny being in the shop before  it is a great falsehood.
Did not I say, \You have made a mistake, my girl, it is not me,\" and did not you say, \"There is no other woman standing in the street, therefore it must be you?\""
I was coming home from the hospital, where I had left my little boy. This girl came up to me and said, \Your change; you gave me a shilling to go for a quartern of gin.\" I said, \"You have made a mistake.\" She said, \"There is no other woman in the street but you, and it must be you.\" Mrs. French gave me in custody. I had never seen the child till she approached me with the change."
I only took a dress and a jacket.
What time do you shut up?
I was not capable of taking care of what belonged to myself; I bad been drinking with the prosecutor all the morning at another house, and came to the Eight Bells with him.
You said that if I would give you 1s. 10 1/2 d. you would let me go, but I would not.
Did I attempt to go out?
It was not me who gave you the bad shilling, it was the person who was with me.
I was not there the day before, nor yet in the morning  you put the shilling into the till, and then took it out and gave it to the master.
I took 2s. 1d. for work  I do not believe it was a bad sixpence  I took it from a pawnbroker, in pledge for a petticoat.
. I am quite innocent of it  I was not there on the Wednesday  I have two witnesses.
. I really did not know they were bad.
I meant the young man that gave it me.  NOT GUILTY .
I never intended stealing these things; I merely pat them away because I was in distress at the time, and required a little money. I fully intended to return them. I asked Mr. Brickwood several tunes when he wished to discharge me to allow me to remain, and I would return the things; he said he would see me d  d to hell first. On another occasion, he said if I did not leave the house he would kick me out, or get a policeman to turn me out, and the sooner I left the house the better. He might have given me in charge then. I told him I would have the law of him, and he said, \Burn the law, and you too; I know plenty of law that will finish you.\""
I was not out on the 3rd July. I fell down on my face, and hurt my leg. I was never in Mrs. Whitehead's shop.
I did not know till after my son was gone, that the ticket was left behind. I told you the truth.
Have I not washed for you?
I pledged the watch, but nothing else. My son said that it was for his master, and I gave him the money.
What I hare done was in obedience to my husband.
I have sent for my marriage certificate since I have been in prison
I never was in the house; I don't know you.
I did not know either of them was bad; one was given me by a gentleman; it was not me who gave the other.
What time did Mrs. Ware give it to you?
I did not refuse it, I said I would give it at another time.
He gave me the purse.
Were you in while my child was crying?
Did you not say that new laid eggs, beat up in milk, would do the child some good, and I did so?
How do you know I was out every night?
I took the child to Dr. Phelps, and he told me to come again in the morning. It had the whooping cough. I went home, and it died about 12 o'clock at night. I had a person to look after it while it was ill. I was not rich, and I gave it what I could afford.
She had no other home but mine, and it was her's and the child's too.
The child had diarrhoea, and nothing would keep on its chest; it was always delicate, and it could not hold bread and milk; you said it was to have a quart of milk a day, and I asked you to allow me something, and you said Oh no, the mother was to have it?
A little after 7, a gentleman came tip and took your arm and mine, and we went into the \Ten Bells;\" he asked you if you would have anything, and you had a glass of stout."
The prosecutrix said that I represented the superintendent to be my uncle, and I did so because I was ashamed that she should know I was a ticket-of-leave woman. I went to the police-station to report myself. I have tried hard to get an honest living, but I have no friend, and no one to help me. I did not steal the mantle; I have not taken the value of a pin since I have been out, and sooner than thieve again I would destroy myself.
I beg for mercy.
When I bought the boots and gave the half-sovereign, did you say anything about my having been there before?
He has made boots for me and my child for five years; I am an unfortunate woman, and received the money.
What time was I home on Saturday night?
Did not you change a half-sovereign for me?
Your brother's wife says the watch was in his pocket, and it fell into her hand; how could I have it?
Do you consider that you are justified in being a witness against me, considering the character you bear in Cardiff?
Were you not perfectly acquainted with everything relating to my former marriages?
I was perfectly convinced that I was free to marry Mr. Wood. All my letters and papers are in my solicitor's hands, and he is not here. There are several letters, stating that Mr. Reeve is dead, which the solicitor has Mr. Wood has abstracted some letters from my luggage, which would have proved that Mr. Reeve was dead, or that it had been stated to me that he was dead, for my father saw his mother, who said that she thoroughly believed he died in Dublin.
I borrowed the shilling of my sister. If I had had those pieces I should have dropped them in the snow, where they would not have been found. I never saw the handkerchief drop.
Did not you come out of a public-house, and clap me on the shoulder, and ask me to drink with you?
You asked me how much there was. I told you 18s., and that it was mine?
A woman asked me to hold the bundle for her; she was quarrelling with another woman, and when the quarrel was over, I could not find her  I had had a drop to drink, or else I would have gone home  I was going down to my mother's, as I was very tipsy.
How can you say you never gave me those things; did not you give them to me, after drugging me with a glass of wine and seducing me? and you gave me a sovereign at the same time; I should think you gave me 5l., and those clothes, to keep me silenced from Mrs. Bulmer.
I know nothing about those things; I never saw them before in my life.
Do you recollect Mrs. Lahey, a widow, coming to my place, last autumn twelve months?
I know nothing about them.
My girl says that you went out of the shop to get change for it?
I am quite innocent of it being bad. The other half-crown I am certain was good. I obtained it from the pawnbroker in the morning.
It was not me that opened the account  my husband sent me  I was ashamed to go in with so little money, and I got a young person who went with me to go in and do it; neither did I put my name to the cheque; it is not my writing at all.
No, I pointed out the barman.
Oh! what a story.
He struck me; I never had the watch.
I did not have the watch.
Why did not she detain me when I went the second time?
I do not recollect being near your house  I was very drunk.
I daresay the policeman has got my character from my master. I did not know the money was bad.
A bigger brute never lived than he is.
I had black eyes one after the other from him.
\I have only to say that I am innocent, and that if I had been guilty, in my own mind no punishment could be too great for me, if I did that to him who for so many years has been all in all to me. I left my husband for him. Mr. Moon knew me when I was in society, and in my own family. Upon my husband leaving me, he wished me to get a divorce. I returned to my husband at Boulogne to save him from a divorce. I returned turned to this country again, and my husband followed and broke up everything in the house, saying that all I wanted was a divorce, and that he would not have it. Mr. Turquand wrote letters to my husband at the dictation of Mr. Moon. After that his family persuaded him to leave me. He did leave me. I went to John Moon and asked him to give Frederick Moon a letter for me, and I would never see him again. He said 'No,' and that Sir Francis had determined that no letters should be sent. In the meantime Frederick Moon returned, and it was agreed that I should belong to him; not to live together, but to belong to him; and I have all these years belonged to him. This last year or eighteen months he was always unhappy. He thought he did not see enough of me. He then proposed that I should live with him altogether. He was very unhappy. He then settled that he would be with me. We have been most happy. He was most kind. His whole consideration was my happiness, and I could not have done him an injury. He tried to take the knife from me. I am not sure whether he got it or not. We struggled and fell. I thought at first that I must be the one injured. I found blood on me; warm blood. I said \"Oh, Fred., Fred., what have you done?\"Then I found, of course, that it was him, and not myself. I tried all I could to do something to stop it. First of all I applied cold water. Then I remembered that cold water produced blood instead of stopping it. Then I sent for ice and tried that, and then the doctors came. Then, my Lord, you spoke to the Jury that the servants heard a scream, and that there were only so many steps dividing the kitchen from the dining-room. There are two nights of steps; I should think the first one about twelve, the other one about six. Mr. Eccles can answer that. You spoke of the scream. The fact is, the bell rung violently, and the servant, Mary Hale, rang the call-bell. That has been in dispute; as to Mr. Pickford's evidence, you must know I could not say he had broken a blood-vessel. I have nothing more to say, my Lord.\""
On the first occasion you put the florins with other money which was lying on one side.
I did not know the money was bad. The young man I live with gave me a half-sovereign. I got some bread and butter, and sugar, and got it changed. I then went to this man's shop, and bought some meat. He said that the florin was bad, and I was locked up.
You know I maintained him. A. Yes  I know that he struck you and ill-treated you.
When I came to your house, in March, had I a black eye?
When I gave the prosecutor 20l. he wrote for more money. I established a business for him in Hamburg, which cost me 80l. He cursed and swore at me, and I left him. William White married me out of pity, to save me from ruin.
I came to your door and you got up and ran down stairs directly; you did not go into my room. A. I did, and I wrapped the child's nightgown round my son's neck in his room.
William, you were tipsy when you came in.
There is a large sword, which left a large dent in my father-in-law's door, and had I been there my head would have been off; and the dagger was stuck through the wall.
My aunt found the chemise, you did not.
Oh, you wicked man, you are not a young man, father, what did you say when my womb was down?
I have been in service eighteen years.
I said I was very sorry; I did not know it was bad.
I got out of the cab directly I went into the shop. I did not know the half-sovereign was bad.
The man gave it to me; he never saw me before. I am very sorry.
I only gave her the half-crown.
She never saw me with a knife. I did not wound him.
They had been drinking all the day before. I did not do it.
It was washed before you saw it.
I don't know anything about it, I only followed the crowd.
I deny using the expressions. I also was not separated from my husband; he stayed out all night very often, and illused me  I wanted to know the reason, and he looked me up. I was taken before the Magistrate and discharged. He said he would allow me 6s. I asked him what I was to do, and he told me to go on the streets. I went to ask him for money. I had to pay 2s. for lodgings, and I went for some money, and in the heat of passion I ran across the road and did this; it was quite an act of madness; I did not do it with the intention of hurting him, but simply to frighten him to five me money to go to my sister's.
I am very sorry. I did not intend to drown the boy. and I beg you will be merciful to me.
I am very sorry for what I have done, but I never saw Murphy from the time I left him, and never went to seek him  the last I heard was that he was married and gone to America.
He says he did not see me for five months  he saw me on the Monday previous to the Saturday, I went to see my child, and he took me by the throat and threw me out of the room.
He says he heard I was married before  he knows perfectly well that I was not  my eldest girl was two and a half years old when I became his wife, and she does not belong to him  I have been away from him sixteen months last September twelvemonth, through his ill-usage  I was taken ill in the street, and taken to the infirmary  I am subject to fits  I was there a month, and was taken from there to Charing Cross Hospital and the Strand Union, and he is now cohabiting with my sister.
I lived with that man twelve years, and out of that I have had ten years of misery, knocking me about, even in my confinements. I had to be taken to the hospital. I had my ribs broken, and he threatened to put me into a boiling copper. He would not support me, and has left me with a pennyworth of milk for me and my child. I had to go to the workhouse, and he had to pay for my maintenance for a fortnight. He then begged me to come back again. I was in the family way, and he turned me out; I had to go about carrying a dead child in me, while he was living with another woman. I came home after two months with brain fever. He was then cohabiting with another woman, underneath. He struck me on the head, and I was taken to the Marylebone Infirmary, and was out of my mind for three weeks through his ill-usage. When I came back there was not a stick in the place; he had taken both my children away, and left only a bag of shavings. I then collected another home, and he came home on 12th January. On 28th March he commenced breaking up my things again, and ill-used me, and struck me in the breast with the leg of the table. I left him for some weeks, and then came back. I was then in the family way again, towards the latter end of the year; my breast was very bad, and after a three weeks' confinement I had to go to the Middlesex Hospital, and remained there four months, and during that time he never came near me to give me even an ounce of tea. The last fortnight he deserted my children, and did not give them a loaf of bread. I had to leave the hospital before my time to see my children. On 5th September, last year, I was taken ill in the street, and taken to the union, and was laid up for a month, and when I came home I found my home gone, and these two living together as man and wife. This time I would not have gone near him, but I wished to see my children. I asked him to leave me the eldest, as she did not belong to him. He said he would do as he liked with her, and I should not have anything to do with her. I went to see her on the Saturday night, and found that my husband had been to the Magistrate making a statement that I only wanted to get her away from her situation in order to pawn her clothes, which was quite wrong; the girl wanted to leave. When I found that I was refused admission to the girl I went and bought this, but not for him; I did not intend to find him at home, as he is generally at the public-house at that time of night. My sister answered me through the door, and defied me to come in; she said she was inside and she would take care to keep me out. I sat on the stairs for a quarter of an hour, and when he came up stairs she called out \Look out, Amos; there is somebody on the stairs;\" he said \"Is there?\" I said \"Yes, there is,\" and I threw the cup in the darkness. I could not see where I threw it. I then waited till the policeman came. That is all I have to say."
I never did such a thing; there are a quantity of boots outside, on the pavement. I keep a shop, and work very hard, and have a very good character. I am quite innocent.
MR. RAY knew the child was dying from its birth.
On Saturday night about 11.45 my sister asked me to go and get haif a pint of beer, and the young man who keeps company with Mrs. Curtin's daughter ran out and deliberately kicked me. My sister stood with her hand on the bannisters and said \Never mind, go upstairs.\" On the Sunday morning after the child died my son, who lives in the New North Road, asked me to dinner, and I went out of the place and stopped there all Sunday, and when I came home again they began abusing me. On Thursday the officer came with a summons in the name of \"Turner. \"He stopped at the door several minutes and said \"That is the woman who is summoned,\" and I said \"You had better take it in.\" When I got home the following Monday I found a warrant from the Coroner for ill-using the child. That was the first I heard of the child."
You served me shamefully, you know you did; the three of you, not one.
I don't remember saying that I wished to burn the prison down at all  I was insensible at the time and did not know what I was doing.
I was treated different to the other prisoners and placed in the dark  I was ill and went to the doctor to ask him not to allow me to pick the oakum and he said I must do it  I go light-headed in my head and don't know what I am doing.
I am very sorry for what I have done, and I hope you will deal leniently with me. and I will try and lead a different life. I was sent to prison innocently, which of course preyed on my mind. Directly I got there they put me in the punishment cell, and that is why I went on as I did. I went to see the doctor to ask him if he would not do something for me as I was not well, to take me off my oakum and he would not  I did not do it with intent to injure any person.
He gave me the money to treat myself to a glass, as was a it cold night, and he lent me the handkerchief to wipe my eye. whiteness That is not true.
My father was a solicitor, and my husband was an architect and surveyor  my father-in-law allowed me 10s. a week until I lived with the prosecutor.
I only gave the milk I was ordered, and arrowroot, and if she did not eat the one I gave her the other.
I am unfortunate; a gentleman gate me the half-crown; I bought some sprats with it and got the money in change  I did not know it was bad.
I put it in the cup in the window-sill to take it away with the breakfast things. I went on with my work ad usual, and in the evening my mistress took me to Dr. Suteliff, who asked me something, and I do not know how I answered him. After I had left Mrs. Edwards a policeman in private clothes asked me to go to the station. I was charged, and taken the next morning to Lambeth. There was nothing in the cup but grounds and one or two bits of bread. I did not know what I was doing, I Was worried so, and did it in mistake, and the breakfast things had to be washed up. I did hot intend to do any harm whatever.
I was under the influence of drink, and was much aggravated. I did not intend to do her any bodily harm. I was haying my supper, and had the knife in my hand, and she struggled, and we fell together. I did not do it intentionally.
